Author: Stephen Hawking
 
 Chapter 1 - Our Picture of the Universe
 Chapter 2 - Space and Time
 Chapter 3 - The Expanding Universe
 Chapter 4 - The Uncertainty Principle
 Chapter 5 - Elementary Particles and the Forces of Nature
 Chapter 6 - Black Holes
 Chapter 7 - Black Holes Ain't So Black
 Chapter 8 - The Origin and Fate of the Universe
 Chapter 9 - The Arrow of Time
 Chapter 10 - Wormholes and Time Travel
 Chapter 11 - The Unification of Physics
 Chapter 12 - Conclusion
 Glossary
 Acknowledgments & About The Author
 FOREWARD
 I didn’t write a foreword to the original edition of A Brief History of Time. That was done by Carl Sagan. Instead,
 I wrote a short piece titled “Acknowledgments” in which I was advised to thank everyone. Some of the
 foundations that had given me support weren’t too pleased to have been mentioned, however, because it led to
 a great increase in applications.
 I don’t think anyone, my publishers, my agent, or myself, expected the book to do anything like as well as it did.
 It was in the London Sunday Times best-seller list for 237 weeks, longer than any other book (apparently, the
 Bible and Shakespeare aren’t counted). It has been translated into something like forty languages and has sold
 about one copy for every 750 men, women, and children in the world. As Nathan Myhrvold of Microsoft (a
 former post-doc of mine) remarked: I have sold more books on physics than Madonna has on sex.
 The success of A Brief History indicates that there is widespread interest in the big questions like: Where did
 we come from? And why is the universe the way it is?
 I have taken the opportunity to update the book and include new theoretical and observational results obtained
 since the book was first published (on April Fools’ Day, 1988). I have included a new chapter on wormholes
 and time travel. Einstein’s General Theory of Relativity seems to offer the possibility that we could create and
 maintain wormholes, little tubes that connect different regions of space-time. If so, we might be able to use
 them for rapid travel around the galaxy or travel back in time. Of course, we have not seen anyone from the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/A Brief History in Time.html (1 of 2) [2/20/2001 3:13:58 AM]
 future (or have we?) but I discuss a possible explanation for this.
 I also describe the progress that has been made recently in finding “dualities” or correspondences between
 apparently different theories of physics. These correspondences are a strong indication that there is a complete
 unified theory of physics, but they also suggest that it may not be possible to express this theory in a single
 fundamental formulation. Instead, we may have to use different reflections of the underlying theory in different
 situations. It might be like our being unable to represent the surface of the earth on a single map and having to
 use different maps in different regions. This would be a revolution in our view of the unification of the laws of
 science but it would not change the most important point: that the universe is governed by a set of rational laws
 that we can discover and understand.
 On the observational side, by far the most important development has been the measurement of fluctuations in
 the cosmic microwave background radiation by COBE (the Cosmic Background Explorer satellite) and other
 collaborations. These fluctuations are the finger-prints of creation, tiny initial irregularities in the otherwise
 smooth and uniform early universe that later grew into galaxies, stars, and all the structures we see around us.
 Their form agrees with the predictions of the proposal that the universe has no boundaries or edges in the
 imaginary time direction; but further observations will be necessary to distinguish this proposal from other
 possible explanations for the fluctuations in the background. However, within a few years we should know
 whether we can believe that we live in a universe that is completely self-contained and without beginning or
 end.
 Stephen Hawking
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/A Brief History in Time.html (2 of 2) [2/20/2001 3:13:58 AM]
 CHAPTER 1
 OUR PICTURE OF THE UNIVERSE
 A well-known scientist (some say it was Bertrand Russell) once gave a public lecture on astronomy. He
 described how the earth orbits around the sun and how the sun, in turn, orbits around the center of a vast
 collection of stars called our galaxy. At the end of the lecture, a little old lady at the back of the room got up and
 said: “What you have told us is rubbish. The world is really a flat plate supported on the back of a giant
 tortoise.” The scientist gave a superior smile before replying, “What is the tortoise standing on.” “You’re very
 clever, young man, very clever,” said the old lady. “But it’s turtles all the way down!”
 Most people would find the picture of our universe as an infinite tower of tortoises rather ridiculous, but why do
 we think we know better? What do we know about the universe, and how do we know it? Where did the
 universe come from, and where is it going? Did the universe have a beginning, and if so, what happened before
 then? What is the nature of time? Will it ever come to an end? Can we go back in time? Recent breakthroughs
 in physics, made possible in part by fantastic new technologies, suggest answers to some of these
 longstanding questions. Someday these answers may seem as obvious to us as the earth orbiting the sun – or
 perhaps as ridiculous as a tower of tortoises. Only time (whatever that may be) will tell.
 As long ago as 340 BC the Greek philosopher Aristotle, in his book On the Heavens, was able to put forward
 two good arguments for believing that the earth was a round sphere rather than a Hat plate. First, he realized
 that eclipses of the moon were caused by the earth coming between the sun and the moon. The earth’s
 shadow on the moon was always round, which would be true only if the earth was spherical. If the earth had
 been a flat disk, the shadow would have been elongated and elliptical, unless the eclipse always occurred at a
 time when the sun was directly under the center of the disk. Second, the Greeks knew from their travels that
 the North Star appeared lower in the sky when viewed in the south than it did in more northerly regions. (Since
 the North Star lies over the North Pole, it appears to be directly above an observer at the North Pole, but to
 someone looking from the equator, it appears to lie just at the horizon. From the difference in the apparent
 position of the North Star in Egypt and Greece, Aristotle even quoted an estimate that the distance around the
 earth was 400,000 stadia. It is not known exactly what length a stadium was, but it may have been about 200
 yards, which would make Aristotle’s estimate about twice the currently accepted figure. The Greeks even had a
 third argument that the earth must be round, for why else does one first see the sails of a ship coming over the
 horizon, and only later see the hull?
 Aristotle thought the earth was stationary and that the sun, the moon, the planets, and the stars moved in
 circular orbits about the earth. He believed this because he felt, for mystical reasons, that the earth was the
 center of the universe, and that circular motion was the most perfect. This idea was elaborated by Ptolemy in
 the second century AD into a complete cosmological model. The earth stood at the center, surrounded by eight
 spheres that carried the moon, the sun, the stars, and the five planets known at the time, Mercury, Venus,
 Mars, Jupiter, and Saturn.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (1 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 Figure 1:1
 The planets themselves moved on smaller circles attached to their respective spheres in order to account for
 their rather complicated observed paths in the sky. The outermost sphere carried the so-called fixed stars,
 which always stay in the same positions relative to each other but which rotate together across the sky. What
 lay beyond the last sphere was never made very clear, but it certainly was not part of mankind’s observable
 universe.
 Ptolemy’s model provided a reasonably accurate system for predicting the positions of heavenly bodies in the
 sky. But in order to predict these positions correctly, Ptolemy had to make an assumption that the moon
 followed a path that sometimes brought it twice as close to the earth as at other times. And that meant that the
 moon ought sometimes to appear twice as big as at other times! Ptolemy recognized this flaw, but nevertheless
 his model was generally, although not universally, accepted. It was adopted by the Christian church as the
 picture of the universe that was in accordance with Scripture, for it had the great advantage that it left lots of
 room outside the sphere of fixed stars for heaven and hell.
 A simpler model, however, was proposed in 1514 by a Polish priest, Nicholas Copernicus. (At first, perhaps for
 fear of being branded a heretic by his church, Copernicus circulated his model anonymously.) His idea was that
 the sun was stationary at the center and that the earth and the planets moved in circular orbits around the sun.
 Nearly a century passed before this idea was taken seriously. Then two astronomers – the German, Johannes
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (2 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 Kepler, and the Italian, Galileo Galilei – started publicly to support the Copernican theory, despite the fact that
 the orbits it predicted did not quite match the ones observed. The death blow to the Aristotelian/Ptolemaic
 theory came in 1609. In that year, Galileo started observing the night sky with a telescope, which had just been
 invented. When he looked at the planet Jupiter, Galileo found that it was accompanied by several small
 satellites or moons that orbited around it. This implied that everything did not have to orbit directly around the
 earth, as Aristotle and Ptolemy had thought. (It was, of course, still possible to believe that the earth was
 stationary at the center of the universe and that the moons of Jupiter moved on extremely complicated paths
 around the earth, giving the appearance that they orbited Jupiter. However, Copernicus’s theory was much
 simpler.) At the same time, Johannes Kepler had modified Copernicus’s theory, suggesting that the planets
 moved not in circles but in ellipses (an ellipse is an elongated circle). The predictions now finally matched the
 observations.
 As far as Kepler was concerned, elliptical orbits were merely an ad hoc hypothesis, and a rather repugnant one
 at that, because ellipses were clearly less perfect than circles. Having discovered almost by accident that
 elliptical orbits fit the observations well, he could not reconcile them with his idea that the planets were made to
 orbit the sun by magnetic forces. An explanation was provided only much later, in 1687, when Sir Isaac Newton
 published his Philosophiae Naturalis Principia Mathematica, probably the most important single work ever
 published in the physical sciences. In it Newton not only put forward a theory of how bodies move in space and
 time, but he also developed the complicated mathematics needed to analyze those motions. In addition,
 Newton postulated a law of universal gravitation according to which each body in the universe was attracted
 toward every other body by a force that was stronger the more massive the bodies and the closer they were to
 each other. It was this same force that caused objects to fall to the ground. (The story that Newton was inspired
 by an apple hitting his head is almost certainly apocryphal. All Newton himself ever said was that the idea of
 gravity came to him as he sat “in a contemplative mood” and “was occasioned by the fall of an apple.”) Newton
 went on to show that, according to his law, gravity causes the moon to move in an elliptical orbit around the
 earth and causes the earth and the planets to follow elliptical paths around the sun.
 The Copernican model got rid of Ptolemy’s celestial spheres, and with them, the idea that the universe had a
 natural boundary. Since “fixed stars” did not appear to change their positions apart from a rotation across the
 sky caused by the earth spinning on its axis, it became natural to suppose that the fixed stars were objects like
 our sun but very much farther away.
 Newton realized that, according to his theory of gravity, the stars should attract each other, so it seemed they
 could not remain essentially motionless. Would they not all fall together at some point? In a letter in 1691 to
 Richard Bentley, another leading thinker of his day, Newton argued that this would indeed happen if there were
 only a finite number of stars distributed over a finite region of space. But he reasoned that if, on the other hand,
 there were an infinite number of stars, distributed more or less uniformly over infinite space, this would not
 happen, because there would not be any central point for them to fall to.
 This argument is an instance of the pitfalls that you can encounter in talking about infinity. In an infinite
 universe, every point can be regarded as the center, because every point has an infinite number of stars on
 each side of it. The correct approach, it was realized only much later, is to consider the finite situation, in which
 the stars all fall in on each other, and then to ask how things change if one adds more stars roughly uniformly
 distributed outside this region. According to Newton’s law, the extra stars would make no difference at all to the
 original ones on average, so the stars would fall in just as fast. We can add as many stars as we like, but they
 will still always collapse in on themselves. We now know it is impossible to have an infinite static model of the
 universe in which gravity is always attractive.
 It is an interesting reflection on the general climate of thought before the twentieth century that no one had
 suggested that the universe was expanding or contracting. It was generally accepted that either the universe
 had existed forever in an unchanging state, or that it had been created at a finite time in the past more or less
 as we observe it today. In part this may have been due to people’s tendency to believe in eternal truths, as well
 as the comfort they found in the thought that even though they may grow old and die, the universe is eternal
 and unchanging.
 Even those who realized that Newton’s theory of gravity showed that the universe could not be static did not
 think to suggest that it might be expanding. Instead, they attempted to modify the theory by making the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (3 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 gravitational force repulsive at very large distances. This did not significantly affect their predictions of the
 motions of the planets, but it allowed an infinite distribution of stars to remain in equilibrium – with the attractive
 forces between nearby stars balanced by the repulsive forces from those that were farther away. However, we
 now believe such an equilibrium would be unstable: if the stars in some region got only slightly nearer each
 other, the attractive forces between them would become stronger and dominate over the repulsive forces so
 that the stars would continue to fall toward each other. On the other hand, if the stars got a bit farther away
 from each other, the repulsive forces would dominate and drive them farther apart.
 Another objection to an infinite static universe is normally ascribed to the German philosopher Heinrich Olbers,
 who wrote about this theory in 1823. In fact, various contemporaries of Newton had raised the problem, and the
 Olbers article was not even the first to contain plausible arguments against it. It was, however, the first to be
 widely noted. The difficulty is that in an infinite static universe nearly every line of sight would end on the
 surface of a star. Thus one would expect that the whole sky would be as bright as the sun, even at night.
 Olbers’ counter-argument was that the light from distant stars would be dimmed by absorption by intervening
 matter. However, if that happened the intervening matter would eventually heat up until it glowed as brightly as
 the stars. The only way of avoiding the conclusion that the whole of the night sky should be as bright as the
 surface of the sun would be to assume that the stars had not been shining forever but had turned on at some
 finite time in the past. In that case the absorbing matter might not have heated up yet or the light from distant
 stars might not yet have reached us. And that brings us to the question of what could have caused the stars to
 have turned on in the first place.
 The beginning of the universe had, of course, been discussed long before this. According to a number of early
 cosmologies and the Jewish/Christian/Muslim tradition, the universe started at a finite, and not very distant,
 time in the past. One argument for such a beginning was the feeling that it was necessary to have “First Cause”
 to explain the existence of the universe. (Within the universe, you always explained one event as being caused
 by some earlier event, but the existence of the universe itself could be explained in this way only if it had some
 beginning.) Another argument was put forward by St. Augustine in his book The City of God. He pointed out
 that civilization is progressing and we remember who performed this deed or developed that technique. Thus
 man, and so also perhaps the universe, could not have been around all that long. St. Augustine accepted a
 date of about 5000 BC for the Creation of the universe according to the book of Genesis. (It is interesting that
 this is not so far from the end of the last Ice Age, about 10,000 BC, which is when archaeologists tell us that
 civilization really began.)
 Aristotle, and most of the other Greek philosophers, on the other hand, did not like the idea of a creation
 because it smacked too much of divine intervention. They believed, therefore, that the human race and the
 world around it had existed, and would exist, forever. The ancients had already considered the argument about
 progress described above, and answered it by saying that there had been periodic floods or other disasters that
 repeatedly set the human race right back to the beginning of civilization.
 The questions of whether the universe had a beginning in time and whether it is limited in space were later
 extensively examined by the philosopher Immanuel Kant in his monumental (and very obscure) work Critique of
 Pure Reason, published in 1781. He called these questions antinomies (that is, contradictions) of pure reason
 because he felt that there were equally compelling arguments for believing the thesis, that the universe had a
 beginning, and the antithesis, that it had existed forever. His argument for the thesis was that if the universe did
 not have a beginning, there would be an infinite period of time before any event, which he considered absurd.
 The argument for the antithesis was that if the universe had a beginning, there would be an infinite period of
 time before it, so why should the universe begin at any one particular time? In fact, his cases for both the thesis
 and the antithesis are really the same argument. They are both based on his unspoken assumption that time
 continues back forever, whether or not the universe had existed forever. As we shall see, the concept of time
 has no meaning before the beginning of the universe. This was first pointed out by St. Augustine. When asked:
 “What did God do before he created the universe?” Augustine didn’t reply: “He was preparing Hell for people
 who asked such questions.” Instead, he said that time was a property of the universe that God created, and
 that time did not exist before the beginning of the universe.
 When most people believed in an essentially static and unchanging universe, the question of whether or not it
 had a beginning was really one of metaphysics or theology. One could account for what was observed equally
 well on the theory that the universe had existed forever or on the theory that it was set in motion at some finite
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (4 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 time in such a manner as to look as though it had existed forever. But in 1929, Edwin Hubble made the
 landmark observation that wherever you look, distant galaxies are moving rapidly away from us. In other words,
 the universe is expanding. This means that at earlier times objects would have been closer together. In fact, it
 seemed that there was a time, about ten or twenty thousand million years ago, when they were all at exactly
 the same place and when, therefore, the density of the universe was infinite. This discovery finally brought the
 question of the beginning of the universe into the realm of science.
 Hubble’s observations suggested that there was a time, called the big bang, when the universe was
 infinitesimally small and infinitely dense. Under such conditions all the laws of science, and therefore all ability
 to predict the future, would break down. If there were events earlier than this time, then they could not affect
 what happens at the present time. Their existence can be ignored because it would have no observational
 consequences. One may say that time had a beginning at the big bang, in the sense that earlier times simply
 would not be defined. It should be emphasized that this beginning in time is very different from those that had
 been considered previously. In an unchanging universe a beginning in time is something that has to be
 imposed by some being outside the universe; there is no physical necessity for a beginning. One can imagine
 that God created the universe at literally any time in the past. On the other hand, if the universe is expanding,
 there may be physical reasons why there had to be a beginning. One could still imagine that God created the
 universe at the instant of the big bang, or even afterwards in just such a way as to make it look as though there
 had been a big bang, but it would be meaningless to suppose that it was created before the big bang. An
 expanding universe does not preclude a creator, but it does place limits on when he might have carried out his
 job!
 In order to talk about the nature of the universe and to discuss questions such as whether it has a beginning or
 an end, you have to be clear about what a scientific theory is. I shall take the simpleminded view that a theory
 is just a model of the universe, or a restricted part of it, and a set of rules that relate quantities in the model to
 observations that we make. It exists only in our minds and does not have any other reality (whatever that might
 mean). A theory is a good theory if it satisfies two requirements. It must accurately describe a large class of
 observations on the basis of a model that contains only a few arbitrary elements, and it must make definite
 predictions about the results of future observations. For example, Aristotle believed Empedocles’s theory that
 everything was made out of four elements, earth, air, fire, and water. This was simple enough, but did not make
 any definite predictions. On the other hand, Newton’s theory of gravity was based on an even simpler model, in
 which bodies attracted each other with a force that was proportional to a quantity called their mass and
 inversely proportional to the square of the distance between them. Yet it predicts the motions of the sun, the
 moon, and the planets to a high degree of accuracy.
 Any physical theory is always provisional, in the sense that it is only a hypothesis: you can never prove it. No
 matter how many times the results of experiments agree with some theory, you can never be sure that the next
 time the result will not contradict the theory. On the other hand, you can disprove a theory by finding even a
 single observation that disagrees with the predictions of the theory. As philosopher of science Karl Popper has
 emphasized, a good theory is characterized by the fact that it makes a number of predictions that could in
 principle be disproved or falsified by observation. Each time new experiments are observed to agree with the
 predictions the theory survives, and our confidence in it is increased; but if ever a new observation is found to
 disagree, we have to abandon or modify the theory.
 At least that is what is supposed to happen, but you can always question the competence of the person who
 carried out the observation.
 In practice, what often happens is that a new theory is devised that is really an extension of the previous theory.
 For example, very accurate observations of the planet Mercury revealed a small difference between its motion
 and the predictions of Newton’s theory of gravity. Einstein’s general theory of relativity predicted a slightly
 different motion from Newton’s theory. The fact that Einstein’s predictions matched what was seen, while
 Newton’s did not, was one of the crucial confirmations of the new theory. However, we still use Newton’s theory
 for all practical purposes because the difference between its predictions and those of general relativity is very
 small in the situations that we normally deal with. (Newton’s theory also has the great advantage that it is much
 simpler to work with than Einstein’s!)
 The eventual goal of science is to provide a single theory that describes the whole universe. However, the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (5 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 approach most scientists actually follow is to separate the problem into two parts. First, there are the laws that
 tell us how the universe changes with time. (If we know what the universe is like at any one time, these physical
 laws tell us how it will look at any later time.) Second, there is the question of the initial state of the universe.
 Some people feel that science should be concerned with only the first part; they regard the question of the
 initial situation as a matter for metaphysics or religion. They would say that God, being omnipotent, could have
 started the universe off any way he wanted. That may be so, but in that case he also could have made it
 develop in a completely arbitrary way. Yet it appears that he chose to make it evolve in a very regular way
 according to certain laws. It therefore seems equally reasonable to suppose that there are also laws governing
 the initial state.
 It turns out to be very difficult to devise a theory to describe the universe all in one go. Instead, we break the
 problem up into bits and invent a number of partial theories. Each of these partial theories describes and
 predicts a certain limited class of observations, neglecting the effects of other quantities, or representing them
 by simple sets of numbers. It may be that this approach is completely wrong. If everything in the universe
 depends on everything else in a fundamental way, it might be impossible to get close to a full solution by
 investigating parts of the problem in isolation. Nevertheless, it is certainly the way that we have made progress
 in the past. The classic example again is the Newtonian theory of gravity, which tells us that the gravitational
 force between two bodies depends only on one number associated with each body, its mass, but is otherwise
 independent of what the bodies are made of. Thus one does not need to have a theory of the structure and
 constitution of the sun and the planets in order to calculate their orbits.
 Today scientists describe the universe in terms of two basic partial theories – the general theory of relativity
 and quantum mechanics. They are the great intellectual achievements of the first half of this century. The
 general theory of relativity describes the force of gravity and the large-scale structure of the universe, that is,
 the structure on scales from only a few miles to as large as a million million million million (1 with twenty-four
 zeros after it) miles, the size of the observable universe. Quantum mechanics, on the other hand, deals with
 phenomena on extremely small scales, such as a millionth of a millionth of an inch. Unfortunately, however,
 these two theories are known to be inconsistent with each other – they cannot both be correct. One of the
 major endeavors in physics today, and the major theme of this book, is the search for a new theory that will
 incorporate them both – a quantum theory of gravity. We do not yet have such a theory, and we may still be a
 long way from having one, but we do already know many of the properties that it must have. And we shall see,
 in later chapters, that we already know a fair amount about the predications a quantum theory of gravity must
 make.
 Now, if you believe that the universe is not arbitrary, but is governed by definite laws, you ultimately have to
 combine the partial theories into a complete unified theory that will describe everything in the universe. But
 there is a fundamental paradox in the search for such a complete unified theory. The ideas about scientific
 theories outlined above assume we are rational beings who are free to observe the universe as we want and to
 draw logical deductions from what we see.
 In such a scheme it is reasonable to suppose that we might progress ever closer toward the laws that govern
 our universe. Yet if there really is a complete unified theory, it would also presumably determine our actions.
 And so the theory itself would determine the outcome of our search for it! And why should it determine that we
 come to the right conclusions from the evidence? Might it not equally well determine that we draw the wrong
 conclusion.? Or no conclusion at all?
 The only answer that I can give to this problem is based on Darwin’s principle of natural selection. The idea is
 that in any population of self-reproducing organisms, there will be variations in the genetic material and
 upbringing that different individuals have. These differences will mean that some individuals are better able
 than others to draw the right conclusions about the world around them and to act accordingly. These individuals
 will be more likely to survive and reproduce and so their pattern of behavior and thought will come to dominate.
 It has certainly been true in the past that what we call intelligence and scientific discovery have conveyed a
 survival advantage. It is not so clear that this is still the case: our scientific discoveries may well destroy us all,
 and even if they don’t, a complete unified theory may not make much difference to our chances of survival.
 However, provided the universe has evolved in a regular way, we might expect that the reasoning abilities that
 natural selection has given us would be valid also in our search for a complete unified theory, and so would not
 lead us to the wrong conclusions.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (6 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 Because the partial theories that we already have are sufficient to make accurate predictions in all but the most
 extreme situations, the search for the ultimate theory of the universe seems difficult to justify on practical
 grounds. (It is worth noting, though, that similar arguments could have been used against both relativity and
 quantum mechanics, and these theories have given us both nuclear energy and the microelectronics
 revolution!) The discovery of a complete unified theory, therefore, may not aid the survival of our species. It
 may not even affect our lifestyle. But ever since the dawn of civilization, people have not been content to see
 events as unconnected and inexplicable. They have craved an understanding of the underlying order in the
 world. Today we still yearn to know why we are here and where we came from. Humanity’s deepest desire for
 knowledge is justification enough for our continuing quest. And our goal is nothing less than a complete
 description of the universe we live in.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 1
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/n.html (7 of 7) [2/20/2001 3:14:06 AM]
 CHAPTER 2
 SPACE AND TIME
 Our present ideas about the motion of bodies date back to Galileo and Newton. Before them people believed
 Aristotle, who said that the natural state of a body was to be at rest and that it moved only if driven by a force or
 impulse. It followed that a heavy body should fall faster than a light one, because it would have a greater pull
 toward the earth.
 The Aristotelian tradition also held that one could work out all the laws that govern the universe by pure
 thought: it was not necessary to check by observation. So no one until Galileo bothered to see whether bodies
 of different weight did in fact fall at different speeds. It is said that Galileo demonstrated that Aristotle’s belief
 was false by dropping weights from the leaning tower of Pisa. The story is almost certainly untrue, but Galileo
 did do something equivalent: he rolled balls of different weights down a smooth slope. The situation is similar to
 that of heavy bodies falling vertically, but it is easier to observe because the Speeds are smaller. Galileo’s
 measurements indicated that each body increased its speed at the same rate, no matter what its weight. For
 example, if you let go of a ball on a slope that drops by one meter for every ten meters you go along, the ball
 will be traveling down the slope at a speed of about one meter per second after one second, two meters per
 second after two seconds, and so on, however heavy the ball. Of course a lead weight would fall faster than a
 feather, but that is only because a feather is slowed down by air resistance. If one drops two bodies that don’t
 have much air resistance, such as two different lead weights, they fall at the same rate. On the moon, where
 there is no air to slow things down, the astronaut David R. Scott performed the feather and lead weight
 experiment and found that indeed they did hit the ground at the same time.
 Galileo’s measurements were used by Newton as the basis of his laws of motion. In Galileo’s experiments, as a
 body rolled down the slope it was always acted on by the same force (its weight), and the effect was to make it
 constantly speed up. This showed that the real effect of a force is always to change the speed of a body, rather
 than just to set it moving, as was previously thought. It also meant that whenever a body is not acted on by any
 force, it will keep on moving in a straight line at the same speed. This idea was first stated explicitly in Newton’s
 Principia Mathematica, published in 1687, and is known as Newton’s first law. What happens to a body when a
 force does act on it is given by Newton’s second law. This states that the body will accelerate, or change its
 speed, at a rate that is proportional to the force. (For example, the acceleration is twice as great if the force is
 twice as great.) The acceleration is also smaller the greater the mass (or quantity of matter) of the body. (The
 same force acting on a body of twice the mass will produce half the acceleration.) A familiar example is
 provided by a car: the more powerful the engine, the greater the acceleration, but the heavier the car, the
 smaller the acceleration for the same engine. In addition to his laws of motion, Newton discovered a law to
 describe the force of gravity, which states that every body attracts every other body with a force that is
 proportional to the mass of each body. Thus the force between two bodies would be twice as strong if one of
 the bodies (say, body A) had its mass doubled. This is what you might expect because one could think of the
 new body A as being made of two bodies with the original mass. Each would attract body B with the original
 force. Thus the total force between A and B would be twice the original force. And if, say, one of the bodies had
 twice the mass, and the other had three times the mass, then the force would be six times as strong. One can
 now see why all bodies fall at the same rate: a body of twice the weight will have twice the force of gravity
 pulling it down, but it will also have twice the mass. According to Newton’s second law, these two effects will
 exactly cancel each other, so the acceleration will be the same in all cases.
 Newton’s law of gravity also tells us that the farther apart the bodies, the smaller the force. Newton’s law of
 gravity says that the gravitational attraction of a star is exactly one quarter that of a similar star at half the
 distance. This law predicts the orbits of the earth, the moon, and the planets with great accuracy. If the law
 were that the gravitational attraction of a star went down faster or increased more rapidly with distance, the
 orbits of the planets would not be elliptical, they would either spiral in to the sun or escape from the sun.
 The big difference between the ideas of Aristotle and those of Galileo and Newton is that Aristotle believed in a
 preferred state of rest, which any body would take up if it were not driven by some force Or impulse. In
 particular, he thought that the earth was at rest. But it follows from Newton’s laws that there is no unique
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (1 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:15 AM]
 standard of rest. One could equally well say that body A was at rest and body B was moving at constant speed
 with respect to body A, or that body B was at rest and body A was moving. For example, if one sets aside for a
 moment the rotation of the earth and its orbit round the sun, one could say that the earth was at rest and that a
 train on it was traveling north at ninety miles per hour or that the train was at rest and the earth was moving
 south at ninety miles per hour. If one carried out experiments with moving bodies on the train, all Newton’s laws
 would still hold. For instance, playing Ping-Pong on the train, one would find that the ball obeyed Newton’s laws
 just like a ball on a table by the track. So there is no way to tell whether it is the train or the earth that is moving.
 The lack of an absolute standard of rest meant that one could not determine whether two events that took place
 at different times occurred in the same position in space. For example, suppose our Ping-Pong ball on the train
 bounces straight up and down, hitting the table twice on the same spot one second apart. To someone on the
 track, the two bounces would seem to take place about forty meters apart, because the train would have
 traveled that far down the track between the bounces. The nonexistence of absolute rest therefore meant that
 one could not give an event an absolute position in space, as Aristotle had believed. The positions of events
 and the distances between them would be different for a person on the train and one on the track, and there
 would be no reason to prefer one person’s position to the other’s.
 Newton was very worried by this lack of absolute position, or absolute space, as it was called, because it did
 not accord with his idea of an absolute God. In fact, he refused to accept lack of absolute space, even though it
 was implied by his laws. He was severely criticized for this irrational belief by many people, most notably by
 Bishop Berkeley, a philosopher who believed that all material objects and space and time are an illusion. When
 the famous Dr. Johnson was told of Berkeley’s opinion, he cried, “I refute it thus!” and stubbed his toe on a
 large stone.
 Both Aristotle and Newton believed in absolute time. That is, they believed that one could unambiguously
 measure the interval of time between two events, and that this time would be the same whoever measured it,
 provided they used a good clock. Time was completely separate from and independent of space. This is what
 most people would take to be the commonsense view. However, we have had to change our ideas about space
 and time. Although our apparently commonsense notions work well when dealing with things like apples, or
 planets that travel comparatively slowly, they don’t work at all for things moving at or near the speed of light.
 The fact that light travels at a finite, but very high, speed was first discovered in 1676 by the Danish astronomer
 Ole Christensen Roemer. He observed that the times at which the moons of Jupiter appeared to pass behind
 Jupiter were not evenly spaced, as one would expect if the moons went round Jupiter at a constant rate. As the
 earth and Jupiter orbit around the sun, the distance between them varies. Roemer noticed that eclipses of
 Jupiter’s moons appeared later the farther we were from Jupiter. He argued that this was because the light from
 the moons took longer to reach us when we were farther away. His measurements of the variations in the
 distance of the earth from Jupiter were, however, not very accurate, and so his value for the speed of light was
 140,000 miles per second, compared to the modern value of 186,000 miles per second. Nevertheless,
 Roemer’s achievement, in not only proving that light travels at a finite speed, but also in measuring that speed,
 was remarkable – coming as it did eleven years before Newton’s publication of Principia Mathematica. A proper
 theory of the propagation of light didn’t come until 1865, when the British physicist James Clerk Maxwell
 succeeded in unifying the partial theories that up to then had been used to describe the forces of electricity and
 magnetism. Maxwell’s equations predicted that there could be wavelike disturbances in the combined
 electromagnetic field, and that these would travel at a fixed speed, like ripples on a pond. If the wavelength of
 these waves (the distance between one wave crest and the next) is a meter or more, they are what we now call
 radio waves. Shorter wavelengths are known as microwaves (a few centimeters) or infrared (more than a
 ten-thousandth of a centimeter). Visible light has a wavelength of between only forty and eighty millionths of a
 centimeter. Even shorter wavelengths are known as ultraviolet, X rays, and gamma rays.
 Maxwell’s theory predicted that radio or light waves should travel at a certain fixed speed. But Newton’s theory
 had got rid of the idea of absolute rest, so if light was supposed to travel at a fixed speed, one would have to
 say what that fixed speed was to be measured relative to.
 It was therefore suggested that there was a substance called the "ether" that was present everywhere, even in
 "empty" space. Light waves should travel through the ether as sound waves travel through air, and their speed
 should therefore be relative to the ether. Different observers, moving relative to the ether, would see light
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (2 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:15 AM]
 coming toward them at different speeds, but light's speed relative to the ether would remain fixed. In particular,
 as the earth was moving through the ether on its orbit round the sun, the speed of light measured in the
 direction of the earth's motion through the ether (when we were moving toward the source of the light) should
 be higher than the speed of light at right angles to that motion (when we are not moving toward the source). In
 1887Albert Michelson (who later became the first American to receive the Nobel Prize for physics) and Edward
 Morley carried out a very careful experiment at the Case School of Applied Science in Cleveland. They
 compared the speed of light in the direction of the earth's motion with that at right angles to the earth's motion.
 To their great surprise, they found they were exactly the same!
 Between 1887 and 1905 there were several attempts, most notably by the Dutch physicist Hendrik Lorentz, to
 explain the result of the Michelson-Morley experiment in terms of objects contracting and clocks slowing down
 when they moved through the ether. However, in a famous paper in 1905, a hitherto unknown clerk in the
 Swiss patent office, Albert Einstein, pointed out that the whole idea of an ether was unnecessary, providing one
 was willing to abandon the idea of absolute time. A similar point was made a few weeks later by a leading
 French mathematician, Henri Poincare. Einstein’s arguments were closer to physics than those of Poincare,
 who regarded this problem as mathematical. Einstein is usually given the credit for the new theory, but
 Poincare is remembered by having his name attached to an important part of it.
 The fundamental postulate of the theory of relativity, as it was called, was that the laws of science should be
 the same for all freely moving observers, no matter what their speed. This was true for Newton’s laws of
 motion, but now the idea was extended to include Maxwell’s theory and the speed of light: all observers should
 measure the same speed of light, no matter how fast they are moving. This simple idea has some remarkable
 consequences. Perhaps the best known are the equivalence of mass and energy, summed up in Einstein’s
 famous equation E=mc2 (where E is energy, m is mass, and c is the speed of light), and the law that nothing
 may travel faster than the speed of light. Because of the equivalence of energy and mass, the energy which an
 object has due to its motion will add to its mass. In other words, it will make it harder to increase its speed. This
 effect is only really significant for objects moving at speeds close to the speed of light. For example, at 10
 percent of the speed of light an object’s mass is only 0.5 percent more than normal, while at 90 percent of the
 speed of light it would be more than twice its normal mass. As an object approaches the speed of light, its mass
 rises ever more quickly, so it takes more and more energy to speed it up further. It can in fact never reach the
 speed of light, because by then its mass would have become infinite, and by the equivalence of mass and
 energy, it would have taken an infinite amount of energy to get it there. For this reason, any normal object is
 forever confined by relativity to move at speeds slower than the speed of light. Only light, or other waves that
 have no intrinsic mass, can move at the speed of light.
 An equally remarkable consequence of relativity is the way it has revolutionized our ideas of space and time. In
 Newton’s theory, if a pulse of light is sent from one place to another, different observers would agree on the
 time that the journey took (since time is absolute), but will not always agree on how far the light traveled (since
 space is not absolute). Since the speed of the light is just the distance it has traveled divided by the time it has
 taken, different observers would measure different speeds for the light. In relativity, on the other hand, all
 observers must agree on how fast light travels. They still, however, do not agree on the distance the light has
 traveled, so they must therefore now also disagree over the time it has taken. (The time taken is the distance
 the light has traveled – which the observers do not agree on – divided by the light’s speed – which they do
 agree on.) In other words, the theory of relativity put an end to the idea of absolute time! It appeared that each
 observer must have his own measure of time, as recorded by a clock carried with him, and that identical clocks
 carried by different observers would not necessarily agree.
 Each observer could use radar to say where and when an event took place by sending out a pulse of light or
 radio waves. Part of the pulse is reflected back at the event and the observer measures the time at which he
 receives the echo. The time of the event is then said to be the time halfway between when the pulse was sent
 and the time when the reflection was received back: the distance of the event is half the time taken for this
 round trip, multiplied by the speed of light. (An event, in this sense, is something that takes place at a single
 point in space, at a specified point in time.) This idea is shown here, which is an example of a space-time
 diagram...
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (3 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:1
 Using this procedure, observers who are moving relative to each other will assign different times and positions
 to the same event. No particular observer’s measurements are any more correct than any other observer’s, but
 all the measurements are related. Any observer can work out precisely what time and position any other
 observer will assign to an event, provided he knows the other observer’s relative velocity.
 Nowadays we use just this method to measure distances precisely, because we can measure time more
 accurately than length. In effect, the meter is defined to be the distance traveled by light in
 0.000000003335640952 second, as measured by a cesium clock. (The reason for that particular number is that
 it corresponds to the historical definition of the meter – in terms of two marks on a particular platinum bar kept
 in Paris.) Equally, we can use a more convenient, new unit of length called a light-second. This is simply
 defined as the distance that light travels in one second. In the theory of relativity, we now define distance in
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (4 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 terms of time and the speed of light, so it follows automatically that every observer will measure light to have
 the same speed (by definition, 1 meter per 0.000000003335640952 second). There is no need to introduce the
 idea of an ether, whose presence anyway cannot be detected, as the Michelson-Morley experiment showed.
 The theory of relativity does, however, force us to change fundamentally our ideas of space and time. We must
 accept that time is not completely separate from and independent of space, but is combined with it to form an
 object called space-time.
 It is a matter of common experience that one can describe the position of a point in space by three numbers, or
 coordinates. For instance, one can say that a point in a room is seven feet from one wall, three feet from
 another, and five feet above the floor. Or one could specify that a point was at a certain latitude and longitude
 and a certain height above sea level. One is free to use any three suitable coordinates, although they have only
 a limited range of validity. One would not specify the position of the moon in terms of miles north and miles
 west of Piccadilly Circus and feet above sea level. Instead, one might describe it in terms of distance from the
 sun, distance from the plane of the orbits of the planets, and the angle between the line joining the moon to the
 sun and the line joining the sun to a nearby star such as Alpha Centauri. Even these coordinates would not be
 of much use in describing the position of the sun in our galaxy or the position of our galaxy in the local group of
 galaxies. In fact, one may describe the whole universe in terms of a collection of overlapping patches. In each
 patch, one can use a different set of three coordinates to specify the position of a point.
 An event is something that happens at a particular point in space and at a particular time. So one can specify it
 by four numbers or coordinates. Again, the choice of coordinates is arbitrary; one can use any three
 well-defined spatial coordinates and any measure of time. In relativity, there is no real distinction between the
 space and time coordinates, just as there is no real difference between any two space coordinates. One could
 choose a new set of coordinates in which, say, the first space coordinate was a combination of the old first and
 second space coordinates. For instance, instead of measuring the position of a point on the earth in miles north
 of Piccadilly and miles west of Piccadilly, one could use miles northeast of Piccadilly, and miles north-west of
 Piccadilly. Similarly, in relativity, one could use a new time coordinate that was the old time (in seconds) plus
 the distance (in light-seconds) north of Piccadilly.
 It is often helpful to think of the four coordinates of an event as specifying its position in a four-dimensional
 space called space-time. It is impossible to imagine a four-dimensional space. I personally find it hard enough
 to visualize three-dimensional space! However, it is easy to draw diagrams of two-dimensional spaces, such as
 the surface of the earth. (The surface of the earth is two-dimensional because the position of a point can be
 specified by two coordinates, latitude and longitude.) I shall generally use diagrams in which time increases
 upward and one of the spatial dimensions is shown horizontally. The other two spatial dimensions are ignored
 or, sometimes, one of them is indicated by perspective. (These are called space-time diagrams, like Figure
 2:1.)
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (5 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:2
 For example, in Figure 2:2 time is measured upward in years and the distance along the line from the sun to
 Alpha Centauri is measured horizontally in miles. The paths of the sun and of Alpha Centauri through
 space-time are shown as the vertical lines on the left and right of the diagram. A ray of light from the sun
 follows the diagonal line, and takes four years to get from the sun to Alpha Centauri.
 As we have seen, Maxwell’s equations predicted that the speed of light should be the same whatever the
 speed of the source, and this has been confirmed by accurate measurements. It follows from this that if a pulse
 of light is emitted at a particular time at a particular point in space, then as time goes on it will spread out as a
 sphere of light whose size and position are independent of the speed of the source. After one millionth of a
 second the light will have spread out to form a sphere with a radius of 300 meters; after two millionths of a
 second, the radius will be 600 meters; and so on. It will be like the ripples that spread out on the surface of a
 pond when a stone is thrown in. The ripples spread out as a circle that gets bigger as time goes on. If one
 stacks snapshots of the ripples at different times one above the other, the expanding circle of ripples will mark
 out a cone whose tip is at the place and time at which the stone hit the water Figure 2:3.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (6 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:3
 Similarly, the light spreading out from an event forms a (three-dimensional) cone in (the four-dimensional)
 space-time. This cone is called the future light cone of the event. In the same way we can draw another cone,
 called the past light cone, which is the set of events from which a pulse of light is able to reach the given event
 Figure 2:4.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (7 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:4
 Given an event P, one can divide the other events in the universe into three classes. Those events that can be
 reached from the event P by a particle or wave traveling at or below the speed of light are said to be in the
 future of P. They will lie within or on the expanding sphere of light emitted from the event P. Thus they will lie
 within or on the future light cone of P in the space-time diagram. Only events in the future of P can be affected
 by what happens at P because nothing can travel faster than light.
 Similarly, the past of P can be defined as the set of all events from which it is possible to reach the event P
 traveling at or below the speed of light. It is thus the set of events that can affect what happens at P. The
 events that do not lie in the future or past of P are said to lie in the elsewhere of P Figure 2:5.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (8 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:5
 What happens at such events can neither affect nor be affected by what happens at P. For example, if the sun
 were to cease to shine at this very moment, it would not affect things on earth at the present time because they
 would be in the elsewhere of the event when the sun went out Figure 2:6.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (9 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 Figure 2:6
 We would know about it only after eight minutes, the time it takes light to reach us from the sun. Only then
 would events on earth lie in the future light cone of the event at which the sun went out. Similarly, we do not
 know what is happening at the moment farther away in the universe: the light that we see from distant galaxies
 left them millions of years ago, and in the case of the most distant object that we have seen, the light left some
 eight thousand million years ago. Thus, when we look at the universe, we are seeing it as it was in the past.
 If one neglects gravitational effects, as Einstein and Poincare did in 1905, one has what is called the special
 theory of relativity. For every event in space-time we may construct a light cone (the set of all possible paths of
 light in space-time emitted at that event), and since the speed of light is the same at every event and in every
 direction, all the light cones will be identical and will all point in the same direction. The theory also tells us that
 nothing can travel faster than light. This means that the path of any object through space and time must be
 represented by a line that lies within the light cone at each event on it (Fig. 2.7). The special theory of relativity
 was very successful in explaining that the speed of light appears the same to all observers (as shown by the
 Michelson-Morley experiment) and in describing what happens when things move at speeds close to the speed
 of light. However, it was inconsistent with the Newtonian theory of gravity, which said that objects attracted
 each other with a force that depended on the distance between them. This meant that if one moved one of the
 objects, the force on the other one would change instantaneously. Or in other gravitational effects should travel
 with infinite velocity, instead of at or below the speed of light, as the special theory of relativity required.
 Einstein made a number of unsuccessful attempts between 1908 and 1914 to find a theory of gravity that was
 consistent with special relativity. Finally, in 1915, he proposed what we now call the general theory of relativity.
 Einstein made the revolutionary suggestion that gravity is not a force like other forces, but is a consequence of
 the fact that space-time is not flat, as had been previously assumed: it is curved, or “warped,” by the distribution
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (10 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 of mass and energy in it. Bodies like the earth are not made to move on curved orbits by a force called gravity;
 instead, they follow the nearest thing to a straight path in a curved space, which is called a geodesic. A
 geodesic is the shortest (or longest) path between two nearby points. For example, the surface of the earth is a
 two-dimensional curved space. A geodesic on the earth is called a great circle, and is the shortest route
 between two points (Fig. 2.8). As the geodesic is the shortest path between any two airports, this is the route
 an airline navigator will tell the pilot to fly along. In general relativity, bodies always follow straight lines in
 four-dimensional space-time, but they nevertheless appear to us to move along curved paths in our
 three-dimensional space. (This is rather like watching an airplane flying over hilly ground. Although it follows a
 straight line in three-dimensional space, its shadow follows a curved path on the two-dimensional ground.)
 The mass of the sun curves space-time in such a way that although the earth follows a straight path in
 four-dimensional space-time, it appears to us to move along a circular orbit in three-dimensional space.
 Fact, the orbits of the planets predicted by general relativity are almost exactly the same as those predicted by
 the Newtonian theory of gravity. However, in the case of Mercury, which, being the nearest planet to the sun,
 feels the strongest gravitational effects, and has a rather elongated orbit, general relativity predicts that the long
 axis of the ellipse should rotate about the sun at a rate of about one degree in ten thousand years. Small
 though this effect is, it had been noticed before 1915 and served as one of the first confirmations of Einstein’s
 theory. In recent years the even smaller deviations of the orbits of the other planets from the Newtonian
 predictions have been measured by radar and found to agree with the predictions of general relativity.
 Light rays too must follow geodesics in space-time. Again, the fact that space is curved means that light no
 longer appears to travel in straight lines in space. So general relativity predicts that light should be bent by
 gravitational fields. For example, the theory predicts that the light cones of points near the sun would be slightly
 bent inward, on account of the mass of the sun. This means that light from a distant star that happened to pass
 near the sun would be deflected through a small angle, causing the star to appear in a different position to an
 observer on the earth (Fig. 2.9). Of course, if the light from the star always passed close to the sun, we would
 not be able to tell whether the light was being deflected or if instead the star was really where we see it.
 However, as the earth orbits around the sun, different stars appear to pass behind the sun and have their light
 deflected. They therefore change their apparent position relative to other stars. It is normally very difficult to see
 this effect, because the light from the sun makes it impossible to observe stars that appear near to the sun the
 sky. However, it is possible to do so during an eclipse of the sun, when the sun’s light is blocked out by the
 moon. Einstein’s prediction of light deflection could not be tested immediately in 1915, because the First World
 War was in progress, and it was not until 1919 that a British expedition, observing an eclipse from West Africa,
 showed that light was indeed deflected by the sun, just as predicted by the theory. This proof of a German
 theory by British scientists was hailed as a great act of reconciliation between the two countries after the war. It
 is ionic, therefore, that later examination of the photographs taken on that expedition showed the errors were as
 great as the effect they were trying to measure. Their measurement had been sheer luck, or a case of knowing
 the result they wanted to get, not an uncommon occurrence in science. The light deflection has, however, been
 accurately confirmed by a number of later observations.
 Another prediction of general relativity is that time should appear to slower near a massive body like the earth.
 This is because there is a relation between the energy of light and its frequency (that is, the number of waves of
 light per second): the greater the energy, the higher frequency. As light travels upward in the earth’s
 gravitational field, it loses energy, and so its frequency goes down. (This means that the length of time between
 one wave crest and the next goes up.) To someone high up, it would appear that everything down below was
 making longer to happen. This prediction was tested in 1962, using a pair of very accurate clocks mounted at
 the top and bottom of a water tower. The clock at the bottom, which was nearer the earth, was found to run
 slower, in exact agreement with general relativity. The difference in the speed of clocks at different heights
 above the earth is now of considerable practical importance, with the advent of very accurate navigation
 systems based on signals from satellites. If one ignored the predictions of general relativity, the position that
 one calculated would be wrong by several miles!
 Newton’s laws of motion put an end to the idea of absolute position in space. The theory of relativity gets rid of
 absolute time. Consider a pair of twins. Suppose that one twin goes to live on the top of a mountain while the
 other stays at sea level. The first twin would age faster than the second. Thus, if they met again, one would be
 older than the other. In this case, the difference in ages would be very small, but it would be much larger if one
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (11 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 of the twins went for a long trip in a spaceship at nearly the speed of light. When he returned, he would be
 much younger than the one who stayed on earth. This is known as the twins paradox, but it is a paradox only if
 one has the idea of absolute time at the back of one’s mind. In the theory of relativity there is no unique
 absolute time, but instead each individual has his own personal measure of time that depends on where he is
 and how he is moving.
 Before 1915, space and time were thought of as a fixed arena in which events took place, but which was not
 affected by what happened in it. This was true even of the special theory of relativity. Bodies moved, forces
 attracted and repelled, but time and space simply continued, unaffected. It was natural to think that space and
 time went on forever.
 The situation, however, is quite different in the general theory of relativity. Space and time are now dynamic
 quantities: when a body moves, or a force acts, it affects the curvature of space and time – and in turn the
 structure of space-time affects the way in which bodies move and forces act. Space and time not only affect but
 also are affected by everything that happens in the universe. Just as one cannot talk about events in the
 universe without the notions of space and time, so in general relativity it became meaningless to talk about
 space and time outside the limits of the universe.
 In the following decades this new understanding of space and time was to revolutionize our view of the
 universe. The old idea of an essentially unchanging universe that could have existed, and could continue to
 exist, forever was replaced by the notion of a dynamic, expanding universe that seemed to have begun a finite
 time ago, and that might end at a finite time in the future. That revolution forms the subject of the next chapter.
 And years later, it was also to be the starting point for my work in theoretical physics. Roger Penrose and I
 showed that Einstein’s general theory of relativity implied that the universe must have a beginning and,
 possibly, an end.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 2
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/a.html (12 of 12) [2/20/2001 3:14:16 AM]
 CHAPTER 3
 THE EXPANDING UNIVERSE
 If one looks at the sky on a clear, moonless night, the brightest objects one sees are likely to be the planets
 Venus, Mars, Jupiter, and Saturn. There will also be a very large number of stars, which are just like our own
 sun but much farther from us. Some of these fixed stars do, in fact, appear to change very slightly their
 positions relative to each other as earth orbits around the sun: they are not really fixed at all! This is because
 they are comparatively near to us. As the earth goes round the sun, we see them from different positions
 against the background of more distant stars. This is fortunate, because it enables us to measure directly the
 distance of these stars from us: the nearer they are, the more they appear to move. The nearest star, called
 Proxima Centauri, is found to be about four light-years away (the light from it takes about four years to reach
 earth), or about twenty-three million million miles. Most of the other stars that are visible to the naked eye lie
 within a few hundred light-years of us. Our sun, for comparison, is a mere light-minutes away! The visible stars
 appear spread all over the night sky, but are particularly concentrated in one band, which we call the Milky
 Way. As long ago as 1750, some astronomers were suggesting that the appearance of the Milky Way could be
 explained if most of the visible stars lie in a single disklike configuration, one example of what we now call a
 spiral galaxy. Only a few decades later, the astronomer Sir William Herschel confirmed this idea by
 painstakingly cataloging the positions and distances of vast numbers of stars. Even so, the idea gained
 complete acceptance only early this century.
 Our modern picture of the universe dates back to only 1924, when the American astronomer Edwin Hubble
 demonstrated that ours was not the only galaxy. There were in fact many others, with vast tracts of empty
 space between them. In order to prove this, he needed to determine the distances to these other galaxies,
 which are so far away that, unlike nearby stars, they really do appear fixed. Hubble was forced, therefore, to
 use indirect methods to measure the distances. Now, the apparent brightness of a star depends on two factors:
 how much light it radiates (its luminosity), and how far it is from us. For nearby stars, we can measure their
 apparent brightness and their distance, and so we can work out their luminosity. Conversely, if we knew the
 luminosity of stars in other galaxies, we could work out their distance by measuring their apparent brightness.
 Hubble noted that certain types of stars always have the same luminosity when they are near enough for us to
 measure; therefore, he argued, if we found such stars in another galaxy, we could assume that they had the
 same luminosity – and so calculate the distance to that galaxy. If we could do this for a number of stars in the
 same galaxy, and our calculations always gave the same distance, we could be fairly confident of our estimate.
 In this way, Edwin Hubble worked out the distances to nine different galaxies. We now know that our galaxy is
 only one of some hundred thousand million that can be seen using modern telescopes, each galaxy itself
 containing some hundred thousand million stars. Figure 3:1 shows a picture of one spiral galaxy that is similar
 to what we think ours must look like to someone living in another galaxy.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (1 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 Figure 3:1
 We live in a galaxy that is about one hundred thousand light-years across and is slowly rotating; the stars in its
 spiral arms orbit around its center about once every several hundred million years. Our sun is just an ordinary,
 average-sized, yellow star, near the inner edge of one of the spiral arms. We have certainly come a long way
 since Aristotle and Ptolemy, when thought that the earth was the center of the universe!
 Stars are so far away that they appear to us to be just pinpoints of light. We cannot see their size or shape. So
 how can we tell different types of stars apart? For the vast majority of stars, there is only one characteristic
 feature that we can observe – the color of their light. Newton discovered that if light from the sun passes
 through a triangular-shaped piece of glass, called a prism, it breaks up into its component colors (its spectrum)
 as in a rainbow. By focusing a telescope on an individual star or galaxy, one can similarly observe the spectrum
 of the light from that star or galaxy. Different stars have different spectra, but the relative brightness of the
 different colors is always exactly what one would expect to find in the light emitted by an object that is glowing
 red hot. (In fact, the light emitted by any opaque object that is glowing red hot has a characteristic spectrum
 that depends only on its temperature – a thermal spectrum. This means that we can tell a star’s temperature
 from the spectrum of its light.) Moreover, we find that certain very specific colors are missing from stars’
 spectra, and these missing colors may vary from star to star. Since we know that each chemical element
 absorbs a characteristic set of very specific colors, by matching these to those that are missing from a star’s
 spectrum, we can determine exactly which elements are present in the star’s atmosphere.
 In the 1920s, when astronomers began to look at the spectra of stars in other galaxies, they found something
 most peculiar: there were the same characteristic sets of missing colors as for stars in our own galaxy, but they
 were all shifted by the same relative amount toward the red end of the spectrum. To understand the
 implications of this, we must first understand the Doppler effect. As we have seen, visible light consists of
 fluctuations, or waves, in the electromagnetic field. The wavelength (or distance from one wave crest to the
 next) of light is extremely small, ranging from four to seven ten-millionths of a meter. The different wavelengths
 of light are what the human eye sees as different colors, with the longest wavelengths appearing at the red end
 of the spectrum and the shortest wavelengths at the blue end. Now imagine a source of light at a constant
 distance from us, such as a star, emitting waves of light at a constant wavelength. Obviously the wavelength of
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (2 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 the waves we receive will be the same as the wavelength at which they are emitted (the gravitational field of the
 galaxy will not be large enough to have a significant effect). Suppose now that the source starts moving toward
 us. When the source emits the next wave crest it will be nearer to us, so the distance between wave crests will
 be smaller than when the star was stationary. This means that the wavelength of the waves we receive is
 shorter than when the star was stationary. Correspondingly, if the source is moving away from us, the
 wavelength of the waves we receive will be longer. In the case of light, therefore, means that stars moving
 away from us will have their spectra shifted toward the red end of the spectrum (red-shifted) and those moving
 toward us will have their spectra blue-shifted. This relationship between wavelength and speed, which is called
 the Doppler effect, is an everyday experience. Listen to a car passing on the road: as the car is approaching, its
 engine sounds at a higher pitch (corresponding to a shorter wavelength and higher frequency of sound waves),
 and when it passes and goes away, it sounds at a lower pitch. The behavior of light or radio waves is similar.
 Indeed, the police make use of the Doppler effect to measure the speed of cars by measuring the wavelength
 of pulses of radio waves reflected off them.
 ln the years following his proof of the existence of other galaxies, Rubble spent his time cataloging their
 distances and observing their spectra. At that time most people expected the galaxies to be moving around
 quite randomly, and so expected to find as many blue-shifted spectra as red-shifted ones. It was quite a
 surprise, therefore, to find that most galaxies appeared red-shifted: nearly all were moving away from us! More
 surprising still was the finding that Hubble published in 1929: even the size of a galaxy’s red shift is not random,
 but is directly proportional to the galaxy’s distance from us. Or, in other words, the farther a galaxy is, the faster
 it is moving away! And that meant that the universe could not be static, as everyone previously had thought, is
 in fact expanding; the distance between the different galaxies is changing all the time.
 The discovery that the universe is expanding was one of the great intellectual revolutions of the twentieth
 century. With hindsight, it is easy wonder why no one had thought of it before. Newton, and others should have
 realized that a static universe would soon start to contract under the influence of gravity. But suppose instead
 that the universe is expanding. If it was expanding fairly slowly, the force of gravity would cause it eventually to
 stop expanding and then to start contracting. However, if it was expanding at more than a certain critical rate,
 gravity would never be strong enough to stop it, and the universe would continue to expand forever. This is a bit
 like what happens when one fires a rocket upward from the surface of the earth. If it has a fairly low speed,
 gravity will eventually stop the rocket and it will start falling back. On the other hand, if the rocket has more than
 a certain critical speed (about seven miles per second), gravity will not be strong enough to pull it back, so it will
 keep going away from the earth forever. This behavior of the universe could have been predicted from
 Newton’s theory of gravity at any time in the nineteenth, the eighteenth, or even the late seventeenth century.
 Yet so strong was the belief in a static universe that it persisted into the early twentieth century. Even Einstein,
 when he formulated the general theory of relativity in 1915, was so sure that the universe had to be static that
 he modified his theory to make this possible, introducing a so-called cosmological constant into his equations.
 Einstein introduced a new “antigravity” force, which, unlike other forces, did not come from any particular
 source but was built into the very fabric of space-time. He claimed that space-time had an inbuilt tendency to
 expand, and this could be made to balance exactly the attraction of all the matter in the universe, so that a
 static universe would result. Only one man, it seems, was willing to take general relativity at face value, and
 while Einstein and other physicists were looking for ways of avoiding general relativity’s prediction of a
 nonstatic universe, the Russian physicist and mathematician Alexander Friedmann instead set about explaining
 it.
 Friedmann made two very simple assumptions about the universe: that the universe looks identical in
 whichever direction we look, and that this would also be true if we were observing the universe from anywhere
 else. From these two ideas alone, Friedmann showed that we should not expect the universe to be static. In
 fact, in 1922, several years before Edwin Hubble’s discovery, Friedmann predicted exactly what Hubble found!
 The assumption that the universe looks the same in every direction is clearly not true in reality. For example, as
 we have seen, the other stars in our galaxy form a distinct band of light across the night sky, called the Milky
 Way. But if we look at distant galaxies, there seems to be more or less the same number of them. So the
 universe does seem to be roughly the same in every direction, provided one views it on a large scale compared
 to the distance between galaxies, and ignores the differences on small scales. For a long time, this was
 sufficient justification for Friedmann’s assumption – as a rough approximation to the real universe. But more
 recently a lucky accident uncovered the fact that Friedmann’s assumption is in fact a remarkably accurate
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (3 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 description of our universe.
 In 1965 two American physicists at the Bell Telephone Laboratories in New Jersey, Arno Penzias and Robert
 Wilson, were testing a very sensitive microwave detector. (Microwaves are just like light waves, but with a
 wavelength of around a centimeter.) Penzias and Wilson were worried when they found that their detector was
 picking up more noise than it ought to. The noise did not appear to be coming from any particular direction.
 First they discovered bird droppings in their detector and checked for other possible malfunctions, but soon
 ruled these out. They knew that any noise from within the atmosphere would be stronger when the detector
 was not pointing straight up than when it was, because light rays travel through much more atmosphere when
 received from near the horizon than when received from directly overhead. The extra noise was the same
 whichever direction the detector was pointed, so it must come from outside the atmosphere. It was also the
 same day and night and throughout the year, even though the earth was rotating on its axis and orbiting around
 the sun. This showed that the radiation must come from beyond the Solar System, and even from beyond the
 galaxy, as otherwise it would vary as the movement of earth pointed the detector in different directions.
 In fact, we know that the radiation must have traveled to us across most of the observable universe, and since
 it appears to be the same in different directions, the universe must also be the same in every direction, if only
 on a large scale. We now know that whichever direction we look, this noise never varies by more than a tiny
 fraction: so Penzias and Wilson had unwittingly stumbled across a remarkably accurate confirmation of
 Friedmann’s first assumption. However, because the universe is not exactly the same in every direction, but
 only on average on a large scale, the microwaves cannot be exactly the same in every direction either. There
 have to be slight variations between different directions. These were first detected in 1992 by the Cosmic
 Background Explorer satellite, or COBE, at a level of about one part in a hundred thousand. Small though these
 variations are, they are very important, as will be explained in Chapter 8.
 At roughly the same time as Penzias and Wilson were investigating noise in their detector, two American
 physicists at nearby Princeton University, Bob Dicke and Jim Peebles, were also taking an interest in
 microwaves. They were working on a suggestion, made by George Gamow (once a student of Alexander
 Friedmann), that the early universe should have been very hot and dense, glowing white hot. Dicke and
 Peebles argued that we should still be able to see the glow of the early universe, because light from very
 distant parts of it would only just be reaching us now. However, the expansion of the universe meant that this
 light should be so greatly red-shifted that it would appear to us now as microwave radiation. Dicke and Peebles
 were preparing to look for this radiation when Penzias and Wilson heard about their work and realized that they
 had already found it. For this, Penzias and Wilson were awarded the Nobel Prize in 1978 (which seems a bit
 hard on Dicke and Peebles, not to mention Gamow!).
 Now at first sight, all this evidence that the universe looks the same whichever direction we look in might seem
 to suggest there is something special about our place in the universe. In particular, it might seem that if we
 observe all other galaxies to be moving away from us, then we must be at the center of the universe. There is,
 however, an alternate explanation: the universe might look the same in every direction as seen from any other
 galaxy too. This, as we have seen, was Friedmann’s second assumption. We have no scientific evidence for, or
 against, this assumption. We believe it only on grounds of modesty: it would be most remarkable if the universe
 looked the same in every direction around us, but not around other points in the universe! In Friedmann’s
 model, all the galaxies are moving directly away from each other. The situation is rather like a balloon with a
 number of spots painted on it being steadily blown up. As the balloon expands, the distance between any two
 spots increases, but there is no spot that can be said to be the center of the expansion. Moreover, the farther
 apart the spots are, the faster they will be moving apart. Similarly, in Friedmann’s model the speed at which any
 two galaxies are moving apart is proportional to the distance between them. So it predicted that the red shift of
 a galaxy should be directly proportional to its distance from us, exactly as Hubble found. Despite the success of
 his model and his prediction of Hubble’s observations, Friedmann’s work remained largely unknown in the West
 until similar models were discovered in 1935 by the American physicist Howard Robertson and the British
 mathematician Arthur Walker, in response to Hubble’s discovery of the uniform expansion of the universe.
 Although Friedmann found only one, there are in fact three different kinds of models that obey Friedmann’s two
 fundamental assumptions. In the first kind (which Friedmann found) the universe is expanding sufficiently
 slowly that the gravitational attraction between the different galaxies causes the expansion to slow down and
 eventually to stop. The galaxies then start to move toward each other and the universe contracts.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (4 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 Figure 3:2
 Figure 3:2 shows how the distance between two neighboring galaxies changes as time increases. It starts at
 zero, increases to a maximum, and then decreases to zero again. In the second kind of solution, the universe is
 expanding so rapidly that the gravitational attraction can never stop it, though it does slow it down a bit.
 Figure 3:3
 Figure 3:3 Shows the Separation between neighboring galaxies in this model. It starts at zero and eventually
 the galaxies are moving apart at a steady speed. Finally, there is a third kind of solution, in which the universe
 is expanding only just fast enough to avoid recollapse.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (5 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 Figure 3:4
 In this case the separation, shown in Figure 3:4, also starts at zero and increases forever. However, the speed
 at which the galaxies are moving apart gets smaller and smaller, although it never quite reaches zero.
 A remarkable feature of the first kind of Friedmann model is that in it the universe is not infinite in space, but
 neither does space have any boundary. Gravity is so strong that space is bent round onto itself, making it rather
 like the surface of the earth. If one keeps traveling in a certain direction on the surface of the earth, one never
 comes up against an impassable barrier or falls over the edge, but eventually comes back to where one
 started.
 In the first kind of Friedmann model, space is just like this, but with three dimensions instead of two for the
 earth’s surface. The fourth dimension, time, is also finite in extent, but it is like a line with two ends or
 boundaries, a beginning and an end. We shall see later that when one combines general relativity with the
 uncertainty principle of quantum mechanics, it is possible for both space and time to be finite without any edges
 or boundaries.
 The idea that one could go right round the universe and end up where one started makes good science fiction,
 but it doesn’t have much practical significance, because it can be shown that the universe would recollapse to
 zero size before one could get round. You would need to travel faster than light in order to end up where you
 started before the universe came to an end – and that is not allowed!
 In the first kind of Friedmann model, which expands and recollapses, space is bent in on itself, like the surface
 of the earth. It is therefore finite in extent. In the second kind of model, which expands forever, space is bent
 the other way, like the surface of a saddle. So in this case space is infinite. Finally, in the third kind of
 Friedmann model, with just the critical rate of expansion, space is flat (and therefore is also infinite).
 But which Friedmann model describes our universe? Will the universe eventually stop expanding and start
 contracting, or will it expand forever? To answer this question we need to know the present rate of expansion of
 the universe and its present average density. If the density is less than a certain critical value, determined by
 the rate of expansion, the gravitational attraction will be too weak to halt the expansion. If the density is greater
 than the critical value, gravity will stop the expansion at some time in the future and cause the universe to
 recollapse.
 We can determine the present rate of expansion by measuring the velocities at which other galaxies are
 moving away from us, using the Doppler effect. This can be done very accurately. However, the distances to
 the galaxies are not very well known because we can only measure them indirectly. So all we know is that the
 universe is expanding by between 5 percent and 10 percent every thousand million years. However, our
 uncertainty about the present average density of the universe is even greater. If we add up the masses of all
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (6 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 the stars that we can see in our galaxy and other galaxies, the total is less than one hundredth of the amount
 required to halt the expansion of the universe, even for the lowest estimate of the rate of expansion. Our galaxy
 and other galaxies, however, must contain a large amount of “dark matter” that we cannot see directly, but
 which we know must be there because of the influence of its gravitational attraction on the orbits of stars in the
 galaxies. Moreover, most galaxies are found in clusters, and we can similarly infer the presence of yet more
 dark matter in between the galaxies in these clusters by its effect on the motion of the galaxies. When we add
 up all this dark matter, we still get only about one tenth of the amount required to halt the expansion. However,
 we cannot exclude the possibility that there might be some other form of matter, distributed almost uniformly
 throughout the universe, that we have not yet detected and that might still raise the average density of the
 universe up to the critical value needed to halt the expansion. The present evidence therefore suggests that the
 universe will probably expand forever, but all we can really be sure of is that even if the universe is going to
 recollapse, it won’t do so for at least another ten thousand million years, since it has already been expanding
 for at least that long. This should not unduly worry us: by that time, unless we have colonized beyond the Solar
 System, mankind will long since have died out, extinguished along with our sun!
 All of the Friedmann solutions have the feature that at some time in the past (between ten and twenty thousand
 million years ago) the distance between neighboring galaxies must have been zero. At that time, which we call
 the big bang, the density of the universe and the curvature of space-time would have been infinite. Because
 mathematics cannot really handle infinite numbers, this means that the general theory of relativity (on which
 Friedmann’s solutions are based) predicts that there is a point in the universe where the theory itself breaks
 down. Such a point is an example of what mathematicians call a singularity. In fact, all our theories of science
 are formulated on the assumption that space-time is smooth and nearly fiat, so they break down at the big bang
 singularity, where the curvature of space-time is infinite. This means that even if there were events before the
 big bang, one could not use them to determine what would happen afterward, because predictability would
 break down at the big bang.
 Correspondingly, if, as is the case, we know only what has happened since the big bang, we could not
 determine what happened beforehand. As far as we are concerned, events before the big bang can have no
 consequences, so they should not form part of a scientific model of the universe. We should therefore cut them
 out of the model and say that time had a beginning at the big bang.
 Many people do not like the idea that time has a beginning, probably because it smacks of divine intervention.
 (The Catholic Church, on the other hand, seized on the big bang model and in 1951officially pronounced it to
 be in accordance with the Bible.) There were therefore a number of attempts to avoid the conclusion that there
 had been a big bang. The proposal that gained widest support was called the steady state theory. It was
 suggested in 1948 by two refugees from Nazi-occupied Austria, Hermann Bondi and Thomas Gold, together
 with a Briton, Fred Hoyle, who had worked with them on the development of radar during the war. The idea was
 that as the galaxies moved away from each other, new galaxies were continually forming in the gaps in
 between, from new matter that was being continually created. The universe would therefore look roughly the
 same at all times as well as at all points of space. The steady state theory required a modification of general
 relativity to allow for the continual creation of matter, but the rate that was involved was so low (about one
 particle per cubic kilometer per year) that it was not in conflict with experiment. The theory was a good scientific
 theory, in the sense described in Chapter 1: it was simple and it made definite predictions that could be tested
 by observation. One of these predictions was that the number of galaxies or similar objects in any given volume
 of space should be the same wherever and whenever we look in the universe. In the late 1950s and early
 1960s a survey of sources of radio waves from outer space was carried out at Cambridge by a group of
 astronomers led by Martin Ryle (who had also worked with Bondi, Gold, and Hoyle on radar during the war).
 The Cambridge group showed that most of these radio sources must lie outside our galaxy (indeed many of
 them could be identified with other galaxies) and also that there were many more weak sources than strong
 ones. They interpreted the weak sources as being the more distant ones, and the stronger ones as being
 nearer. Then there appeared to be less common sources per unit volume of space for the nearby sources than
 for the distant ones. This could mean that we are at the center of a great region in the universe in which the
 sources are fewer than elsewhere. Alternatively, it could mean that the sources were more numerous in the
 past, at the time that the radio waves left on their journey to us, than they are now. Either explanation
 contradicted the predictions of the steady state theory. Moreover, the discovery of the microwave radiation by
 Penzias and Wilson in 1965 also indicated that the universe must have been much denser in the past. The
 steady state theory therefore had to be abandoned.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (7 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 Another attempt to avoid the conclusion that there must have been a big bang, and therefore a beginning of
 time, was made by two Russian scientists, Evgenii Lifshitz and Isaac Khalatnikov, in 1963. They suggested that
 the big bang might be a peculiarity of Friedmann’s models alone, which after all were only approximations to
 the real universe. Perhaps, of all the models that were roughly like the real universe, only Friedmann’s would
 contain a big bang singularity. In Friedmann’s models, the galaxies are all moving directly away from each
 other – so it is not surprising that at some time in the past they were all at the same place. In the real universe,
 however, the galaxies are not just moving directly away from each other – they also have small sideways
 velocities. So in reality they need never have been all at exactly the same place, only very close together.
 Perhaps then the current expanding universe resulted not from a big bang singularity, but from an earlier
 contracting phase; as the universe had collapsed the particles in it might not have all collided, but had flown
 past and then away from each other, producing the present expansion of the the universe that were roughly like
 Friedmann’s models but took account of the irregularities and random velocities of galaxies in the real universe.
 They showed that such models could start with a big bang, even though the galaxies were no longer always
 moving directly away from each other, but they claimed that this was still only possible in certain exceptional
 models in which the galaxies were all moving in just the right way. They argued that since there seemed to be
 infinitely more Friedmann-like models without a big bang singularity than there were with one, we should
 conclude that there had not in reality been a big bang. They later realized, however, that there was a much
 more general class of Friedmann-like models that did have singularities, and in which the galaxies did not have
 to be moving any special way. They therefore withdrew their claim in 1970.
 The work of Lifshitz and Khalatnikov was valuable because it showed that the universe could have had a
 singularity, a big bang, if the general theory of relativity was correct. However, it did not resolve the crucial
 question: Does general relativity predict that our universe should have had a big bang, a beginning of time?
 The answer to this carne out of a completely different approach introduced by a British mathematician and
 physicist, Roger Penrose, in 1965. Using the way light cones behave in general relativity, together with the fact
 that gravity is always attractive, he showed that a star collapsing under its own gravity is trapped in a region
 whose surface eventually shrinks to zero size. And, since the surface of the region shrinks to zero, so too must
 its volume. All the matter in the star will be compressed into a region of zero volume, so the density of matter
 and the curvature of space-time become infinite. In other words, one has a singularity contained within a region
 of space-time known as a black hole.
 At first sight, Penrose’s result applied only to stars; it didn’t have anything to say about the question of whether
 the entire universe had a big bang singularity in its past. However, at the time that Penrose produced his
 theorem, I was a research student desperately looking for a problem with which to complete my Ph.D. thesis.
 Two years before, I had been diagnosed as suffering from ALS, commonly known as Lou Gehrig’s disease, or
 motor neuron disease, and given to understand that I had only one or two more years to live. In these
 circumstances there had not seemed much point in working on my Ph.D.– I did not expect to survive that long.
 Yet two years had gone by and I was not that much worse. In fact, things were going rather well for me and I
 had gotten engaged to a very nice girl, Jane Wilde. But in order to get married, I needed a job, and in order to
 get a job, I needed a Ph.D.
 In 1965 I read about Penrose’s theorem that any body undergoing gravitational collapse must eventually form a
 singularity. I soon realized that if one reversed the direction of time in Penrose’s theorem, so that the collapse
 became an expansion, the conditions of his theorem would still hold, provided the universe were roughly like a
 Friedmann model on large scales at the present time. Penrose’s theorem had shown that any collapsing star
 must end in a singularity; the time-reversed argument showed that any Friedmann-like expanding universe
 must have begun with a singularity. For technical reasons, Penrose’s theorem required that the universe be
 infinite in space. So I could in fact, use it to prove that there should be a singularity only if the universe was
 expanding fast enough to avoid collapsing again (since only those Friedmann models were infinite in space).
 During the next few years I developed new mathematical techniques to remove this and other technical
 conditions from the theorems that proved that singularities must occur. The final result was a joint paper by
 Penrose and myself in 1970, which at last proved that there must have been a big bang singularity provided
 only that general relativity is correct and the universe contains as much matter as we observe. There was a lot
 of opposition to our work, partly from the Russians because of their Marxist belief in scientific determinism, and
 partly from people who felt that the whole idea of singularities was repugnant and spoiled the beauty of
 Einstein’s theory. However, one cannot really argue with a mathematical theorem. So in the end our work
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (8 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 became generally accepted and nowadays nearly everyone assumes that the universe started with a big bang
 singularity. It is perhaps ironic that, having changed my mind, I am now trying to convince other physicists that
 there was in fact no singularity at the beginning of the universe – as we shall see later, it can disappear once
 quantum effects are taken into account.
 We have seen in this chapter how, in less than half a century, man’s view of the universe formed over millennia
 has been transformed. Hubble’s discovery that the universe was expanding, and the realization of the
 insignificance of our own planet in the vastness of the universe, were just the starting point. As experimental
 and theoretical evidence mounted, it became more and more clear that the universe must have had a
 beginning in time, until in 1970 this was finally proved by Penrose and myself, on the basis of Einstein’s general
 theory of relativity. That proof showed that general relativity is only an incomplete theory: it cannot tell us how
 the universe started off, because it predicts that all physical theories, including itself, break down at the
 beginning of the universe. However, general relativity claims to be only a partial theory, so what the singularity
 theorems really show is that there must have been a time in the very early universe when the universe was so
 small that one could no longer ignore the small-scale effects of the other great partial theory of the twentieth
 century, quantum mechanics. At the start of the 1970s, then, we were forced to turn our search for an
 understanding of the universe from our theory of the extraordinarily vast to our theory of the extraordinarily tiny.
 That theory, quantum mechanics, will be described next, before we turn to the efforts to combine the two partial
 theories into a single quantum theory of gravity.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 3
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/b.html (9 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:14:24 AM]
 CHAPTER 4
 THE UNCERTAINTY PRINCIPLE
 The success of scientific theories, particularly Newton’s theory of gravity, led the French scientist the Marquis de Laplace
 at the beginning of the nineteenth century to argue that the universe was completely deterministic. Laplace suggested
 that there should be a set of scientific laws that would allow us to predict everything that would happen in the universe, if
 only we knew the complete state of the universe at one time. For example, if we knew the positions and speeds of the
 sun and the planets at one time, then we could use Newton’s laws to calculate the state of the Solar System at any other
 time. Determinism seems fairly obvious in this case, but Laplace went further to assume that there were similar laws
 governing everything else, including human behavior.
 The doctrine of scientific determinism was strongly resisted by many people, who felt that it infringed God’s freedom to
 intervene in the world, but it remained the standard assumption of science until the early years of this century. One of the
 first indications that this belief would have to be abandoned came when calculations by the British scientists Lord
 Rayleigh and Sir James Jeans suggested that a hot object, or body, such as a star, must radiate energy at an infinite
 rate. According to the laws we believed at the time, a hot body ought to give off electromagnetic waves (such as radio
 waves, visible light, or X rays) equally at all frequencies. For example, a hot body should radiate the same amount of
 energy in waves with frequencies between one and two million million waves a second as in waves with frequencies
 between two and three million million waves a second. Now since the number of waves a second is unlimited, this would
 mean that the total energy radiated would be infinite.
 In order to avoid this obviously ridiculous result, the German scientist Max Planck suggested in 1900 that light, X rays,
 and other waves could not be emitted at an arbitrary rate, but only in certain packets that he called quanta. Moreover,
 each quantum had a certain amount of energy that was greater the higher the frequency of the waves, so at a high
 enough frequency the emission of a single quantum would require more energy than was available. Thus the radiation at
 high frequencies would be reduced, and so the rate at which the body lost energy would be finite.
 The quantum hypothesis explained the observed rate of emission of radiation from hot bodies very well, but its
 implications for determinism were not realized until 1926, when another German scientist, Werner Heisenberg,
 formulated his famous uncertainty principle. In order to predict the future position and velocity of a particle, one has to be
 able to measure its present position and velocity accurately. The obvious way to do this is to shine light on the particle.
 Some of the waves of light will be scattered by the particle and this will indicate its position. However, one will not be able
 to determine the position of the particle more accurately than the distance between the wave crests of light, so one needs
 to use light of a short wavelength in order to measure the position of the particle precisely. Now, by Planck’s quantum
 hypothesis, one cannot use an arbitrarily small amount of light; one has to use at least one quantum. This quantum will
 disturb the particle and change its velocity in a way that cannot be predicted. moreover, the more accurately one
 measures the position, the shorter the wavelength of the light that one needs and hence the higher the energy of a single
 quantum. So the velocity of the particle will be disturbed by a larger amount. In other words, the more accurately you try
 to measure the position of the particle, the less accurately you can measure its speed, and vice versa. Heisenberg
 showed that the uncertainty in the position of the particle times the uncertainty in its velocity times the mass of the
 particle can never be smaller than a certain quantity, which is known as Planck’s constant. Moreover, this limit does not
 depend on the way in which one tries to measure the position or velocity of the particle, or on the type of particle:
 Heisenberg’s uncertainty principle is a fundamental, inescapable property of the world.
 The uncertainty principle had profound implications for the way in which we view the world. Even after more than seventy
 years they have not been fully appreciated by many philosophers, and are still the subject of much controversy. The
 uncertainty principle signaled an end to Laplace’s dream of a theory of science, a model of the universe that would be
 completely deterministic: one certainly cannot predict future events exactly if one cannot even measure the present state
 of the universe precisely! We could still imagine that there is a set of laws that determine events completely for some
 supernatural being, who could observe the present state of the universe without disturbing it. However, such models of
 the universe are not of much interest to us ordinary mortals. It seems better to employ the principle of economy known as
 Occam’s razor and cut out all the features of the theory that cannot be observed. This approach led Heisenberg, Erwin
 Schrodinger, and Paul Dirac in the 1920s to reformulate mechanics into a new theory called quantum mechanics, based
 on the uncertainty principle. In this theory particles no longer had separate, well-defined positions and velocities that
 could not be observed, Instead, they had a quantum state, which was a combination of position and velocity.
 In general, quantum mechanics does not predict a single definite result for an observation. Instead, it predicts a number
 of different possible outcomes and tells us how likely each of these is. That is to say, if one made the same measurement
 on a large number of similar systems, each of which started off in the same way, one would find that the result of the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 4
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/c.html (1 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:14:40 AM]
 measurement would be A in a certain number of cases, B in a different number, and so on. One could predict the
 approximate number of times that the result would be A or B, but one could not predict the specific result of an individual
 measurement. Quantum mechanics therefore introduces an unavoidable element of unpredictability or randomness into
 science. Einstein objected to this very strongly, despite the important role he had played in the development of these
 ideas. Einstein was awarded the Nobel Prize for his contribution to quantum theory. Nevertheless, Einstein never
 accepted that the universe was governed by chance; his feelings were summed up in his famous statement “God does
 not play dice.” Most other scientists, however, were willing to accept quantum mechanics because it agreed perfectly with
 experiment. Indeed, it has been an outstandingly successful theory and underlies nearly all of modern science and
 technology. It governs the behavior of transistors and integrated circuits, which are the essential components of
 electronic devices such as televisions and computers, and is also the basis of modern chemistry and biology. The only
 areas of physical science into which quantum mechanics has not yet been properly incorporated are gravity and the
 large-scale structure of the universe.
 Although light is made up of waves, Planck’s quantum hypothesis tells us that in some ways it behaves as if it were
 composed of particles: it can be emitted or absorbed only in packets, or quanta. Equally, Heisenberg’s uncertainty
 principle implies that particles behave in some respects like waves: they do not have a definite position but are “smeared
 out” with a certain probability distribution. The theory of quantum mechanics is based on an entirely new type of
 mathematics that no longer describes the real world in terms of particles and waves; it is only the observations of the
 world that may be described in those terms. There is thus a duality between waves and particles in quantum mechanics:
 for some purposes it is helpful to think of particles as waves and for other purposes it is better to think of waves as
 particles. An important consequence of this is that one can observe what is called interference between two sets of
 waves or particles. That is to say, the crests of one set of waves may coincide with the troughs of the other set. The two
 sets of waves then cancel each other out rather than adding up to a stronger wave as one might expect Figure 4:1.
 Figure 4:1
 A familiar example of interference in the case of light is the colors that are often seen in soap bubbles. These are caused
 by reflection of light from the two sides of the thin film of water forming the bubble. White light consists of light waves of
 all different wavelengths, or colors, For certain wavelengths the crests of the waves reflected from one side of the soap
 film coincide with the troughs reflected from the other side. The colors corresponding to these wavelengths are absent
 from the reflected light, which therefore appears to be colored. Interference can also occur for particles, because of the
 duality introduced by quantum mechanics. A famous example is the so-called two-slit experiment Figure 4:2.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 4
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/c.html (2 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:14:40 AM]
 Figure 4:2
 Consider a partition with two narrow parallel slits in it. On one side of the partition one places a source of fight of a
 particular color (that is, of a particular wavelength). Most of the light will hit the partition, but a small amount will go
 through the slits. Now suppose one places a screen on the far side of the partition from the light. Any point on the screen
 will receive waves from the two slits. However, in general, the distance the light has to travel from the source to the
 screen via the two slits will be different. This will mean that the waves from the slits will not be in phase with each other
 when they arrive at the screen: in some places the waves will cancel each other out, and in others they will reinforce
 each other. The result is a characteristic pattern of light and dark fringes.
 The remarkable thing is that one gets exactly the same kind of fringes if one replaces the source of light by a source of
 particles such as electrons with a definite speed (this means that the corresponding waves have a definite length). It
 seems the more peculiar because if one only has one slit, one does not get any fringes, just a uniform distribution of
 electrons across the screen. One might therefore think that opening another slit would just increase the number of
 electrons hitting each point of the screen, but, because of interference, it actually decreases it in some places. If
 electrons are sent through the slits one at a time, one would expect each to pass through one slit or the other, and so
 behave just as if the slit it passed through were the only one there – giving a uniform distribution on the screen. In reality,
 however, even when the electrons are sent one at a time, the fringes still appear. Each electron, therefore, must be
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 4
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/c.html (3 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:14:40 AM]
 passing through both slits at the same time!
 The phenomenon of interference between particles has been crucial to our understanding of the structure of atoms, the
 basic units of chemistry and biology and the building blocks out of which we, and everything around us, are made. At the
 beginning of this century it was thought that atoms were rather like the planets orbiting the sun, with electrons (particles
 of negative electricity) orbiting around a central nucleus, which carried positive electricity. The attraction between the
 positive and negative electricity was supposed to keep the electrons in their orbits in the same way that the gravitational
 attraction between the sun and the planets keeps the planets in their orbits. The trouble with this was that the laws of
 mechanics and electricity, before quantum mechanics, predicted that the electrons would lose energy and so spiral
 inward until they collided with the nucleus. This would mean that the atom, and indeed all matter, should rapidly collapse
 to a state of very high density. A partial solution to this problem was found by the Danish scientist Niels Bohr in 1913. He
 suggested that maybe the electrons were not able to orbit at just any distance from the central nucleus but only at certain
 specified distances. If one also supposed that only one or two electrons could orbit at any one of these distances, this
 would solve the problem of the collapse of the atom, because the electrons could not spiral in any farther than to fill up
 the orbits with e least distances and energies.
 This model explained quite well the structure of the simplest atom, hydrogen, which has only one electron orbiting around
 the nucleus. But it was not clear how one ought to extend it to more complicated atoms. Moreover, the idea of a limited
 set of allowed orbits seemed very arbitrary. The new theory of quantum mechanics resolved this difficulty. It revealed that
 an electron orbiting around the nucleus could be thought of as a wave, with a wavelength that depended on its velocity.
 For certain orbits, the length of the orbit would correspond to a whole number (as opposed to a fractional number) of
 wavelengths of the electron. For these orbits the wave crest would be in the same position each time round, so the
 waves would add up: these orbits would correspond to Bohr’s allowed orbits. However, for orbits whose lengths were not
 a whole number of wavelengths, each wave crest would eventually be canceled out by a trough as the electrons went
 round; these orbits would not be allowed.
 A nice way of visualizing the wave/particle duality is the so-called sum over histories introduced by the American scientist
 Richard Feynman. In this approach the particle is not supposed to have a single history or path in space-time, as it would
 in a classical, nonquantum theory. Instead it is supposed to go from A to B by every possible path. With each path there
 are associated a couple of numbers: one represents the size of a wave and the other represents the position in the cycle
 (i.e., whether it is at a crest or a trough). The probability of going from A to B is found by adding up the waves for all the
 paths. In general, if one compares a set of neighboring paths, the phases or positions in the cycle will differ greatly. This
 means that the waves associated with these paths will almost exactly cancel each other out. However, for some sets of
 neighboring paths the phase will not vary much between paths. The waves for these paths will not cancel out Such paths
 correspond to Bohr’s allowed orbits.
 With these ideas, in concrete mathematical form, it was relatively straightforward to calculate the allowed orbits in more
 complicated atoms and even in molecules, which are made up of a number of atoms held together by electrons in orbits
 that go round more than one nucleus. Since the structure of molecules and their reactions with each other underlie all of
 chemistry and biology, quantum mechanics allows us in principle to predict nearly everything we see around us, within
 the limits set by the uncertainty principle. (In practice, however, the calculations required for systems containing more
 than a few electrons are so complicated that we cannot do them.)
 Einstein’s general theory of relativity seems to govern the large-scale structure of the universe. It is what is called a
 classical theory; that is, it does not take account of the uncertainty principle of quantum mechanics, as it should for
 consistency with other theories. The reason that this does not lead to any discrepancy with observation is that all the
 gravitational fields that we normally experience are very weak. How-ever, the singularity theorems discussed earlier
 indicate that the gravitational field should get very strong in at least two situations, black holes and the big bang. In such
 strong fields the effects of quantum mechanics should be important. Thus, in a sense, classical general relativity, by
 predicting points of infinite density, predicts its own downfall, just as classical (that is, nonquantum) mechanics predicted
 its downfall by suggesting that atoms should collapse to infinite density. We do not yet have a complete consistent theory
 that unifies general relativity and quantum mechanics, but we do know a number of the features it should have. The
 consequences that these would have for black holes and the big bang will be described in later chapters. For the
 moment, however, we shall turn to the recent attempts to bring together our understanding of the other forces of nature
 into a single, unified quantum theory.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 4
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/c.html (4 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:14:40 AM]
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 4
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/c.html (5 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:14:40 AM]
 CHAPTER 5
 ELEMENTARY PARTICLES AND THE FORCES OF NATURE
 Aristotle believed that all the matter in the universe was made up of four basic elements – earth, air, fire, and water.
 These elements were acted on by two forces: gravity, the tendency for earth and water to sink, and levity, the tendency
 for air and fire to rise. This division of the contents of the universe into matter and forces is still used today. Aristotle
 believed that matter was continuous, that is, one could divide a piece of matter into smaller and smaller bits without any
 limit: one never came up against a grain of matter that could not be divided further. A few Greeks, however, such as
 Democritus, held that matter was inherently grainy and that everything was made up of large numbers of various different
 kinds of atoms. (The word atom means “indivisible” in Greek.) For centuries the argument continued without any real
 evidence on either side, but in 1803 the British chemist and physicist John Dalton pointed out that the fact that chemical
 compounds always combined in certain proportions could be explained by the grouping together of atoms to form units
 called molecules. However, the argument between the two schools of thought was not finally settled in favor of the
 atomists until the early years of this century. One of the important pieces of physical evidence was provided by Einstein.
 In a paper written in 1905, a few weeks before the famous paper on special relativity, Einstein pointed out that what was
 called Brownian motion – the irregular, random motion of small particles of dust suspended in a liquid – could be
 explained as the effect of atoms of the liquid colliding with the dust particles.
 By this time there were already suspicions that these atoms were not, after all, indivisible. Several years previously a
 fellow of Trinity College, Cambridge, J. J. Thomson, had demonstrated the existence of a particle of matter, called the
 electron, that had a mass less than one thousandth of that of the lightest atom. He used a setup rather like a modern TV
 picture tube: a red-hot metal filament gave off the electrons, and because these have a negative electric charge, an
 electric field could be used to accelerate them toward a phosphor-coated screen. When they hit the screen, flashes of
 light were generated. Soon it was realized that these electrons must be coming from within the atoms themselves, and in
 1911 the New Zealand physicist Ernest Rutherford finally showed that the atoms of matter do have internal structure:
 they are made up of an extremely tiny, positively charged nucleus, around which a number of electrons orbit. He deduced
 this by analyzing the way in which alpha-particles, which are positively charged particles given off by radioactive atoms,
 are deflected when they collide with atoms.
 At first it was thought that the nucleus of the atom was made up of electrons and different numbers of a positively
 charged particle called the proton, from the Greek word meaning “first,” because it was believed to be the fundamental
 unit from which matter was made. However, in 1932 a colleague of Rutherford’s at Cambridge, James Chadwick,
 discovered that the nucleus contained another particle, called the neutron, which had almost the same mass as a proton
 but no electrical charge. Chadwick received the Nobel Prize for his discovery, and was elected Master of Gonville and
 Caius College, Cambridge (the college of which I am now a fellow). He later resigned as Master because of
 disagreements with the Fellows. There had been a bitter dispute in the college ever since a group of young Fellows
 returning after the war had voted many of the old Fellows out of the college offices they had held for a long time. This
 was before my time; I joined the college in 1965 at the tail end of the bitterness, when similar disagreements forced
 another Nobel Prize – winning Master, Sir Nevill Mott, to resign.
 Up to about thirty years ago, it was thought that protons and neutrons were “elementary” particles, but experiments in
 which protons were collided with other protons or electrons at high speeds indicated that they were in fact made up of
 smaller particles. These particles were named quarks by the Caltech physicist Murray Gell-Mann, who won the Nobel
 Prize in 1969 for his work on them. The origin of the name is an enigmatic quotation from James Joyce: “Three quarks for
 Muster Mark!” The word quark is supposed to be pronounced like quart, but with a k at the end instead of a t, but is
 usually pronounced to rhyme with lark.
 There are a number of different varieties of quarks: there are six “flavors,” which we call up, down, strange, charmed,
 bottom, and top. The first three flavors had been known since the 1960s but the charmed quark was discovered only in
 1974, the bottom in 1977, and the top in 1995. Each flavor comes in three “colors,” red, green, and blue. (It should be
 emphasized that these terms are just labels: quarks are much smaller than the wavelength of visible light and so do not
 have any color in the normal sense. It is just that modern physicists seem to have more imaginative ways of naming new
 particles and phenomena – they no longer restrict themselves to Greek!) A proton or neutron is made up of three quarks,
 one of each color. A proton contains two up quarks and one down quark; a neutron contains two down and one up. We
 can create particles made up of the other quarks (strange, charmed, bottom, and top), but these all have a much greater
 mass and decay very rapidly into protons and neutrons.
 We now know that neither the atoms nor the protons and neutrons within them are indivisible. So the question is: what
 are the truly elementary particles, the basic building blocks from which everything is made? Since the wavelength of light
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (1 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 is much larger than the size of an atom, we cannot hope to “look” at the parts of an atom in the ordinary way. We need to
 use something with a much smaller wave-length. As we saw in the last chapter, quantum mechanics tells us that all
 particles are in fact waves, and that the higher the energy of a particle, the smaller the wavelength of the corresponding
 wave. So the best answer we can give to our question depends on how high a particle energy we have at our disposal,
 because this determines on how small a length scale we can look. These particle energies are usually measured in units
 called electron volts. (In Thomson’s experiments with electrons, we saw that he used an electric field to accelerate the
 electrons. The energy that an electron gains from an electric field of one volt is what is known as an electron volt.) In the
 nineteenth century, when the only particle energies that people knew how to use were the low energies of a few electron
 volts generated by chemical reactions such as burning, it was thought that atoms were the smallest unit. In Rutherford’s
 experiment, the alpha-particles had energies of millions of electron volts. More recently, we have learned how to use
 electromagnetic fields to give particles energies of at first millions and then thousands of millions of electron volts. And so
 we know that particles that were thought to be “elementary” thirty years ago are, in fact, made up of smaller particles.
 May these, as we go to still higher energies, in turn be found to be made from still smaller particles? This is certainly
 possible, but we do have some theoretical reasons for believing that we have, or are very near to, a knowledge of the
 ultimate building blocks of nature.
 Using the wave/particle duality discussed in the last chapter, every-thing in the universe, including light and gravity, can
 be described in terms of particles. These particles have a property called spin. One way of thinking of spin is to imagine
 the particles as little tops spinning about an axis. However, this can be misleading, because quantum mechanics tells us
 that the particles do not have any well-defined axis. What the spin of a particle really tells us is what the particle looks like
 from different directions. A particle of spin 0 is like a dot: it looks the same from every direction Figure 5:1-i. On the other
 hand, a particle of spin 1 is like an arrow: it looks different from different directions Figure 5:1-ii. Only if one turns it round
 a complete revolution (360 degrees) does the particle look the same. A particle of spin 2 is like a double-headed arrow
 Figure 5:1-iii: it looks the same if one turns it round half a revolution (180 degrees). Similarly, higher spin particles look
 the same if one turns them through smaller fractions of a complete revolution. All this seems fairly straightforward, but the
 remark-able fact is that there are particles that do not look the same if one turns them through just one revolution: you
 have to turn them through two complete revolutions! Such particles are said to have spin ½.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (2 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 Figure 5:1
 All the known particles in the universe can be divided into two groups: particles of spin ½, which make up the matter in
 the universe, and particles of spin 0, 1, and 2, which, as we shall see, give rise to forces between the matter particles.
 The matter particles obey what is called Pauli’s exclusion principle. This was discovered in 1925 by an Austrian physicist,
 Wolfgang Pauli – for which he received the Nobel Prize in 1945. He was the archetypal theoretical physicist: it was said
 of him that even his presence in the same town would make experiments go wrong! Pauli’s exclusion principle says that
 two similar particles can-not exist in the same state; that is, they cannot have both the same position and the same
 velocity, within the limits given by the uncertainty principle. The exclusion principle is crucial because it explains why
 matter particles do not collapse to a state of very high density under the influence of the forces produced by the particles
 of spin 0, 1, and 2: if the matter particles have very nearly the same positions, they must have different velocities, which
 means that they will not stay in the same position for long. If the world had been created without the exclusion principle,
 quarks would not form separate, well-defined protons and neutrons. Nor would these, together with electrons, form
 separate, well-defined atoms. They would all collapse to form a roughly uniform, dense “soup.”
 A proper understanding of the electron and other spin-½ particles did not come until 1928, when a theory was proposed
 by Paul Dirac, who later was elected to the Lucasian Professorship of Mathematics at Cambridge (the same
 professorship that Newton had once held and that I now hold). Dirac’s theory was the first of its kind that was consistent
 with both quantum mechanics and the special theory of relativity. It explained mathematically why the electron had
 spin-½; that is, why it didn’t look the same if you turned it through only one complete revolution, but did if you turned it
 through two revolutions. It also predicted that the electron should have a partner: an anti-electron, or positron. The
 discovery of the positron in 1932 confirmed Dirac’s theory and led to his being awarded the Nobel Prize for physics in
 1933. We now know that every particle has an antiparticle, with which it can annihilate. (In the case of the force-carrying
 particles, the antiparticles are the same as the particles themselves.) There could be whole antiworlds and antipeople
 made out of antiparticles. However, if you meet your antiself, don’t shake hands! You would both vanish in a great flash
 of light. The question of why there seem to be so many more particles than antiparticles around us is extremely
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (3 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 important, and I shall return to it later in the chapter.
 In quantum mechanics, the forces or interactions between matter particles are all supposed to be carried by particles of
 integer spin – 0, 1, or 2. What happens is that a matter particle, such as an electron or a quark, emits a force-carrying
 particle. The recoil from this emission changes the velocity of the matter particle. The force-carrying particle then collides
 with another matter particle and is absorbed. This collision changes the velocity of the second particle, just as if there had
 been a force between the two matter particles. It is an important property of ' the force-carrying particles that they do not
 obey the exclusion principle. This means that there is no limit to the number that can be exchanged, and so they can give
 rise to a strong force. However, if the force-carrying particles have a high mass, it will be difficult to produce and
 exchange them over a large distance. So the forces that they carry will have only a short range. On the other hand, if the
 force-carrying particles have no mass of their own, the forces will be long range. The force-carrying particles exchanged
 between matter particles are said to be virtual particles because, unlike “real” particles, they cannot be directly detected
 by a particle detector. We know they exist, however, because they do have a measurable effect: they give rise to forces
 between matter particles. Particles of spin 0, 1, or 2 do also exist in some circumstances as real particles, when they can
 be directly detected. They then appear to us as what a classical physicist would call waves, such as waves of light or
 gravitational waves. They may sometimes be emitted when matter particles interact with each other by exchanging virtual
 force-carrying particles. (For example, the electric repulsive force between two electrons is due to the exchange of virtual
 photons, which can never be directly detected; but if one electron moves past another, real photons may be given off,
 which we detect as light waves.)
 Force-carrying particles can be grouped into four categories according to the strength of the force that they carry and the
 particles with which they interact. It should be emphasized that this division into four classes is man-made; it is
 convenient for the construction of partial theories, but it may not correspond to anything deeper. Ultimately, most
 physicists hope to find a unified theory that will explain all four forces as different aspects of a single force. Indeed, many
 would say this is the prime goal of physics today. Recently, successful attempts have been made to unify three of the
 four categories of force – and I shall describe these in this chapter. The question of the unification of the remaining
 category, gravity, we shall leave till later.
 The first category is the gravitational force. This force is universal, that is, every particle feels the force of gravity,
 according to its mass or energy. Gravity is the weakest of the four forces by a long way; it is so weak that we would not
 notice it at all were it not for two special properties that it has: it can act over large distances, and it is always attractive.
 This means that the very weak gravitational forces between the individual particles in two large bodies, such as the earth
 and the sun, can all add up to produce a significant force. The other three forces are either short range, or are sometimes
 attractive and some-times repulsive, so they tend to cancel out. In the quantum mechanical way of looking at the
 gravitational field, the force between two matter particles is pictured as being carried by a particle of spin 2 called the
 graviton. This has no mass of its own, so the force that it carries is long range. The gravitational force between the sun
 and the earth is ascribed to the exchange of gravitons between the particles that make up these two bodies. Although the
 exchanged particles are virtual, they certainly do produce a measurable effect – they make the earth orbit the sun! Real
 gravitons make up what classical physicists would call gravitational waves, which are very weak – and so difficult to
 detect that they have not yet been observed.
 The next category is the electromagnetic force, which interacts with electrically charged particles like electrons and
 quarks, but not with uncharged particles such as gravitons. It is much stronger than the gravitational force: the
 electromagnetic force between two electrons is about a million million million million million million million (1 with forty-two
 zeros after it) times bigger than the gravitational force. However, there are two kinds of electric charge, positive and
 negative. The force between two positive charges is repulsive, as is the force between two negative charges, but the
 force is attractive between a positive and a negative charge. A large body, such as the earth or the sun, contains nearly
 equal numbers of positive and negative charges. Thus the attractive and repulsive forces between the individual particles
 nearly cancel each other out, and there is very little net electromagnetic force. However, on the small scales of atoms
 and molecules, electromagnetic forces dominate. The electromagnetic attraction between negatively charged electrons
 and positively charged protons in the nucleus causes the electrons to orbit the nucleus of the atom, just as gravitational
 attraction causes the earth to orbit the sun. The electromagnetic attraction is pictured as being caused by the exchange
 of large numbers of virtual massless particles of spin 1, called photons. Again, the photons that are exchanged are virtual
 particles. However, when an electron changes from one allowed orbit to another one nearer to the nucleus, energy is
 released and a real photon is emitted – which can be observed as visible light by the human eye, if it has the right
 wave-length, or by a photon detector such as photographic film. Equally, if a real photon collides with an atom, it may
 move an electron from an orbit nearer the nucleus to one farther away. This uses up the energy of the photon, so it is
 absorbed.
 The third category is called the weak nuclear force, which is responsible for radioactivity and which acts on all matter
 particles of spin-½, but not on particles of spin 0, 1, or 2, such as photons and gravitons. The weak nuclear force was not
 well understood until 1967, when Abdus Salam at Imperial College, London, and Steven Weinberg at Harvard both
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (4 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 proposed theories that unified this interaction with the electromagnetic force, just as Maxwell had unified electricity and
 magnetism about a hundred years earlier. They suggested that in addition to the photon, there were three other spin-1
 particles, known collectively as massive vector bosons, that carried the weak force. These were called W+ (pronounced
 W plus), W- (pronounced W minus), and Zº (pronounced Z naught), and each had a mass of around 100 GeV (GeV
 stands for gigaelectron-volt, or one thousand million electron volts). The Weinberg-Salam theory exhibits a property
 known as spontaneous symmetry breaking. This means that what appear to be a number of completely different particles
 at low energies are in fact found to be all the same type of particle, only in different states. At high energies all these
 particles behave similarly. The effect is rather like the behavior of a roulette ball on a roulette wheel. At high energies
 (when the wheel is spun quickly) the ball behaves in essentially only one way – it rolls round and round. But as the wheel
 slows, the energy of the ball decreases, and eventually the ball drops into one of the thirty-seven slots in the wheel. In
 other words, at low energies there are thirty-seven different states in which the ball can exist. If, for some reason, we
 could only observe the ball at low energies, we would then think that there were thirty-seven different types of ball!
 In the Weinberg-Salam theory, at energies much greater than 100 GeV, the three new particles and the photon would all
 behave in a similar manner. But at the lower particle energies that occur in most normal situations, this symmetry
 between the particles would be broken. WE, W, and Zº would acquire large masses, making the forces they carry have a
 very short range. At the time that Salam and Weinberg proposed their theory, few people believed them, and particle
 accelerators were not powerful enough to reach the energies of 100 GeV required to produce real W+, W-, or Zº particles.
 However, over the next ten years or so, the other predictions of the theory at lower energies agreed so well with
 experiment that, in 1979, Salam and Weinberg were awarded the Nobel Prize for physics, together with Sheldon
 Glashow, also at Harvard, who had suggested similar unified theories of the electromagnetic and weak nuclear forces.
 The Nobel committee was spared the embarrassment of having made a mistake by the discovery in 1983 at CERN
 (European Centre for Nuclear Research) of the three massive partners of the photon, with the correct predicted masses
 and other properties. Carlo Rubbia, who led the team of several hundred physicists that made the discovery, received the
 Nobel Prize in 1984, along with Simon van der Meer, the CERNengineer who developed the antimatter storage system
 employed. (It is very difficult to make a mark in experimental physics these days unless you are already at the top! )
 The fourth category is the strong nuclear force, which holds the quarks together in the proton and neutron, and holds the
 protons and neutrons together in the nucleus of an atom. It is believed that this force is carried by another spin-1 particle,
 called the gluon, which interacts only with itself and with the quarks. The strong nuclear force has a curious property
 called confinement: it always binds particles together into combinations that have no color. One cannot have a single
 quark on its own because it would have a color (red, green, or blue). Instead, a red quark has to be joined to a green and
 a blue quark by a “string” of gluons (red + green + blue = white). Such a triplet constitutes a proton or a neutron. Another
 possibility is a pair consisting of a quark and an antiquark (red + antired, or green + antigreen, or blue + antiblue = white).
 Such combinations make up the particles known as mesons, which are unstable because the quark and antiquark can
 annihilate each other, producing electrons and other particles. Similarly, confinement prevents one having a single gluon
 on its own, because gluons also have color. Instead, one has to have a collection of gluons whose colors add up to white.
 Such a collection forms an unstable particle called a glueball.
 The fact that confinement prevents one from observing an isolated quark or gluon might seem to make the whole notion
 of quarks and gluons as particles somewhat metaphysical. However, there is another property of the strong nuclear
 force, called asymptotic freedom, that makes the concept of quarks and gluons well defined. At normal energies, the
 strong nuclear force is indeed strong, and it binds the quarks tightly together. However, experiments with large particle
 accelerators indicate that at high energies the strong force becomes much weaker, and the quarks and gluons behave
 almost like free particles.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (5 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 Figure 5:2
 Figure 5:2 shows a photograph of a collision between a high-energy proton and antiproton. The success of the unification
 of the electromagnetic and weak nuclear forces led to a number of attempts to combine these two forces with the strong
 nuclear force into what is called a grand unified theory (or GUT). This title is rather an exaggeration: the resultant theories
 are not all that grand, nor are they fully unified, as they do not include gravity. Nor are they really complete theories,
 because they contain a number of parameters whose values cannot be predicted from the theory but have to be chosen
 to fit in with experiment. Nevertheless, they may be a step toward a complete, fully unified theory. The basic idea of
 GUTs is as follows: as was mentioned above, the strong nuclear force gets weaker at high energies. On the other hand,
 the electromagnetic and weak forces, which are not asymptotically free, get stronger at high energies. At some very high
 energy, called the grand unification energy, these three forces would all have the same strength and so could just be
 different aspects of a single force. The GUTs also predict that at this energy the different spin-½ matter particles, like
 quarks and electrons, would also all be essentially the same, thus achieving another unification.
 The value of the grand unification energy is not very well known, but it would probably have to be at least a thousand
 million million GeV. The present generation of particle accelerators can collide particles at energies of about one hundred
 GeV, and machines are planned that would raise this to a few thousand GeV. But a machine that was powerful enough to
 accelerate particles to the grand unification energy would have to be as big as the Solar System – and would be unlikely
 to be funded in the present economic climate. Thus it is impossible to test grand unified theories directly in the laboratory.
 However, just as in the case of the electromagnetic and weak unified theory, there are low-energy consequences of the
 theory that can be tested.
 The most interesting of these is the prediction that protons, which make up much of the mass of ordinary matter, can
 spontaneously decay into lighter particles such as antielectrons. The reason this is possible is that at the grand
 unification energy there is no essential difference between a quark and an antielectron. The three quarks inside a proton
 normally do not have enough energy to change into antielectrons, but very occasionally one of them may acquire
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (6 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 sufficient energy to make the transition because the uncertainty principle means that the energy of the quarks inside the
 proton cannot be fixed exactly. The proton would then decay. The probability of a quark gaining sufficient energy is so
 low that one is likely to have to wait at least a million million million million million years (1 followed by thirty zeros). This is
 much longer than the time since the big bang, which is a mere ten thousand million years or so (1 followed by ten zeros).
 Thus one might think that the possibility of spontaneous proton decay could not be tested experimentally. However, one
 can increase one’s chances of detecting a decay by observing a large amount of matter containing a very large number
 of protons. (If, for example, one observed a number of protons equal to 1 followed by thirty-one zeros for a period of one
 year, one would expect, according to the simplest GUT, to observe more than one proton decay.)
 A number of such experiments have been carried out, but none have yielded definite evidence of proton or neutron
 decay. One experiment used eight thousand tons of water and was performed in the Morton Salt Mine in Ohio (to avoid
 other events taking place, caused by cosmic rays, that might be confused with proton decay). Since no spontaneous
 proton decay had been observed during the experiment, one can calculate that the probable life of the proton must be
 greater than ten million million million million million years (1 with thirty-one zeros). This is longer than the lifetime
 predicted by the simplest grand unified theory, but there are more elaborate theories in which the predicted lifetimes are
 longer. Still more sensitive experiments involving even larger quantities of matter will be needed to test them.
 Even though it is very difficult to observe spontaneous proton decay, it may be that our very existence is a consequence
 of the reverse process, the production of protons, or more simply, of quarks, from an initial situation in which there were
 no more quarks than antiquarks, which is the most natural way to imagine the universe starting out. Matter on the earth is
 made up mainly of protons and neutrons, which in turn are made up of quarks. There are no antiprotons or antineutrons,
 made up from antiquarks, except for a few that physicists produce in large particle accelerators. We have evidence from
 cosmic rays that the same is true for all the matter in our galaxy: there are no antiprotons or antineutrons apart from a
 small number that are produced as particle/ antiparticle pairs in high-energy collisions. If there were large regions of
 antimatter in our galaxy, we would expect to observe large quantities of radiation from the borders between the regions of
 matter and antimatter, where many particles would be colliding with their anti-particles, annihilating each other and giving
 off high-energy radiation.
 We have no direct evidence as to whether the matter in other galaxies is made up of protons and neutrons or antiprotons
 and anti-neutrons, but it must be one or the other: there cannot be a mixture in a single galaxy because in that case we
 would again observe a lot of radiation from annihilations. We therefore believe that all galaxies are composed of quarks
 rather than antiquarks; it seems implausible that some galaxies should be matter and some antimatter.
 Why should there be so many more quarks than antiquarks? Why are there not equal numbers of each? It is certainly
 fortunate for us that the numbers are unequal because, if they had been the same, nearly all the quarks and antiquarks
 would have annihilated each other in the early universe and left a universe filled with radiation but hardly any matter.
 There would then have been no galaxies, stars, or planets on which human life could have developed. Luckily, grand
 unified theories may provide an explanation of why the universe should now contain more quarks than antiquarks, even if
 it started out with equal numbers of each. As we have seen, GUTs allow quarks to change into antielectrons at high
 energy. They also allow the reverse processes, antiquarks turning into electrons, and electrons and antielectrons turning
 into antiquarks and quarks. There was a time in the very early universe when it was so hot that the particle energies
 would have been high enough for these transformations to take place. But why should that lead to more quarks than
 antiquarks? The reason is that the laws of physics are not quite the same for particles and antiparticles.
 Up to 1956 it was believed that the laws of physics obeyed each of three separate symmetries called C, P, and T. The
 symmetry C means that the laws are the same for particles and antiparticles. The symmetry P means that the laws are
 the same for any situation and its mirror image (the mirror image of a particle spinning in a right-handed direction is one
 spinning in a left-handed direction). The symmetry T means that if you reverse the direction of motion of all particles and
 antiparticles, the system should go back to what it was at earlier times; in other words, the laws are the same in the
 forward and backward directions of time. In 1956 two American physicists, Tsung-Dao Lee and Chen Ning Yang,
 suggested that the weak force does not in fact obey the symmetry P. In other words, the weak force would make the
 universe develop in a different way from the way in which the mirror image of the universe would develop. The same
 year, a colleague, Chien-Shiung Wu, proved their prediction correct. She did this by lining up the nuclei of radioactive
 atoms in a magnetic field, so that they were all spinning in the same direction, and showed that the electrons were given
 off more in one direction than another. The following year, Lee and Yang received the Nobel Prize for their idea. It was
 also found that the weak force did not obey the symmetry C. That is, it would cause a universe composed of antiparticles
 to behave differently from our universe. Nevertheless, it seemed that the weak force did obey the combined symmetry
 CP. That is, the universe would develop in the same way as its mirror image if, in addition, every particle was swapped
 with its antiparticle! However, in 1964 two more Americans, J. W. Cronin and Val Fitch, discovered that even the CP
 symmetry was not obeyed in the decay of certain particles called K-mesons. Cronin and Fitch eventually received the
 Nobel Prize for their work in 1980. (A lot of prizes have been awarded for showing that the universe is not as simple as
 we might have thought!)
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (7 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 There is a mathematical theorem that says that any theory that obeys quantum mechanics and relativity must always
 obey the combined symmetry CPT. In other words, the universe would have to behave the same if one replaced particles
 by antiparticles, took the mirror image, and also reversed the direction of time. But Cronin and Fitch showed that if one
 replaces particles by antiparticles and takes the mirror image, but does not reverse the direction of time, then the
 universe does not behave the same. The laws of physics, therefore, must change if one reverses the direction of time –
 they do not obey the symmetry T.
 Certainly the early universe does not obey the symmetry T: as time runs forward the universe expands – if it ran
 backward, the universe would be contracting. And since there are forces that do not obey the symmetry T, it follows that
 as the universe expands, these forces could cause more antielectrons to turn into quarks than electrons into antiquarks.
 Then, as the universe expanded and cooled, the antiquarks would annihilate with the quarks, but since there would be
 more quarks than antiquarks, a small excess of quarks would remain. It is these that make up the matter we see today
 and out of which we ourselves are made. Thus our very existence could be regarded as a confirmation of grand unified
 theories, though a qualitative one only; the uncertainties are such that one cannot predict the numbers of quarks that will
 be left after the annihilation, or even whether it would be quarks or antiquarks that would remain. (Had it been an excess
 of antiquarks, however, we would simply have named antiquarks quarks, and quarks antiquarks.)
 Grand unified theories do not include the force of gravity. This does not matter too much, because gravity is such a weak
 force that its effects can usually be neglected when we are dealing with elementary particles or atoms. However, the fact
 that it is both long range and always attractive means that its effects all add up. So for a sufficiently large number of
 matter particles, gravitational forces can dominate over all other forces. This is why it is gravity that determines the
 evolution of the universe. Even for objects the size of stars, the attractive force of gravity can win over all the other forces
 and cause the star to collapse. My work in the 1970s focused on the black holes that can result from such stellar collapse
 and the intense gravitational fields around them. It was this that led to the first hints of how the theories of quantum
 mechanics and general relativity might affect each other – a glimpse of the shape of a quantum theory of gravity yet to
 come.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 5
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/d.html (8 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:14:54 AM]
 CHAPTER 6
 BLACK HOLES
 The term black hole is of very recent origin. It was coined in 1969 by the American scientist John Wheeler as a graphic
 description of an idea that goes back at least two hundred years, to a time when there were two theories about light:
 one, which Newton favored, was that it was composed of particles; the other was that it was made of waves. We now
 know that really both theories are correct. By the wave/particle duality of quantum mechanics, light can be regarded as
 both a wave and a particle. Under the theory that light is made up of waves, it was not clear how it would respond to
 gravity. But if light is composed of particles, one might expect them to be affected by gravity in the same way that
 cannonballs, rockets, and planets are. At first people thought that particles of light traveled infinitely fast, so gravity
 would not have been able to slow them down, but the discovery by Roemer that light travels at a finite speed meant that
 gravity might have an important effect.
 On this assumption, a Cambridge don, John Michell, wrote a paper in 1783 in the Philosophical Transactions of the
 Royal Society of London in which he pointed out that a star that was sufficiently massive and compact would have such
 a strong gravitational field that light could not escape: any light emitted from the surface of the star would be dragged
 back by the star’s gravitational attraction before it could get very far. Michell suggested that there might be a large
 number of stars like this. Although we would not be able to see them because the light from them would not reach us,
 we would still feel their gravitational attraction. Such objects are what we now call black holes, because that is what
 they are: black voids in space. A similar suggestion was made a few years later by the French scientist the Marquis de
 Laplace, apparently independently of Michell. Interestingly enough, Laplace included it in only the first and second
 editions of his book The System of the World, and left it out of later editions; perhaps he decided that it was a crazy
 idea. (Also, the particle theory of light went out of favor during the nineteenth century; it seemed that everything could
 be explained by the wave theory, and according to the wave theory, it was not clear that light would be affected by
 gravity at all.)
 In fact, it is not really consistent to treat light like cannonballs in Newton’s theory of gravity because the speed of light is
 fixed. (A cannonball fired upward from the earth will be slowed down by gravity and will eventually stop and fall back; a
 photon, however, must continue upward at a constant speed. How then can Newtonian grav-ity affect light?) A
 consistent theory of how gravity affects light did not come along until Einstein proposed general relativity in 1915. And
 even then it was a long time before the implications of the theory for massive stars were understood.
 To understand how a black hole might be formed, we first need an understanding of the life cycle of a star. A star is
 formed when a large amount of gas (mostly hydrogen) starts to collapse in on itself due to its gravitational attraction. As
 it contracts, the atoms of the gas collide with each other more and more frequently and at greater and greater speeds –
 the gas heats up. Eventually, the gas will be so hot that when the hydrogen atoms collide they no longer bounce off
 each other, but instead coalesce to form helium. The heat released in this reaction, which is like a controlled hydrogen
 bomb explosion, is what makes the star shine. This additional heat also increases the pressure of the gas until it is
 sufficient to balance the gravitational attraction, and the gas stops contracting. It is a bit like a balloon – there is a
 balance between the pressure of the air inside, which is trying to make the balloon expand, and the tension in the
 rubber, which is trying to make the balloon smaller. Stars will remain stable like this for a long time, with heat from the
 nuclear reactions balancing the gravitational attraction. Eventually, however, the star will run out of its hydrogen and
 other nuclear fuels. Paradoxically, the more fuel a star starts off with, the sooner it runs out. This is because the more
 massive the star is, the hotter it needs to be to balance its gravitational attraction. And the hotter it is, the faster it will
 use up its fuel. Our sun has probably got enough fuel for another five thousand million years or so, but more massive
 stars can use up their fuel in as little as one hundred million years, much less than the age of the universe. When a star
 runs out of fuel, it starts to cool off and so to contract. What might happen to it then was first understood only at the end
 of the 1920s.
 In 1928 an Indian graduate student, Subrahmanyan Chandrasekhar, set sail for England to study at Cambridge with the
 British astronomer Sir Arthur Eddington, an expert on general relativity. (According to some accounts, a journalist told
 Eddington in the early 1920s that he had heard there were only three people in the world who understood general
 relativity. Eddington paused, then replied, “I am trying to think who the third person is.”) During his voyage from India,
 Chandrasekhar worked out how big a star could be and still support itself against its own gravity after it had used up all
 its fuel. The idea was this: when the star becomes small, the matter particles get very near each other, and so
 according to the Pauli exclusion principle, they must have very different velocities. This makes them move away from
 each other and so tends to make the star expand. A star can therefore maintain itself at a constant radius by a balance
 between the attraction of gravity and the repulsion that arises from the exclusion principle, just as earlier in its life
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (1 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 gravity was balanced by the heat.
 Chandrasekhar realized, however, that there is a limit to the repulsion that the exclusion principle can provide. The
 theory of relativity limits the maximum difference in the velocities of the matter particles in the star to the speed of light.
 This means that when the star got sufficiently dense, the repulsion caused by the exclusion principle would be less than
 the attraction of gravity. Chandrasekhar calculated that a cold star of more than about one and a half times the mass of
 the sun would not be able to support itself against its own gravity. (This mass is now known as the Chandrasekhar
 limit.) A similar discovery was made about the same time by the Russian scientist Lev Davidovich Landau.
 This had serious implications for the ultimate fate of massive stars. If a star’s mass is less than the Chandrasekhar limit,
 it can eventually stop contracting and settle down to a possible final state as a “white dwarf” with a radius of a few
 thousand miles and a density of hundreds of tons per cubic inch. A white dwarf is supported by the exclusion principle
 repulsion between the electrons in its matter. We observe a large number of these white dwarf stars. One of the first to
 be discovered is a star that is orbiting around Sirius, the brightest star in the night sky.
 Landau pointed out that there was another possible final state for a star, also with a limiting mass of about one or two
 times the mass of the sun but much smaller even than a white dwarf. These stars would be supported by the exclusion
 principle repulsion between neutrons and protons, rather than between electrons. They were therefore called neutron
 stars. They would have a radius of only ten miles or so and a density of hundreds of millions of tons per cubic inch. At
 the time they were first predicted, there was no way that neutron stars could be observed. They were not actually
 detected until much later.
 Stars with masses above the Chandrasekhar limit, on the other hand, have a big problem when they come to the end of
 their fuel. In some cases they may explode or manage to throw off enough matter to reduce their mass below the limit
 and so avoid catastrophic gravitational collapse, but it was difficult to believe that this always happened, no matter how
 big the star. How would it know that it had to lose weight? And even if every star managed to lose enough mass to
 avoid collapse, what would happen if you added more mass to a white dwarf 'or neutron star to take it over the limit?
 Would it collapse to infinite density? Eddington was shocked by that implication, and he refused to believe
 Chandrasekhar’s result. Eddington thought it was simply not possible that a star could collapse to a point. This was the
 view of most scientists: Einstein himself wrote a paper in which he claimed that stars would not shrink to zero size. The
 hostility of other scientists, particularly Eddington, his former teacher and the leading authority on the structure of stars,
 persuaded Chandrasekhar to abandon this line of work and turn instead to other problems in astronomy, such as the
 motion of star clusters. However, when he was awarded the Nobel Prize in 1983, it was, at least in part, for his early
 work on the limiting mass of cold stars.
 Chandrasekhar had shown that the exclusion principle could not halt the collapse of a star more massive than the
 Chandrasekhar limit, but the problem of understanding what would happen to such a star, according to general
 relativity, was first solved by a young American, Robert Oppenheimer, in 1939. His result, however, suggested that
 there would be no observational consequences that could be detected by the telescopes of the day. Then World War II
 intervened and Oppenheimer himself became closely involved in the atom bomb project. After the war the problem of
 gravitational collapse was largely forgotten as most scientists became caught up in what happens on the scale of the
 atom and its nucleus. In the 1960s, however, interest in the large-scale problems of astronomy and cosmology was
 revived by a great increase in the number and range of astronomical observations brought about by the application of
 modern technology. Oppenheimer’s work was then rediscovered and extended by a number of people.
 The picture that we now have from Oppenheimer’s work is as follows. The gravitational field of the star changes the
 paths of light rays in space-time from what they would have been had the star not been present. The light cones, which
 indicate the paths followed in space and time by flashes of light emitted from their tips, are bent slightly inward near the
 surface of the star. This can be seen in the bending of light from distant stars observed during an eclipse of the sun. As
 the star contracts, the gravitational field at its surface gets stronger and the light cones get bent inward more. This
 makes it more difficult for light from the star to escape, and the light appears dimmer and redder to an observer at a
 distance. Eventually, when the star has shrunk to a certain critical radius, the gravitational field at the surface becomes
 so strong that the light cones are bent inward so much that light can no longer escape Figure 6:1.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (2 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 Figure 6:1
 According to the theory of relativity, nothing can travel faster than light. Thus if light cannot escape, neither can anything
 else; everything is dragged back by the gravitational field. So one has a set of events, a region of space-time, from
 which it is not possible to escape to reach a distant observer. This region is what we now call a black hole. Its boundary
 is called the event horizon and it coincides with the paths of light rays that just fail to escape from the black hole.
 In order to understand what you would see if you were watching a star collapse to form a black hole, one has to
 remember that in the theory of relativity there is no absolute time. Each observer has his own measure of time. The time
 for someone on a star will be different from that for someone at a distance, because of the gravitational field of the star.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (3 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 Suppose an intrepid astronaut on the surface of the collapsing star, collapsing inward with it, sent a signal every
 second, according to his watch, to his spaceship orbiting about the star. At some time on his watch, say 11:00, the star
 would shrink below the critical radius at which the gravitational field becomes so strong nothing can escape, and his
 signals would no longer reach the spaceship. As 11:00 approached his companions watching from the spaceship would
 find the intervals between successive signals from the astronaut getting longer and longer, but this effect would be very
 small before 10:59:59. They would have to wait only very slightly more than a second between the astronaut’s 10:59:58
 signal and the one that he sent when his watch read 10:59:59, but they would have to wait forever for the 11:00 signal.
 The light waves emitted from the surface of the star between 10:59:59 and 11:00, by the astronaut’s watch, would be
 spread out over an infinite period of time, as seen from the spaceship. The time interval between the arrival of
 successive waves at the spaceship would get longer and longer, so the light from the star would appear redder and
 redder and fainter and fainter. Eventually, the star would be so dim that it could no longer be seen from the spaceship:
 all that would be left would be a black hole in space. The star would, however, continue to exert the same gravitational
 force on the spaceship, which would continue to orbit the black hole. This scenario is not entirely realistic, however,
 because of the following problem. Gravity gets weaker the farther you are from the star, so the gravitational force on our
 intrepid astronaut’s feet would always be greater than the force on his head. This difference in the forces would stretch
 our astronaut out like spaghetti or tear him apart before the star had contracted to the critical radius at which the event
 horizon formed! However, we believe that there are much larger objects in the universe, like the central regions of
 galaxies, that can also undergo gravitational collapse to produce black holes; an astronaut on one of these would not be
 torn apart before the black hole formed. He would not, in fact, feel anything special as he reached the critical radius,
 and could pass the point of no return without noticing it However, within just a few hours, as the region continued to
 collapse, the difference in the gravitational forces on his head and his feet would become so strong that again it would
 tear him apart.
 The work that Roger Penrose and I did between 1965 and 1970 showed that, according to general relativity, there must
 be a singularity of infinite density and space-time curvature within a black hole. This is rather like the big bang at the
 beginning of time, only it would be an end of time for the collapsing body and the astronaut. At this singularity the laws
 of science and our ability to predict the future would break down. However, any observer who remained outside the
 black hole would not be affected by this failure of predictability, because neither light nor any other signal could reach
 him from the singularity. This remarkable fact led Roger Penrose to propose the cosmic censorship hypothesis, which
 might be paraphrased as “God abhors a naked singularity.” In other words, the singularities produced by gravitational
 collapse occur only in places, like black holes, where they are decently hidden from outside view by an event horizon.
 Strictly, this is what is known as the weak cosmic censorship hypothesis: it protects observers who remain outside the
 black hole from the consequences of the breakdown of predictability that occurs at the singularity, but it does nothing at
 all for the poor unfortunate astronaut who falls into the hole.
 There are some solutions of the equations of general relativity in which it is possible for our astronaut to see a naked
 singularity: he may be able to avoid hitting the singularity and instead fall through a "wormhole” and come out in another
 region of the universe. This would offer great possibilities for travel in space and time, but unfortunately it seems that
 these solutions may all be highly unstable; the least disturbance, such as the presence of an astronaut, may change
 them so that the astronaut could not see the singularity until he hit it and his time came to an end. In other words, the
 singularity would always lie in his future and never in his past. The strong version of the cosmic censorship hypothesis
 states that in a realistic solution, the singularities would always lie either entirely in the future (like the singularities of
 gravitational collapse) or entirely in the past (like the , big bang). I strongly believe in cosmic censorship so I bet Kip
 Thorne and John Preskill of Cal Tech that it would always hold. I lost the bet on a technicality because examples were
 produced of solutions with a singularity that was visible from a long way away. So I had to pay up, which according to
 the terms of the bet meant I had to clothe their nakedness. But I can claim a moral victory. The naked singularities were
 unstable: the least disturbance would cause them either to disappear or to be hidden behind an event horizon. So they
 would not occur in realistic situations.
 The event horizon, the boundary of the region of space-time from which it is not possible to escape, acts rather like a
 one-way membrane around the black hole: objects, such as unwary astronauts, can fall through the event horizon into
 the black hole, but nothing can ever get out of the black hole through the event horizon. (Remember that the event
 horizon is the path in space-time of light that is trying to escape from the black hole, and nothing can travel faster than
 light.) One could well say of the event horizon what the poet Dante said of the entrance to Hell: “All hope abandon, ye
 who enter here.” Anything or anyone who falls through the event horizon will soon reach the region of infinite density
 and the end of time.
 General relativity predicts that heavy objects that are moving will cause the emission of gravitational waves, ripples in
 the curvature of space that travel at the speed of light. These are similar to light waves, which are ripples of the
 electromagnetic field, but they are much harder to detect. They can be observed by the very slight change in separation
 they produce between neighboring freely moving objects. A number of detectors are being built in the United States,
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (4 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 Europe, and Japan that will measure displacements of one part in a thousand million million million (1 with twenty-one
 zeros after it), or less than the nucleus of an atom over a distance of ten miles.
 Like light, gravitational waves carry energy away from the objects that emit them. One would therefore expect a system
 of massive objects to settle down eventually to a stationary state, because the energy in any movement would be
 carried away by the emission of gravitational waves. (It is rather like dropping a cork into water: at first it bobs up and
 down a great deal, but as the ripples carry away its energy, it eventually settles down to a stationary state.) For
 example, the movement of the earth in its orbit round the sun produces gravitational waves. The effect of the energy
 loss will be to change the orbit of the earth so that gradually it gets nearer and nearer to the sun, eventually collides with
 it, and settles down to a stationary state. The rate of energy loss in the case of the earth and the sun is very low – about
 enough to run a small electric heater. This means it will take about a thousand million million million million years for the
 earth to run into the sun, so there’s no immediate cause for worry! The change in the orbit of the earth is too slow to be
 observed, but this same effect has been observed over the past few years occurring in the system called PSR 1913 +
 16 (PSR stands for “pulsar,” a special type of neutron star that emits regular pulses of radio waves). This system
 contains two neutron stars orbiting each other, and the energy they are losing by the emission of gravitational waves is
 causing them to spiral in toward each other. This confirmation of general relativity won J. H. Taylor and R. A. Hulse the
 Nobel Prize in 1993. It will take about three hundred million . years for them to collide. Just before they do, they will be
 orbiting so fast that they will emit enough gravitational waves for detectors like LIGO to pick up.
 During the gravitational collapse of a star to form a black hole, the movements would be much more rapid, so the rate at
 which energy is carried away would be much higher. It would therefore not be too long ' before it settled down to a
 stationary state. What would this final stage look like? One might suppose that it would depend on all the complex
 features of the star from which it had formed – not only its mass and rate of rotation, but also the different densities of
 various parts of the star, and the complicated movements of the gases within the star. And if black holes were as varied
 as the objects that collapsed to form them, it might be very difficult to make any predictions about black holes in
 general.
 In 1967, however, the study of black holes was revolutionized by Werner Israel, a Canadian scientist (who was born in
 Berlin, brought up in South Africa, and took his doctoral degree in Ireland). Israel showed that, according to general
 relativity, non-rotating black holes must be very simple; they were perfectly spherical, their size depended only on their
 mass, and any two such black holes with the same mass were identical. They could, in fact, be described by a
 particular solution of Einstein’s equations that had been known since 1917, found by Karl Schwarzschild shortly after
 the discovery of general relativity. At first many people, including Israel himself, argued that since black holes had to be
 perfectly spherical, a black hole could only form from the collapse of a perfectly spherical object. Any real star – which
 would never be perfectly spherical – could therefore only collapse to form a naked singularity.
 There was, however, a different interpretation of Israel’s result, which was advocated by Roger Penrose and John
 Wheeler in particular. They argued that the rapid movements involved in a star’s collapse would mean that the
 gravitational waves it gave off would make it ever more spherical, and by the time it had settled down to a stationary
 state, it would be precisely spherical. According to this view, any non-rotating star, however complicated its shape and
 internal structure, would end up after gravitational collapse as a perfectly spherical black hole, whose size would
 depend only on its mass. Further calculations supported this view, and it soon came to be adopted generally.
 Israel’s result dealt with the case of black holes formed from non-rotating bodies only. In 1963, Roy Kerr, a New
 Zealander, found a set of solutions of the equations of general relativity that described rotating black holes. These
 “Kerr” black holes rotate at a constant rate, their size and shape depending only on their mass and rate of rotation. If the
 rotation is zero, the black hole is perfectly round and the solution is identical to the Schwarzschild solution. If the
 rotation is non-zero, the black hole bulges outward near its equator (just as the earth or the sun bulge due to their
 rotation), and the faster it rotates, the more it bulges. So, to extend Israel’s result to include rotating bodies, it was
 conjectured that any rotating body that collapsed to form a black hole would eventually settle down to a stationary state
 described by the Kerr solution. In 1970 a colleague and fellow research student of mine at Cambridge, Brandon Carter,
 took the first step toward proving this conjecture. He showed that, provided a stationary rotating black hole had an axis
 of symmetry, like a spinning top, its size and shape would depend only on its mass and rate of rotation. Then, in 1971, I
 proved that any stationary rotating black hole would indeed have such an axis of symmetry. Finally, in 1973, David
 Robinson at Kings College, London, used Carter’s and my results to show that the conjecture had been correct: such a
 black hole had indeed to be the Kerr solution. So after gravitational collapse a black hole must settle down into a state
 in which it could be rotating, but not pulsating. Moreover, its size and shape would depend only on its mass and rate of
 rotation, and not on the nature of the body that had collapsed to form it. This result became known by the maxim: “A
 black hole has no hair.” The “no hair” theorem is of great practical importance, because it so greatly restricts the
 possible types of black holes. One can therefore make detailed models of objects that might contain black holes and
 compare the predictions of the models with observations. It also means that a very large amount of information about
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (5 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 the body that has collapsed must be lost when a black hole is formed, because afterward all we can possibly measure
 about the body is its mass and rate of rotation. The significance of this will be seen in the next chapter.
 Black holes are one of only a fairly small number of cases in the history of science in which a theory was developed in
 great detail as a mathematical model before there was any evidence from observations that it was correct. Indeed, this
 used to be the main argument of opponents of black holes: how could one believe in objects for which the only
 evidence was calculations based on the dubious theory of general relativity? In 1963, however, Maarten Schmidt, an
 astronomer at the Palomar Observatory in California, measured the red shift of a faint starlike object in the direction of
 the source of radio waves called 3C273 (that is, source number 273 in the third Cambridge catalogue of radio sources).
 He found it was too large to be caused by a gravitational field: if it had been a gravitational red shift, the object would
 have to be so massive and so near to us that it would disturb the orbits of planets in the Solar System. This suggested
 that the red shift was instead caused by the expansion of the universe, which, in turn, meant that the object was a very
 long distance away. And to be visible at such a great distance, the object must be very bright, must, in other words, be
 emitting a huge amount of energy. The only mechanism that people could think of that would produce such large
 quantities of energy seemed to be the gravitational collapse not just of a star but of a whole central region of a galaxy. A
 number of other similar “quasi-stellar objects,” or quasars, have been discovered, all with large red shifts. But they are
 all too far away and therefore too difficult to observe to provide conclusive evidence of black holes.
 Further encouragement for the existence of black holes came in 1967 with the discovery by a research student at
 Cambridge, Jocelyn Bell-Burnell, of objects in the sky that were emitting regular pulses of radio waves. At first Bell and
 her supervisor, Antony Hewish, thought they might have made contact with an alien civilization in the galaxy! Indeed, at
 the seminar at which they announced their discovery, I remember that they called the first four sources to be found
 LGM 1 – 4, LGM standing for “Little Green Men.” In the end, however, they and everyone else came to the less
 romantic conclusion that these objects, which were given the name pulsars, were in fact rotating neutron stars that were
 emitting pulses of radio waves because of a complicated interaction between their magnetic fields and surrounding
 matter. This was bad news for writers of space westerns, but very hopeful for the small number of us who believed in
 black holes at that time: it was the first positive evidence that neutron stars existed. A neutron star has a radius of about
 ten miles, only a few times the critical radius at which a star becomes a black hole. If a star could collapse to such a
 small size, it is not unreasonable to expect that other stars could collapse to even smaller size and become black holes.
 How could we hope to detect a black hole, as by its very definition it does not emit any light? It might seem a bit like
 looking for a black cat in a coal cellar. Fortunately, there is a way. As John Michell pointed out in his pioneering paper in
 1783, a black hole still exerts a gravitational fierce on nearby objects. Astronomers have observed many systems in
 which two stars orbit around each other, attracted toward each other by gravity. They also observe systems in which
 there is only one visible star that is orbiting around some unseen companion. One cannot, of course, immediately
 conclude that the companion is a black hole: it might merely be a star that is too faint to be seen. However, some of
 these systems, like the one called Cygnus X-1 Figure 6:2, are also strong sources of X-rays.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (6 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 Figure 6:2
 The best explanation for this phenomenon is that matter has been blown off the surface of the visible star. As it falls
 toward the unseen companion, it develops a spiral motion (rather like water running out of a bath), and it gets very hot,
 emitting X-rays Figure 6:3.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (7 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 Figure 6:3
 For this mechanism to work, the unseen object has to be very small, like a white dwarf, neutron star, or black hole.
 From the observed orbit of the visible star, one can determine the lowest possible mass of the unseen object. In the
 case of Cygnus X-l, this is about six times the mass of the sun, which, according to Chandrasekhar’r result, is too great
 for the unseen object to be a white dwarf. It is also too large a mass to be a neutron star. It seems, therefore, that it
 must be a black hole.
 There are other models to explain Cygnus X-1 that do not include a black hole, but they are all rather far-fetched. A
 black hole seems to be the only really natural explanation of the observations. Despite this, I had a bet with Kip Thorne
 of the California Institute of Technology that in fact Cygnus X-1 does not contain a black hole! This was a form f
 insurance policy for me. I have done a lot of work on black holes, and it would all be wasted if it turned out that black
 holes do not exist. But in that case, I would have the consolation of winning my bet, which would bring me four years of
 the magazine Private Eye. In fact, although the situation with Cygnus X-1 has not changed much since we made the bet
 in 1975, there is now so much other observational evidence in favor of black holes that I have conceded the bet. I paid
 the specified penalty, which was a one-year subscription to Penthouse, to the outrage of Kip’s liberated wife.
 We also now have evidence for several other black holes in systems like Cygnus X-1 in our galaxy and in two
 neighboring galaxies called the Magellanic Clouds. The number of black holes, however, is almost certainly very much
 higher; in the long history of the universe, many stars must have burned all their nuclear fuel and have had to collapse.
 The number of black holes may well be greater even than the number of visible stars, which totals about a hundred
 thousand million in our galaxy alone. The extra gravitational attraction of such a large number of black holes could
 explain why our galaxy rotates at the rate it does: the mass of the visible stars is insufficient to account for this. We also
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (8 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 have some evidence that there is a much larger black hole, with a mass of about a hundred thousand times that of the
 sun, at the center of our galaxy. Stars in the galaxy that come too near this black hole will be torn apart by the
 difference in the gravitational forces on their near and far sides. Their remains and gas that is thrown off other stars, will
 fall toward the black hole. As in the case of Cygnus X-l, the gas will spiral inward and will heat up, though not as much
 as in that case. It will not get hot enough to emit X rays, but it could account for the very compact source of radio waves
 and infrared rays that is observed at the galactic center.
 It is thought that similar but even larger black holes, with masses of about a hundred million times the mass of the sun,
 occur at the centers of quasars. For example, observations with the Hubble telescope of the galaxy known as M87
 reveal that it contains a disk of gas 130 light-years across rotating about a central object two thousand million times the
 mass of the sun. This can only be a black hole. Matter falling into such a supermassive black hole would provide the
 only source of power great enough to explain the enormous amounts of energy that these objects are emitting. As the
 matter spirals into the black hole, it would make the black hole rotate in the same direction, causing it to develop a
 magnetic field rather like that of the earth. Very high-energy particles would be generated near the black hole by the
 in-falling matter. The magnetic field would be so strong that it could focus these particles into jets ejected outward along
 the axis of rotation of the black hole, that is, in the directions of its north and south poles. Such jets are indeed observed
 in a number of galaxies and quasars. One can also consider the possibility that there might be black holes with masses
 much less than that of the sun. Such black holes could not be formed by gravitational collapse, because their masses
 are below the Chandrasekhar mass limit: stars of this low mass can support themselves against the force of gravity
 even when they have exhausted their nuclear fuel. Low-mass black holes could form only if matter was compressed to
 enormous densities by very large external pressures. Such conditions could occur in a very big hydrogen bomb: the
 physicist John Wheeler once calculated that if one took all the heavy water in all the oceans of the world, one could
 build a hydrogen bomb that would compress matter at the center so much that a black hole would be created. (Of
 course, there would be no one left to observe it!) A more practical possibility is that such low-mass black holes might
 have been formed in the high temperatures and pressures of the very early universe. Black holes would have been
 formed only if the early universe had not been perfectly smooth and uniform, because only a small region that was
 denser than average could be compressed in this way to form a black hole. But we know that there must have been
 some irregularities, because otherwise the matter in the universe would still be perfectly uniformly distributed at the
 present epoch, instead of being clumped together in stars and galaxies.
 Whether the irregularities required to account for stars and galaxies would have led to the formation of a significant
 number of “primordial” black holes clearly depends on the details of the conditions in the early universe. So if we could
 determine how many primordial black holes there are now, we would learn a lot about the very early stages of the
 universe. Primordial black holes with masses more than a thousand million tons (the mass of a large mountain) could
 be detected only by their gravitational influence on other, visible matter or on the expansion of the universe. However,
 as we shall learn in the next chapter, black holes are not really black after all: they glow like a hot body, and the smaller
 they are, the more they glow. So, paradoxically, smaller black holes might actually turn out to be easier to detect than
 large ones!
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 6
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/e.html (9 of 9) [2/20/2001 3:15:08 AM]
 CHAPTER 7
 BLACK HOLES AIN’T SO BLACK
 Before 1970, my research on general relativity had concentrated mainly on the question of whether or not there had
 been a big bang singularity. However, one evening in November that year, shortly after the birth of my daughter, Lucy,
 I started to think about black holes as I was getting into bed. My disability makes this rather a slow process, so I had
 plenty of time. At that date there was no precise definition of which points in space-time lay inside a black hole and
 which lay outside. I had already discussed with Roger Penrose the idea of defining a black hole as the set of events
 from which it was not possible to escape to a large distance, which is now the generally accepted definition. It means
 that the boundary of the black hole, the event horizon, is formed by the light rays that just fail to escape from the black
 hole, hovering forever just on the edge Figure 7:1. It is a bit like running away from the police and just managing to
 keep one step ahead but not being able to get clear away!
 Figure 7:1
 Suddenly I realized that the paths of these light rays could never approach one another. If they did they must
 eventually run into one another. It would be like meeting someone else running away from the police in the opposite
 direction – you would both be caught! (Or, in this case, fall into a black hole.) But if these light rays were swallowed up
 by the black hole, then they could not have been on the boundary of the black hole. So the paths of light rays in the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (1 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 event horizon had always to be moving parallel to, or away from, each other. Another way of seeing this is that the
 event horizon, the boundary of the black hole, is like the edge of a shadow – the shadow of impending doom. If you
 look at the shadow cast by a source at a great distance, such as the sun, you will see that the rays of light in the edge
 are not approaching each other.
 If the rays of light that form the event horizon, the boundary of the black hole, can never approach each other, the area
 of the event horizon might stay the same or increase with time, but it could never decrease because that would mean
 that at least some of the rays of light in the boundary would have to be approaching each other. In fact, the area would
 increase whenever matter or radiation fell into the black hole Figure 7:2.
 Figures 7:2 & 7:3
 Or if two black holes collided and merged together to form a single black hole, the area of the event horizon of the final
 black hole would be greater than or equal to the sum of the areas of the event horizons of the original black holes
 Figure 7:3. This nondecreasing property of the event horizon’s area placed an important restriction on the possible
 behavior of black holes. I was so excited with my discovery that I did not get much sleep that night. The next day I rang
 up Roger Penrose. He agreed with me. I think, in fact, that he had been aware of this property of the area. However,
 he had been using a slightly different definition of a black hole. He had not realized that the boundaries of the black
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (2 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 hole according to the two definitions would be the same, and hence so would their areas, provided the black hole had
 settled down to a state in which it was not changing with time.
 The nondecreasing behavior of a black hole’s area was very reminiscent of the behavior of a physical quantity called
 entropy, which measures the degree of disorder of a system. It is a matter of common experience that disorder will
 tend to increase if things are left to themselves. (One has only to stop making repairs around the house to see that!)
 One can create order out of disorder (for example, one can paint the house), but that requires expenditure of effort or
 energy and so decreases the amount of ordered energy available.
 A precise statement of this idea is known as the second law of thermodynamics. It states that the entropy of an isolated
 system always increases, and that when two systems are joined together, the entropy of the combined system is
 greater than the sum of the entropies of the individual systems. For example, consider a system of gas molecules in a
 box. The molecules can be thought of as little billiard balls continually colliding with each other and bouncing off the
 walls of the box. The higher the temperature of the gas, the faster the molecules move, and so the more frequently and
 harder they collide with the walls of the box and the greater the outward pressure they exert on the walls. Suppose that
 initially the molecules are all confined to the left-hand side of the box by a partition. If the partition is then removed, the
 molecules will tend to spread out and occupy both halves of the box. At some later time they could, by chance, all be in
 the right half or back in the left half, but it is overwhelmingly more probable that there will be roughly equal numbers in
 the two halves. Such a state is less ordered, or more disordered, than the original state in which all the molecules were
 in one half. One therefore says that the entropy of the gas has gone up. Similarly, suppose one starts with two boxes,
 one containing oxygen molecules and the other containing nitrogen molecules. If one joins the boxes together and
 removes the intervening wall, the oxygen and the nitrogen molecules will start to mix. At a later time the most probable
 state would be a fairly uniform mixture of oxygen and nitrogen molecules throughout the two boxes. This state would
 be less ordered, and hence have more entropy, than the initial state of two separate boxes.
 The second law of thermodynamics has a rather different status than that of other laws of science, such as Newton's
 law of gravity, for example, because it does not hold always, just in the vast majority of cases. The probability of all the
 gas molecules in our first box
 found in one half of the box at a later time is many millions of millions to one, but it can happen. However, if one has a
 black hole around there seems to be a rather easier way of violating the second law: just throw some matter with a lot
 of entropy such as a box of gas, down the black hole. The total entropy of matter outside the black hole would go
 down. One could, of course, still say that the total entropy, including the entropy inside the black hole, has not gone
 down - but since there is no way to look inside the black hole, we cannot see how much entropy the matter inside it
 has. It would be nice, then, if there was some feature of the black hole by which observers outside the black hole could
 tell its entropy, and which would increase whenever matter carrying entropy fell into the black hole. Following the
 discovery, described above, that the area of the event horizon increased whenever matter fell into a black hole, a
 research student at Princeton named Jacob Bekenstein suggested that the area of the event horizon was a measure of
 the entropy of the black hole. As matter carrying entropy fell into a black hole, the area of its event horizon would go
 up, so that the sum of the entropy of matter outside black holes and the area of the horizons would never go down.
 This suggestion seemed to prevent the second law of thermodynamics from being violated in most situations.
 However, there was one fatal flaw. If a black hole has entropy, then it ought to also have a temperature. But a body
 with a particular temperature must emit radiation at a certain rate. It is a matter of common experience that if one heats
 up a poker in a fire it glows red hot and emits radiation, but bodies at lower temperatures emit radiation too; one just
 does not normally notice it because the amount is fairly small. This radiation is required in order to prevent violation of
 the second law. So black holes ought to emit radiation. But by their very definition, black holes are objects that are not
 supposed to emit anything. It therefore seemed that the area of the event horizon of a black hole could not be regarded
 as its entropy. In 1972 I wrote a paper with Brandon Carter and an American colleague, Jim Bardeen, in which we
 pointed out that although there were many similarities between entropy and the area of the event horizon, there was
 this apparently fatal difficulty. I must admit that in writing this paper I was motivated partly by irritation with Bekenstein,
 who, I felt, had misused my discovery of the increase of the area of the event horizon. However, it turned out in the end
 that he was basically correct, though in a manner he had certainly not expected.
 In September 1973, while I was visiting Moscow, I discussed black holes with two leading Soviet experts, Yakov
 Zeldovich and Alexander Starobinsky. They convinced me that, according to the quantum mechanical uncertainty
 principle, rotating black holes should create and emit particles. I believed their arguments on physical grounds, but I did
 not like the mathematical way in which they calculated the emission. I therefore set about devising a better
 mathematical treatment, which I described at an informal seminar in Oxford at the end of November 1973. At that time I
 had not done the calculations to find out how much would actually be emitted. I was expecting to discover just the
 radiation that Zeldovich and Starobinsky had predicted from rotating black holes. However, when I did the calculation, I
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (3 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 found, to my surprise and annoyance, that even non-rotating black holes should apparently create and emit particles at
 a steady rate. At first I thought that this emission indicated that one of the approximations I had used was not valid. I
 was afraid that if Bekenstein found out about it, he would use it as a further argument to support his ideas about the
 entropy of black holes, which I still did not like. However, the more I thought about it, the more it seemed that the
 approximations really ought to hold. But what finally convinced me that the emission was real was that the spectrum of
 the emitted particles was exactly that which would be emitted by a hot body, and that the black hole was emitting
 particles at exactly the correct rate to prevent violations of the second law. Since then the calculations have been
 repeated in a number of different forms by other people. They all confirm that a black hole ought to emit particles and
 radiation as if it were a hot body with a temperature that depends only on the black hole’s mass: the higher the mass,
 the lower the temperature.
 How is it possible that a black hole appears to emit particles when we know that nothing can escape from within its
 event horizon? The answer, quantum theory tells us, is that the particles do not come from within the black hole, but
 from the “empty” space just outside the black hole’s event horizon! We can understand this in the following way: what
 we think of as “empty” space cannot be completely empty because that would mean that all the fields, such as the
 gravitational and electromagnetic fields, would have to be exactly zero. However, the value of a field and its rate of
 change with time are like the position and velocity of a particle: the uncertainty principle implies that the more
 accurately one knows one of these quantities, the less accurately one can know the other. So in empty space the field
 cannot be fixed at exactly zero, because then it would have both a precise value (zero) and a precise rate of change
 (also zero). There must be a certain minimum amount of uncertainty, or quantum fluctuations, in the value of the field.
 One can think of these fluctuations as pairs of particles of light or gravity that appear together at some time, move
 apart, and then come together again and annihilate each other. These particles are virtual particles like the particles
 that carry the gravitational force of the sun: unlike real particles, they cannot be observed directly with a particle
 detector. However, their indirect effects, such as small changes in the energy of electron orbits in atoms, can be
 measured and agree with the theoretical predictions to a remarkable degree of accuracy. The uncertainty principle also
 predicts that there will be similar virtual pairs of matter particles, such as electrons or quarks. In this case, however,
 one member of the pair will be a particle and the other an antiparticle (the antiparticles of light and gravity are the same
 as the particles).
 Because energy cannot be created out of nothing, one of the partners in a particle/antiparticle pair will have positive
 energy, and the other partner negative energy. The one with negative energy is condemned to be a short-lived virtual
 particle because real particles always have positive energy in normal situations. It must therefore seek out its partner
 and annihilate with it. However, a real particle close to a massive body has less energy than if it were far away,
 because it would take energy to lift it far away against the gravitational attraction of the body. Normally, the energy of
 the particle is still positive, but the gravitational field inside a black hole is so strong that even a real particle can have
 negative energy there. It is therefore possible, if a black hole is present, for the virtual particle with negative energy to
 fall into the black hole and become a real particle or antiparticle. In this case it no longer has to annihilate with its
 partner. Its forsaken partner may fall into the black hole as well. Or, having positive energy, it might also escape from
 the vicinity of the black hole as a real particle or antiparticle Figure 7:4.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (4 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 Figure 7:4
 To an observer at a distance, it will appear to have been emitted from the black hole. The smaller the black hole, the
 shorter the distance the particle with negative energy will have to go before it becomes a real particle, and thus the
 greater the rate of emission, and the apparent temperature, of the black hole.
 The positive energy of the outgoing radiation would be balanced by a flow of negative energy particles into the black
 hole. By Einstein’s equation E = mc2 (where E is energy, m is mass, and c is the speed of light), energy is proportional
 to mass. A flow of negative energy into the black hole therefore reduces its mass. As the black hole loses mass, the
 area of its event horizon gets smaller, but this decrease in the entropy of the black hole is more than compensated for
 by the entropy of the emitted radiation, so the second law is never violated.
 Moreover, the lower the mass of the black hole, the higher its temperature. So as the black hole loses mass, its
 temperature and rate of emission increase, so it loses mass more quickly. What happens when the mass of the black
 hole eventually becomes extremely small is not quite clear, but the most reasonable guess is that it would disappear
 completely in a tremendous final burst of emission, equivalent to the explosion of millions of H-bombs.
 A black hole with a mass a few times that of the sun would have a temperature of only one ten millionth of a degree
 above absolute zero. This is much less than the temperature of the microwave radiation that fills the universe (about
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (5 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 2.7º above absolute zero), so such black holes would emit even less than they absorb. If the universe is destined to go
 on expanding forever, the temperature of the microwave radiation will eventually decrease to less than that of such a
 black hole, which will then begin to lose mass. But, even then, its temperature would be so low that it would take about
 a million million million million million million million million million million million years (1 with sixty-six zeros after it) to
 evaporate completely. This is much longer than the age of the universe, which is only about ten or twenty thousand
 million years (1 or 2 with ten zeros after it). On the other hand, as mentioned in Chapter 6, there might be primordial
 black holes with a very much smaller mass that were made by the collapse of irregularities in the very early stages of
 the universe. Such black holes would have a much higher temperature and would be emitting radiation at a much
 greater rate. A primordial black hole with an initial mass of a thousand million tons would have a lifetime roughly equal
 to the age of the universe. Primordial black holes with initial masses less than this figure would already have
 completely evaporated, but those with slightly greater masses would still be emitting radiation in the form of X rays and
 gamma rays. These X rays and gamma rays are like waves of light, but with a much shorter wavelength. Such holes
 hardly deserve the epithet black: they really are white hot and are emitting energy at a rate of about ten thousand
 megawatts.
 One such black hole could run ten large power stations, if only we could harness its power. This would be rather
 difficult, however: the black hole would have the mass of a mountain compressed into less than a million millionth of an
 inch, the size of the nucleus of an atom! If you had one of these black holes on the surface of the earth, there would be
 no way to stop it from falling through the floor to the center of the earth. It would oscillate through the earth and back,
 until eventually it settled down at the center. So the only place to put such a black hole, in which one might use the
 energy that it emitted, would be in orbit around the earth – and the only way that one could get it to orbit the earth
 would be to attract it there by towing a large mass in front of it, rather like a carrot in front of a donkey. This does not
 sound like a very practical proposition, at least not in the immediate future.
 But even if we cannot harness the emission from these primordial black holes, what are our chances of observing
 them? We could look for the gamma rays that the primordial black holes emit during most of their lifetime. Although the
 radiation from most would be very weak because they are far away, the total from all of them might be detectable. We
 do observe such a background of gamma rays: Figure 7:5 shows how the observed intensity differs at different
 frequencies (the number of waves per second). However, this background could have been, and probably was,
 generated by processes other than primordial black holes. The dotted line in Figure 7:5 shows how the intensity should
 vary with frequency for gamma rays given off by primordial black holes, if there were on average 300 per cubic
 light-year. One can therefore say that the observations of the gamma ray background do not provide any positive
 evidence for primordial black holes, but they do tell us that on average there cannot be more than 300 in every cubic
 light-year in the universe. This limit means that primordial black holes could make up at most one millionth of the
 matter in the universe.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (6 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 Figure 7:5
 With primordial black holes being so scarce, it might seem unlikely that there would be one near enough for us to
 observe as an individual source of gamma rays. But since gravity would draw primordial black holes toward any matter,
 they should be much more common in and around galaxies. So although the gamma ray background tells us that there
 can be no more than 300 primordial black holes per cubic light-year on average, it tells us nothing about how common
 they might be in our own galaxy. If they were, say, a million times more common than this, then the nearest black hole
 to us would probably be at a distance of about a thousand million kilometers, or about as far away as Pluto, the farthest
 known planet. At this distance it would still be very difficult to detect the steady emission of a black hole, even if it was
 ten thousand megawatts. In order to observe a primordial black hole one would have to detect several gamma ray
 quanta coming from the same direction within a reasonable space of time, such as a week. Otherwise, they might
 simply be part of the background. But Planck’s quantum principle tells us that each gamma ray quantum has a very
 high energy, because gamma rays have a very high frequency, so it would not take many quanta to radiate even ten
 thousand megawatts. And to observe these few coming from the distance of Pluto would require a larger gamma ray
 detector than any that have been constructed so far. Moreover, the detector would have to be in space, because
 gamma rays cannot penetrate the atmosphere.
 Of course, if a black hole as close as Pluto were to reach the end of its life and blow up, it would be easy to detect the
 final burst of emission. But if the black hole has been emitting for the last ten or twenty thousand million years, the
 chance of it reaching the end of its life within the next few years, rather than several million years in the past or future,
 is really rather small! So in order to have a reasonable chance of seeing an explosion before your research grant ran
 out, you would have to find a way to detect any explosions within a distance of about one light-year. In fact bursts of
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (7 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 gamma rays from space have been detected by satellites originally constructed to look for violations of the Test Ban
 Treaty. These seem to occur about sixteen times a month and to be roughly uniformly distributed in direction across
 the sky. This indicates that they come from outside the Solar System since otherwise we would expect them to be
 concentrated toward the plane of the orbits of the planets. The uniform distribution also indicates that the sources are
 either fairly near to us in our galaxy or right outside it at cosmological distances because otherwise, again, they would
 be concentrated toward the plane of the galaxy. In the latter case, the energy required to account for the bursts would
 be far too high to have been produced by tiny black holes, but if the sources were close in galactic terms, it might be
 possible that they were exploding black holes. I would very much like this to be the case but I have to recognize that
 there are other possible explanations for the gamma ray bursts, such as colliding neutron stars. New observations in
 the next few years, particularly by gravitational wave detectors like LIGO, should enable us to discover the origin of the
 gamma ray bursts.
 Even if the search for primordial black holes proves negative, as it seems it may, it will still give us important
 information about the very early stages of the universe. If the early universe had been chaotic or irregular, or if the
 pressure of matter had been low, one would have expected it to produce many more primordial black holes than the
 limit already set by our observations of the gamma ray background. Only if the early universe was very smooth and
 uniform, with a high pressure, can one explain the absence of observable numbers of primordial black holes.
 The idea of radiation from black holes was the first example of a prediction that depended in an essential way on both
 the great theories of this century, general relativity and quantum mechanics. It aroused a lot of opposition initially
 because it upset the existing viewpoint: “How can a black hole emit anything?” When I first announced the results of
 my calculations at a conference at the Rutherford-Appleton Laboratory near Oxford, I was greeted with general
 incredulity. At the end of my talk the chairman of the session, John G. Taylor from Kings College, London, claimed it
 was all nonsense. He even wrote a paper to that effect. However, in the end most people, including John Taylor, have
 come to the conclusion that black holes must radiate like hot bodies if our other ideas about general relativity and
 quantum mechanics are correct. Thus, even though we have not yet managed to find a primordial black hole, there is
 fairly general agreement that if we did, it would have to be emitting a lot of gamma rays and X rays.
 The existence of radiation from black holes seems to imply that gravitational collapse is not as final and irreversible as
 we once thought. If an astronaut falls into a black hole, its mass will increase, but eventually the energy equivalent of
 that extra mass will be returned to the universe in the form of radiation. Thus, in a sense, the astronaut will be
 “recycled.” It would be a poor sort of immortality, however, because any personal concept of time for the astronaut
 would almost certainly come to an end as he was torn apart inside the black hole! Even the types of particles that were
 eventually emitted by the black hole would in general be different from those that made up the astronaut: the only
 feature of the astronaut that would survive would be his mass or energy.
 The approximations I used to derive the emission from black holes should work well when the black hole has a mass
 greater than a fraction of a gram. However, they will break down at the end of the black hole’s life when its mass gets
 very small. The most likely outcome seems to be that the black hole will just disappear, at least from our region of the
 universe, taking with it the astronaut and any singularity there might be inside it, if indeed there is one. This was the
 first indication that quantum mechanics might remove the singularities that were predicted by general relativity.
 However, the methods that I and other people were using in 1974 were not able to answer questions such as whether
 singularities would occur in quantum gravity. From 1975 onward I therefore started to develop a more powerful
 approach to quantum gravity based on Richard Feynrnan’s idea of a sum over histories. The answers that this
 approach suggests for the origin and fate of the universe and its contents, such as astronauts, will be de-scribed in the
 next two chapters. We shall see that although the uncertainty principle places limitations on the accuracy of all our
 predictions, it may at the same time remove the fundamental unpredictability that occurs at a space-time singularity.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 7
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/f.html (8 of 8) [2/20/2001 3:15:18 AM]
 CHAPTER 8
 THE ORIGIN AND FATE OF THE UNIVERSE
 Einstein’s general theory of relativity, on its own, predicted that space-time began at the big bang singularity and
 would come to an end either at the big crunch singularity (if the whole universe recollapsed), or at a singularity inside
 a black hole (if a local region, such as a star, were to collapse). Any matter that fell into the hole would be destroyed
 at the singularity, and only the gravitational effect of its mass would continue to be felt outside. On the other hand,
 when quantum effects were taken into account, it seemed that the mass or energy of the matter would eventually be
 returned to the rest of the universe, and that the black hole, along with any singularity inside it, would evaporate
 away and finally disappear. Could quantum mechanics have an equally dramatic effect on the big bang and big
 crunch singularities? What really happens during the very early or late stages of the universe, when gravitational
 fields are so strong that quantum effects cannot be ignored? Does the universe in fact have a beginning or an end?
 And if so, what are they like?
 Throughout the 1970s I had been mainly studying black holes, but in 1981 my interest in questions about the origin
 and fate of the universe was reawakened when I attended a conference on cosmology organized by the Jesuits in
 the Vatican. The Catholic Church had made a bad mistake with Galileo when it tried to lay down the law on a
 question of science, declaring that the sun went round the earth. Now, centuries later, it had decided to invite a
 number of experts to advise it on cosmology. At the end of the conference the participants were granted an audience
 with the Pope. He told us that it was all right to study the evolution of the universe after the big bang, but we should
 not inquire into the big bang itself because that was the moment of Creation and therefore the work of God. I was
 glad then that he did not know the subject of the talk I had just given at the conference – the possibility that
 space-time was finite but had no boundary, which means that it had no beginning, no moment of Creation. I had no
 desire to share the fate of Galileo, with whom I feel a strong sense of identity, partly because of the coincidence of
 having been born exactly 300 years after his death!
 In order to explain the ideas that I and other people have had about how quantum mechanics may affect the origin
 and fate of the universe, it is necessary first to understand the generally accepted history of the universe, according
 to what is known as the “hot big bang model.” This assumes that the universe is described by a Friedmann model,
 right back to the big bang. In such models one finds that as the universe expands, any matter or radiation in it gets
 cooler. (When the universe doubles in size, its temperature falls by half.) Since temperature is simply a measure of
 the average energy – or speed – of the particles, this cooling of the universe would have a major effect on the matter
 in it. At very high temperatures, particles would be moving around so fast that they could escape any attraction
 toward each other due to nuclear or electromagnetic forces, but as they cooled off one would expect particles that
 attract each other to start to clump together. Moreover, even the types of particles that exist in the universe would
 depend on the temperature. At high enough temperatures, particles have so much energy that whenever they collide
 many different particle/antiparticle pairs would be produced – and although some of these particles would annihilate
 on hitting antiparticles, they would be produced more rap-idly than they could annihilate. At lower temperatures,
 however, when colliding particles have less energy, particle/antiparticle pairs would be produced less quickly – and
 annihilation would become faster than production.
 At the big bang itself the universe is thought to have had zero size, and so to have been infinitely hot. But as the
 universe expanded, the temperature of the radiation decreased. One second after the big bang, it would have fallen
 to about ten thousand million degrees. This is about a thousand times the temperature at the center of the sun, but
 temperatures as high as this are reached in H-bomb explosions. At this time the universe would have contained
 mostly photons, electrons, and neutrinos (extremely light particles that are affected only by the weak force and
 gravity) and their antiparticles, together with some protons and neutrons. As the universe continued to expand and
 the temperature to drop, the rate at which electron/antielectron pairs were being produced in collisions would have
 fallen below the rate at which they were being destroyed by annihilation. So most of the electrons and antielectrons
 would have annihilated with each other to produce more photons, leaving only a few electrons left over. The
 neutrinos and antineutrinos, however, would not have annihilated with each other, because these particles interact
 with themselves and with other particles only very weakly. So they should still be around today. If we could observe
 them, it would provide a good test of this picture of a very hot early stage of the universe. Unfortunately, their
 energies nowadays would be too low for us to observe them directly. However, if neutrinos are not massless, but
 have a small mass of their own, as suggested by some recent experiments, we might be able to detect them
 indirectly: they could be a form of “dark matter,” like that mentioned earlier, with sufficient gravitational attraction to
 stop the expansion of the universe and cause it to collapse again.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (1 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 About one hundred seconds after the big bang, the temperature would have fallen to one thousand million degrees,
 the temperature inside the hottest stars. At this temperature protons and neutrons would no longer have sufficient
 energy to escape the attraction of the strong nuclear force, and would have started to combine together to produce
 the nuclei of atoms of deuterium (heavy hydrogen), which contain one proton and one neutron. The deuterium nuclei
 would then have combined with more protons and neutrons to make helium nuclei, which contain two protons and
 two neutrons, and also small amounts of a couple of heavier elements, lithium and beryllium. One can calculate that
 in the hot big bang model about a quarter of the protons and neutrons would have been converted into helium nuclei,
 along with a small amount of heavy hydrogen and other elements. The remaining neutrons would have decayed into
 protons, which are the nuclei of ordinary hydrogen atoms.
 This picture of a hot early stage of the universe was first put forward by the scientist George Gamow in a famous
 paper written in 1948 with a student of his, Ralph Alpher. Gamow had quite a sense of humor – he persuaded the
 nuclear scientist Hans Bethe to add his name to the paper to make the list of authors “Alpher, Bethe, Gamow,” like
 the first three letters of the Greek alphabet, alpha, beta, gamma: particularly appropriate for a paper on the beginning
 of the universe! In this paper they made the remarkable prediction that radiation (in the form of photons) from the
 very hot early stages of the universe should still be around today, but with its temperature reduced to only a few
 degrees above absolute zero (–273ºC). It was this radiation that Penzias and Wilson found in 1965. At the time that
 Alpher, Bethe, and Gamow wrote their paper, not much was known about the nuclear reactions of protons and
 neutrons. Predictions made for the proportions of various elements in the early universe were therefore rather
 inaccurate, but these calculations have been repeated in the light of better knowledge and now agree very well with
 what we observe. It is, moreover, very difficult to explain in any other way why there should be so much helium in the
 universe. We are therefore fairly confident that we have the right picture, at least back to about one second after the
 big bang.
 Within only a few hours of the big bang, the production of helium and other elements would have stopped. And after
 that, for the next million years or so, the universe would have just continued expanding, without anything much
 happening. Eventually, once the temperature had dropped to a few thousand degrees, and electrons and nuclei no
 longer had enough energy to overcome the electromagnetic attraction between them, they would have started
 combining to form atoms. The universe as a whole would have continued expanding and cooling, but in regions that
 were slightly denser than average, the expansion would have been slowed down by the extra gravitational attraction.
 This would eventually stop expansion in some regions and cause them to start to recollapse. As they were
 collapsing, the gravitational pull of matter outside these regions might start them rotating slightly. As the collapsing
 region got smaller, it would spin faster – just as skaters spinning on ice spin faster as they draw in their arms.
 Eventually, when the region got small enough, it would be spinning fast enough to balance the attraction of gravity,
 and in this way disklike rotating galaxies were born. Other regions, which did not happen to pick up a rotation, would
 become oval-shaped objects called elliptical galaxies. In these, the region would stop collapsing because individual
 parts of the galaxy would be orbiting stably round its center, but the galaxy would have no overall rotation.
 As time went on, the hydrogen and helium gas in the galaxies would break up into smaller clouds that would collapse
 under their own gravity. As these contracted, and the atoms within them collided with one another, the temperature
 of the gas would increase, until eventually it became hot enough to start nuclear fusion reactions. These would
 convert the hydrogen into more helium, and the heat given off would raise the pressure, and so stop the clouds from
 contracting any further. They would remain stable in this state for a long time as stars like our sun, burning hydrogen
 into helium and radiating the resulting energy as heat and light. More massive stars would need to be hotter to
 balance their stronger gravitational attraction, making the nuclear fusion reactions proceed so much more rapidly that
 they would use up their hydrogen in as little as a hundred million years. They would then contract slightly, and as
 they heated up further, would start to convert helium into heavier elements like carbon or oxygen. This, however,
 would not release much more energy, so a crisis would occur, as was described in the chapter on black holes. What
 happens next is not completely clear, but it seems likely that the central regions of the star would collapse to a very
 dense state, such as a neutron star or black hole. The outer regions of the star may sometimes get blown off in a
 tremendous explosion called a supernova, which would outshine all the other stars in its galaxy. Some of the heavier
 elements produced near the end of the star’s life would be flung back into the gas in the galaxy, and would provide
 some of the raw material for the next generation of stars. Our own sun contains about 2 percent of these heavier
 elements, because it is a second- or third-generation star, formed some five thousand million years ago out of a
 cloud of rotating gas containing the debris of earlier supernovas. Most of the gas in that cloud went to form the sun or
 got blown away, but a small amount of the heavier elements collected together to form the bodies that now orbit the
 sun as planets like the earth.
 The earth was initially very hot and without an atmosphere. In the course of time it cooled and acquired an
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (2 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 atmosphere from the emission of gases from the rocks. This early atmosphere was not one in which we could have
 survived. It contained no oxygen, but a lot of other gases that are poisonous to us, such as hydrogen sulfide (the gas
 that gives rotten eggs their smell). There are, however, other primitive forms of life that can flourish under such
 conditions. It is thought that they developed in the oceans, possibly as a result of chance combinations of atoms into
 large structures, called macromolecules, which were capable of assembling other atoms in the ocean into similar
 structures. They would thus have reproduced themselves and multiplied. In some cases there would be errors in the
 reproduction. Mostly these errors would have been such that the new macromolecule could not reproduce itself and
 eventually would have been destroyed. However, a few of the errors would have produced new macromolecules that
 were even better at reproducing themselves. They would have therefore had an advantage and would have tended
 to replace the original macromolecules. In this way a process of evolution was started that led to the development of
 more and more complicated, self-reproducing organisms. The first primitive forms of life consumed various materials,
 including hydrogen sulfide, and released oxygen. This gradually changed the atmosphere to the composition that it
 has today, and allowed the development of higher forms of life such as fish, reptiles, mammals, and ultimately the
 human race.
 This picture of a universe that started off very hot and cooled as it expanded is in agreement with all the
 observational evidence that we have today. Nevertheless, it leaves a number of important questions unanswered:
 1. Why was the early universe so hot?
 2. Why is the universe so uniform on a large scale? Why does it look the same at all points of space and in all
 directions? In particular, why is the temperature of the microwave back-ground radiation so nearly the same when we
 look in different directions? It is a bit like asking a number of students an exam question. If they all give exactly the
 same answer, you can be pretty sure they have communicated with each other. Yet, in the model described above,
 there would not have been time since the big bang for light to get from one distant region to another, even though the
 regions were close together in the early universe. According to the theory of relativity, if light cannot get from one
 region to another, no other information can. So there would be no way in which different regions in the early universe
 could have come to have the same temperature as each other, unless for some unexplained reason they happened
 to start out with the same temperature.
 3. Why did the universe start out with so nearly the critical rate of expansion that separates models that recollapse
 from those that go on expanding forever, that even now, ten thousand million years later, it is still expanding at nearly
 the critical rate? If the rate of expansion one second after the big bang had been smaller by even one part in a
 hundred thousand million million, the universe would have recollapsed before it ever reached its present size.
 4. Despite the fact that the universe is so uniform and homogeneous on a large scale, it contains local irregularities,
 such as stars and galaxies. These are thought to have developed from small differences in the density of the early
 universe from one region to another. What was the origin of these density fluctuations?
 The general theory of relativity, on its own, cannot explain these features or answer these questions because of its
 prediction that the universe started off with infinite density at the big bang singularity. At the singularity, general
 relativity and all other physical laws would break down: one couldn’t predict what would come out of the singularity.
 As explained before, this means that one might as well cut the big bang, and any events before it, out of the theory,
 because they can have no effect on what we observe. Space-time would have a boundary – a beginning at the big
 bang.
 Science seems to have uncovered a set of laws that, within the limits set by the uncertainty principle, tell us how the
 universe will develop with time, if we know its state at any one time. These laws may have originally been decreed by
 God, but it appears that he has since left the universe to evolve according to them and does not now intervene in it.
 But how did he choose the initial state or configuration of the universe? What were the “boundary conditions” at the
 beginning of time?
 One possible answer is to say that God chose the initial configuration of the universe for reasons that we cannot
 hope to understand. This would certainly have been within the power of an omnipotent being, but if he had started it
 off in such an incomprehensible way, why did he choose to let it evolve according to laws that we could understand?
 The whole history of science has been the gradual realization that events do not happen in an arbitrary manner, but
 that they reflect a certain underlying order, which may or may not be divinely inspired. It would be only natural to
 suppose that this order should apply not only to the laws, but also to the conditions at the boundary of space-time
 that specify the initial state of the universe. There may be a large number of models of the universe with different
 initial conditions that all obey the laws. There ought to be some principle that picks out one initial state, and hence
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (3 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 one model, to represent our universe.
 One such possibility is what are called chaotic boundary conditions. These implicitly assume either that the universe
 is spatially infinite or that there are infinitely many universes. Under chaotic boundary conditions, the probability of
 finding any particular region of space in any given configuration just after the big bang is the same, in some sense,
 as the probability of finding it in any other configuration: the initial state of the universe is chosen purely randomly.
 This would mean that the early universe would have probably been very chaotic and irregular because there are
 many more chaotic and disordered configurations for the universe than there are smooth and ordered ones. (If each
 configuration is equally probable, it is likely that the universe started out in a chaotic and disordered state, simply
 because there are so many more of them.) It is difficult to see how such chaotic initial conditions could have given
 rise to a universe that is so smooth and regular on a large scale as ours is today. One would also have expected the
 density fluctuations in such a model to have led to the formation of many more primordial black holes than the upper
 limit that has been set by observations of the gamma ray background.
 If the universe is indeed spatially infinite, or if there are infinitely many universes, there would probably be some large
 regions somewhere that started out in a smooth and uniform manner. It is a bit like the well-known horde of monkeys
 hammering away on typewriters – most of what they write will be garbage, but very occasionally by pure chance they
 will type out one of Shakespeare’s sonnets. Similarly, in the case of the universe, could it be that we are living in a
 region that just happens by chance to be smooth and uniform? At first sight this might seem very improbable,
 because such smooth regions would be heavily outnumbered by chaotic and irregular regions. However, suppose
 that only in the smooth regions were galaxies and stars formed and were conditions right for the development of
 complicated self-replicating organisms like ourselves who were capable of asking the question: why is the universe
 so smooth.? This is an example of the application of what is known as the anthropic principle, which can be
 paraphrased as “We see the universe the way it is because we exist.”
 There are two versions of the anthropic principle, the weak and the strong. The weak anthropic principle states that
 in a universe that is large or infinite in space and/or time, the conditions necessary for the development of intelligent
 life will be met only in certain regions that are limited in space and time. The intelligent beings in these regions
 should therefore not be surprised if they observe that their locality in the universe satisfies the conditions that are
 necessary for their existence. It is a bit like a rich person living in a wealthy neighborhood not seeing any poverty.
 One example of the use of the weak anthropic principle is to “explain” why the big bang occurred about ten thousand
 million years ago – it takes about that long for intelligent beings to evolve. As explained above, an early generation of
 stars first had to form. These stars converted some of the original hydrogen and helium into elements like carbon and
 oxygen, out of which we are made. The stars then exploded as supernovas, and their debris went to form other stars
 and planets, among them those of our Solar System, which is about five thousand million years old. The first one or
 two thousand million years of the earth’s existence were too hot for the development of anything complicated. The
 remaining three thousand million years or so have been taken up by the slow process of biological evolution, which
 has led from the simplest organisms to beings who are capable of measuring time back to the big bang.
 Few people would quarrel with the validity or utility of the weak anthropic principle. Some, however, go much further
 and propose a strong version of the principle. According to this theory, there are either many different universes or
 many different regions of a single universe, each with its own initial configuration and, perhaps, with its own set of
 laws of science. In most of these universes the conditions would not be right for the development of complicated
 organisms; only in the few universes that are like ours would intelligent beings develop and ask the question, “Why is
 the universe the way we see it?” The answer is then simple: if it had been different, we would not be here!
 The laws of science, as we know them at present, contain many fundamental numbers, like the size of the electric
 charge of the electron and the ratio of the masses of the proton and the electron. We cannot, at the moment at least,
 predict the values of these numbers from theory – we have to find them by observation. It may be that one day we
 shall discover a complete unified theory that predicts them all, but it is also possible that some or all of them vary
 from universe to universe or within a single universe. The remarkable fact is that the values of these numbers seem
 to have been very finely adjusted to make possible the development of life. For example, if the electric charge of the
 electron had been only slightly different, stars either would have been unable to burn hydrogen and helium, or else
 they would not have exploded. Of course, there might be other forms of intelligent life, not dreamed of even by
 writers of science fiction, that did not require the light of a star like the sun or the heavier chemical elements that are
 made in stars and are flung back into space when the stars explode. Nevertheless, it seems clear that there are
 relatively few ranges of values for the numbers that would allow the development of any form of intelligent life. Most
 sets of values would give rise to universes that, although they might be very beautiful, would contain no one able to
 wonder at that beauty. One can take this either as evidence of a divine purpose in Creation and the choice of the
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (4 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 laws of science or as support for the strong anthropic principle.
 There are a number of objections that one can raise to the strong anthropic principle as an explanation of the
 observed state of the universe. First, in what sense can all these different universes be said to exist? If they are
 really separate from each other, what happens in another universe can have no observable consequences in our
 own universe. We should therefore use the principle of economy and cut them out of the theory. If, on the other
 hand, they are just different regions of a single universe, the laws of science would have to be the same in each
 region, because otherwise one could not move continuously from one region to another. In this case the only
 difference between the regions would be their initial configurations and so the strong anthropic principle would
 reduce to the weak one.
 A second objection to the strong anthropic principle is that it runs against the tide of the whole history of science. We
 have developed from the geocentric cosmologies of Ptolemy and his forebears, through the heliocentric cosmology
 of Copernicus and Galileo, to the modern picture in which the earth is a medium-sized planet orbiting around an
 average star in the outer suburbs of an ordinary spiral galaxy, which is itself only one of about a million million
 galaxies in the observable universe. Yet the strong anthropic principle would claim that this whole vast construction
 exists simply for our sake. This is very hard to believe. Our Solar System is certainly a prerequisite for our existence,
 hand one might extend this to the whole of our galaxy to allow for an earlier generation of stars that created the
 heavier elements. But there does not seem to be any need for all those other galaxies, nor for the universe to be so
 uniform and similar in every direction on the large scale.
 One would feel happier about the anthropic principle, at least in its weak version, if one could show that quite a
 number of different initial configurations for the universe would have evolved to produce a universe like the one we
 observe. If this is the case, a universe that developed from some sort of random initial conditions should contain a
 number of regions that are smooth and uniform and are suitable for the evolution of intelligent life. On the other hand,
 if the initial state of the universe had to be chosen extremely carefully to lead to something like what we see around
 us, the universe would be unlikely to contain any region in which life would appear. In the hot big bang model
 described above, there was not enough time in the early universe for heat to have flowed from one region to another.
 This means that the initial state of the universe would have to have had exactly the same temperature everywhere in
 order to account for the fact that the microwave back-ground has the same temperature in every direction we look.
 The initial rate of expansion also would have had to be chosen very precisely for the rate of expansion still to be so
 close to the critical rate needed to avoid recollapse. This means that the initial state of the universe must have been
 very carefully chosen indeed if the hot big bang model was correct right back to the beginning of time. It would be
 very difficult to explain why the universe should have begun in just this way, except as the act of a God who intended
 to create beings like us.
 In an attempt to find a model of the universe in which many different initial configurations could have evolved to
 something like the present universe, a scientist at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology, Alan Guth, suggested
 that the early universe might have gone through a period of very rapid expansion. This expansion is said to be
 “inflationary,” meaning that the universe at one time expanded at an increasing rate rather than the decreasing rate
 that it does today. According to Guth, the radius of the universe increased by a million million million million million (1
 with thirty zeros after it) times in only a tiny fraction of a second.
 Guth suggested that the universe started out from the big bang in a very hot, but rather chaotic, state. These high
 temperatures would have meant that the particles in the universe would be moving very fast and would have high
 energies. As we discussed earlier, one would expect that at such high temperatures the strong and weak nuclear
 forces and the electromagnetic force would all be unified into a single force. As the universe expanded, it would cool,
 and particle energies would go down. Eventually there would be what is called a phase transition and the symmetry
 between the forces would be broken: the strong force would become different from the weak and electromagnetic
 forces. One common example of a phase transition is the freezing of water when you cool it down. Liquid water is
 symmetrical, the same at every point and in every direction. However, when ice crystals form, they will have definite
 positions and will be lined up in some direction. This breaks water’s symmetry.
 In the case of water, if one is careful, one can “supercool” it: that is, one can reduce the temperature below the
 freezing point (OºC) without ice forming. Guth suggested that the universe might behave in a similar way: the
 temperature might drop below the critical value without the symmetry between the forces being broken. If this
 happened, the universe would be in an unstable state, with more energy than if the symmetry had been broken. This
 special extra energy can be shown to have an antigravitational effect: it would have acted just like the cosmological
 constant that Einstein introduced into general relativity when he was trying to construct a static model of the
 universe. Since the universe would already be expanding just as in the hot big bang model, the repulsive effect of
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (5 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 this cosmological constant would therefore have made the universe expand at an ever-increasing rate. Even in
 regions where there were more matter particles than average, the gravitational attraction of the matter would have
 been outweighed by the repulsion of the effective cosmological constant. Thus these regions would also expand in
 an accelerating inflationary manner. As they expanded and the matter particles got farther apart, one would be left
 with an expanding universe that contained hardly any particles and was still in the supercooled state. Any
 irregularities in the universe would simply have been smoothed out by the expansion, as the wrinkles in a balloon are
 smoothed away when you blow it up. Thus the present smooth and uniform state of the universe could have evolved
 from many different non-uniform initial states.
 In such a universe, in which the expansion was accelerated by a cosmological constant rather than slowed down by
 the gravitational attraction of matter, there would be enough time for light to travel from one region to another in the
 early universe. This could provide a solution to the problem, raised earlier, of why different regions in the early
 universe have the same properties. Moreover, the rate of expansion of the universe would automatically become
 very close to the critical rate determined by the energy density of the universe. This could then explain why the rate
 of expansion is still so close to the critical rate, without having to assume that the initial rate of expansion of the
 universe was very carefully chosen.
 The idea of inflation could also explain why there is so much matter in the universe. There are something like ten
 million million million million million million million million million million million million million million (1 with eighty
 zeros after it) particles in the region of the universe that we can observe. Where did they all come from? The answer
 is that, in quantum theory, particles can be created out of energy in the form of particle/antiparticle pairs. But that just
 raises the question of where the energy came from. The answer is that the total energy of the universe is exactly
 zero. The matter in the universe is made out of positive energy. However, the matter is all attracting itself by gravity.
 Two pieces of matter that are close to each other have less energy than the same two pieces a long way apart,
 because you have to expend energy to separate them against the gravitational force that is pulling them together.
 Thus, in a sense, the gravitational field has negative energy. In the case of a universe that is approximately uniform
 in space, one can show that this negative gravitational energy exactly cancels the positive energy represented by the
 matter. So the total energy of the universe is zero.
 Now twice zero is also zero. Thus the universe can double the amount of positive matter energy and also double the
 negative gravitational energy without violation of the conservation of energy. This does not happen in the normal
 expansion of the universe in which the matter energy density goes down as the universe gets bigger. It does happen,
 however, in the inflationary expansion because the energy density of the supercooled state remains constant while
 the universe expands: when the universe doubles in size, the positive matter energy and the negative gravitational
 energy both double, so the total energy remains zero. During the inflationary phase, the universe increases its size
 by a very large amount. Thus the total amount of energy available to make particles becomes very large. As Guth
 has remarked, “It is said that there’s no such thing as a free lunch. But the universe is the ultimate free lunch.”
 The universe is not expanding in an inflationary way today. Thus there has to be some mechanism that would
 eliminate the very large effective cosmological constant and so change the rate of expansion from an accelerated
 one to one that is slowed down by gravity, as we have today. In the inflationary expansion one might expect that
 eventually the symmetry between the forces would be broken, just as super-cooled water always freezes in the end.
 The extra energy of the unbroken symmetry state would then be released and would reheat the universe to a
 temperature just below the critical temperature for symmetry between the forces. The universe would then go on to
 expand and cool just like the hot big bang model, but there would now be an explanation of why the universe was
 expanding at exactly the critical rate and why different regions had the same temperature.
 In Guth’s original proposal the phase transition was supposed to occur suddenly, rather like the appearance of ice
 crystals in very cold water. The idea was that “bubbles” of the new phase of broken symmetry would have formed in
 the old phase, like bubbles of steam surrounded by boiling water. The bubbles were supposed to expand and meet
 up with each other until the whole universe was in the new phase. The trouble was, as I and several other people
 pointed out, that the universe was expanding so fast that even if the bubbles grew at the speed of light, they would
 be moving away from each other and so could not join up. The universe would be left in a very non-uniform state,
 with some regions still having symmetry between the different forces. Such a model of the universe would not
 correspond to what we see.
 In October 1981, I went to Moscow for a conference on quantum gravity. After the conference I gave a seminar on
 the inflationary model and its problems at the Sternberg Astronomical Institute. Before this, I had got someone else
 to give my lectures for me, because most people could not understand my voice. But there was not time to prepare
 this seminar, so I gave it myself, with one of my graduate students repeating my words. It worked well, and gave me
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (6 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 much more contact with my audience. In the audience was a young Russian, Andrei Linde, from the Lebedev
 Institute in Moscow. He said that the difficulty with the bubbles not joining up could be avoided if the bubbles were so
 big that our region of the universe is all contained inside a single bubble. In order for this to work, the change from
 symmetry to broken symmetry must have taken place very slowly inside the bubble, but this is quite possible
 according to grand unified theories. Linde’s idea of a slow breaking of symmetry was very good, but I later realized
 that his bubbles would have to have been bigger than the size of the universe at the time! I showed that instead the
 symmetry would have broken everywhere at the same time, rather than just inside bubbles. This would lead to a
 uniform universe, as we observe. I was very excited by this idea and discussed it with one of my students, Ian Moss.
 As a friend of Linde’s, I was rather embarrassed, however, when I was later sent his paper by a scientific journal and
 asked whether it was suitable for publication. I replied that there was this flaw about the bubbles being bigger than
 the universe, but that the basic idea of a slow breaking of symmetry was very good. I recommended that the paper ¿
 published as it was because it would take Linde several months to correct it, since anything he sent to the West
 would have to be passed by Soviet censorship, which was neither very skillful nor very quick with scientific papers.
 Instead, I wrote a short paper with Ian Moss in the same journal in which we pointed out this problem with the bubble
 and showed how it could be resolved.
 The day after I got back from Moscow I set out for Philadelphia, where I was due to receive a medal from the
 Franklin Institute. My secretary, Judy Fella, had used her not inconsiderable charm to persuade British Airways to
 give herself and me free seats on a Concorde as a publicity venture. However, I .was held up on my way to the
 airport by heavy rain and I missed the plane. Nevertheless, I got to Philadelphia in the end and received my medal. I
 was then asked to give a seminar on the inflationary universe at Drexel University in Philadelphia. I gave the same
 seminar about the problems of the inflationary universe, just as in Moscow.
 A very similar idea to Linde’s was put forth independently a few months later by Paul Steinhardt and Andreas
 Albrecht of the University of Pennsylvania. They are now given joint credit with Linde for what is called “the new
 inflationary model,” based on the idea of a slow breaking of symmetry. (The old inflationary model was Guth’s
 original suggestion of fast symmetry breaking with the formation of bubbles.)
 The new inflationary model was a good attempt to explain why the universe is the way it is. However, I and several
 other people showed that, at least in its original form, it predicted much greater variations in the temperature of the
 microwave background radiation than are observed. Later work has also cast doubt on whether there could be a
 phase transition in the very early universe of the kind required. In my personal opinion, the new inflationary model is
 now dead as a scientific theory, although a lot of people do not seem to have heard of its demise and are still writing
 papers as if it were viable. A better model, called the chaotic inflationary model, was put forward by Linde in 1983. In
 this there is no phase transition or supercooling. Instead, there is a spin 0 field, which, because of quantum
 fluctuations, would have large values in some regions of the early universe. The energy of the field in those regions
 would behave like a cosmological constant. It would have a repulsive gravitational effect, and thus make those
 regions expand in an inflationary manner. As they expanded, the energy of the field in them would slowly decrease
 until the inflationary expansion changed to an expansion like that in the hot big bang model. One of these regions
 would become what we now see as the observable universe. This model has all the advantages of the earlier
 inflationary models, but it does not depend on a dubious phase transition, and it can moreover give a reasonable size
 for the fluctuations in the temperature of the microwave background that agrees with observation.
 This work on inflationary models showed that the present state of the universe could have arisen from quite a large
 number of different initial configurations. This is important, because it shows that the initial state of the part of the
 universe that we inhabit did not have to be chosen with great care. So we may, if we wish, use the weak anthropic
 principle to explain why the universe looks the way it does now. It cannot be the case, however, that every initial
 configuration would have led to a universe like the one we observe. One can show this by considering a very
 different state for the universe at the present time, say, a very lumpy and irregular one. One could use the laws of
 science to evolve the universe back in time to determine its configuration at earlier times. According to the singularity
 theorems of classical general relativity, there would still have been a big bang singularity. If you evolve such a
 universe forward in time according to the laws of science, you will end up with the lumpy and irregular state you
 started with. Thus there must have been initial configurations that would not have given rise to a universe like the
 one we see today. So even the inflationary model does not tell us why the initial configuration was not such as to
 produce something very different from what we observe. Must we turn to the anthropic principle for an explanation?
 Was it all just a lucky chance? That would seem a counsel of despair, a negation of all our hopes of understanding
 the underlying order of the universe.
 In order to predict how the universe should have started off, one needs laws that hold at the beginning of time. If the
 classical theory of general relativity was correct, the singularity theorems that Roger Penrose and I proved show that
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (7 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 the beginning of time would have been a point of infinite density and infinite curvature of space-time. All the known
 laws of science would break down at such a point. One might suppose that there were new laws that held at
 singularities, but it would be very difficult even to formulate such laws at such badly behaved points, and we would
 have no guide from observations as to what those laws might be. However, what the singularity theorems really
 indicate is that the gravitational field becomes so strong that quantum gravitational effects become important:
 classical theory is no longer a good description of the universe. So one has to use a quantum theory of gravity to
 discuss the very early stages of the universe. As we shall see, it is possible in the quantum theory for the ordinary
 laws of science to hold everywhere, including at the beginning of time: it is not necessary to postulate new laws for
 singularities, because there need not be any singularities in the quantum theory.
 We don’t yet have a complete and consistent theory that combines quantum mechanics and gravity. However, we
 are fairly certain of some features that such a unified theory should have. One is that it should incorporate
 Feynman’s proposal to formulate quantum theory in terms of a sum over histories. In this approach, a particle does
 not have just a single history, as it would in a classical theory. Instead, it is supposed to follow every possible path in
 space-time, and with each of these histories there are associated a couple of numbers, one represent-ing the size of
 a wave and the other representing its position in the cycle (its phase). The probability that the particle, say, passes
 through some particular point is found by adding up the waves associated with every possible history that passes
 through that point. When one actually tries to perform these sums, however, one runs into severe technical
 problems. The only way around these is the following peculiar prescription: one must add up the waves for particle
 histories that are not in the “real” time that you and I experience but take place in what is called imaginary time.
 Imaginary time may sound like science fiction but it is in fact a well-defined mathematical concept. If we take any
 ordinary (or “real”) number and multiply it by itself, the result is a positive number. (For example, 2 times 2 is 4, but
 so is – 2 times – 2.) There are, however, special numbers (called imaginary numbers) that give negative numbers
 when multiplied by themselves. (The one called i, when multiplied by itself, gives – 1, 2i multiplied by itself gives – 4,
 and so on.)
 One can picture real and imaginary numbers in the following way: The real numbers can be represented by a line
 going from left to right, with zero in the middle, negative numbers like – 1, – 2, etc. on the left, and positive numbers,
 1, 2, etc. on the right. Then imaginary numbers are represented by a line going up and down the page, with i, 2i, etc.
 above the middle, and – i, – 2i, etc. below. Thus imaginary numbers are in a sense numbers at right angles to
 ordinary real numbers.
 To avoid the technical difficulties with Feynman’s sum over histories, one must use imaginary time. That is to say, for
 the purposes of the calculation one must measure time using imaginary numbers, rather than real ones. This has an
 interesting effect on space-time: the distinction between time and space disappears completely. A space-time in
 which events have imaginary values of the time coordinate is said to be Euclidean, after the ancient Greek Euclid,
 who founded the study of the geometry of two-dimensional surfaces. What we now call Euclidean space-time is very
 similar except that it has four dimensions instead of two. In Euclidean space-time there is no difference between the
 time direction and directions in space. On the other hand, in real space-time, in which events are labeled by ordinary,
 real values of the time coordinate, it is easy to tell the difference – the time direction at all points lies within the light
 cone, and space directions lie outside. In any case, as far as everyday quantum mechanics is concerned, we may
 regard our use of imaginary time and Euclidean space-time as merely a mathematical device (or trick) to calculate
 answers about real space-time.
 A second feature that we believe must be part of any ultimate theory is Einstein’s idea that the gravitational field is
 represented by curved space-time: particles try to follow the nearest thing to a straight path in a curved space, but
 because space-time is not flat their paths appear to be bent, as if by a gravitational field. When we apply Feynman’s
 sum over histories to Einstein’s view of gravity, the analogue of the history of a particle is now a complete curved
 space-time that represents the history of the whole universe. To avoid the technical difficulties in actually performing
 the sum over histories, these curved space-times must be taken to be Euclidean. That is, time is imaginary and is
 indistinguishable from directions in space. To calculate the probability of finding a real space-time with some certain
 property, such as looking the same at every point and in every direction, one adds up the waves associated with all
 the histories that have that property.
 In the classical theory of general relativity, there are many different possible curved space-times, each corresponding
 to a different initial state of the universe. If we knew the initial state of our universe, we would know its entire history.
 Similarly, in the quantum theory of gravity, there are many different possible quantum states for the universe. Again,
 if we knew how the Euclidean curved space-times in the sum over histories behaved at early times, we would know
 the quantum state of the universe.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (8 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 In the classical theory of gravity, which is based on real space-time, there are only two possible ways the universe
 can behave: either it has existed for an infinite time, or else it had a beginning at a singularity at some finite time in
 the past. In the quantum theory of gravity, on the other hand, a third possibility arises. Because one is using
 Euclidean space-times, in which the time direction is on the same footing as directions in space, it is possible for
 space-time to be finite in extent and yet to have no singularities that formed a boundary or edge. Space-time would
 be like the surface of the earth, only with two more dimensions. The surface of the earth is finite in extent but it
 doesn’t have a boundary or edge: if you sail off into the sunset, you don’t fall off the edge or run into a singularity. (I
 know, because I have been round the world!)
 If Euclidean space-time stretches back to infinite imaginary time, or else starts at a singularity in imaginary time, we
 have the same problem as in the classical theory of specifying the initial state of the universe: God may know how
 the universe began, but we cannot give any particular reason for thinking it began one way rather than another. On
 the other hand, the quantum theory of gravity has opened up a new possibility, in which there would be no boundary
 to space-time and so there would be no need to specify the behavior at the boundary. There would be no
 singularities at which the laws of science broke down, and no edge of space-time at which one would have to appeal
 to God or some new law to set the boundary conditions for space-time. One could say: “The boundary condition of
 the universe is that it has no boundary.” The universe would be completely self-contained and not affected by
 anything outside itself. It would neither be created nor destroyed, It would just BE.
 It was at the conference in the Vatican mentioned earlier that I first put forward the suggestion that maybe time and
 space together formed a surface that was finite in size but did not have any boundary or edge. My paper was rather
 mathematical, however, so its implications for the role of God in the creation of the universe were not generally
 recognized at the time (just as well for me). At the time of the Vatican conference, I did not know how to use the “no
 boundary” idea to make predictions about the universe. However, I spent the following sum-mer at the University of
 California, Santa Barbara. There a friend and colleague of mine, Jim Hartle, worked out with me what conditions the
 universe must satisfy if space-time had no boundary. When I returned to Cambridge, I continued this work with two of
 my research students, Julian Luttrel and Jonathan Halliwell.
 I’d like to emphasize that this idea that time and space should be finite “without boundary” is just a proposal: it cannot
 be deduced from some other principle. Like any other scientific theory, it may initially be put forward for aesthetic or
 metaphysical reasons, but the real test is whether it makes predictions that agree with observation. This, how-ever, is
 difficult to determine in the case of quantum gravity, for two reasons. First, as will be explained in Chapter 11, we are
 not yet sure exactly which theory successfully combines general relativity and quantum mechanics, though we know
 quite a lot about the form such a theory must have. Second, any model that described the whole universe in detail
 would be much too complicated mathematically for us to be able to calculate exact predictions. One therefore has to
 make simplifying assumptions and approximations – and even then, the problem of extracting predictions remains a
 formidable one.
 Each history in the sum over histories will describe not only the space-time but everything in it as well, including any
 complicated organisms like human beings who can observe the history of the universe. This may provide another
 justification for the anthropic principle, for if all the histories are possible, then so long as we exist in one of the
 histories, we may use the anthropic principle to explain why the universe is found to be the way it is. Exactly what
 meaning can be attached to the other histories, in which we do not exist, is not clear. This view of a quantum theory
 of gravity would be much more satisfactory, however, if one could show that, using the sum over histories, our
 universe is not just one of the possible histories but one of the most probable ones. To do this, we must perform the
 sum over histories for all possible Euclidean space-times that have no boundary.
 Under the “no boundary” proposal one learns that the chance of the universe being found to be following most of the
 possible histories is negligible, but there is a particular family of histories that are much more probable than the
 others. These histories may be pictured as being like the surface of the earth, with the distance from the North Pole
 representing imaginary time and the size of a circle of constant distance from the North Pole representing the spatial
 size of the universe. The universe starts at the North Pole as a single point. As one moves south, the circles of
 latitude at constant distance from the North Pole get bigger, corresponding to the universe expanding with imaginary
 time Figure 8:1. The universe would reach a maximum size at the equator and would contract with increasing
 imaginary time to a single point at the South Pole. Ever though the universe would have zero size at the North and
 South Poles, these points would not be singularities, any more than the North aid South Poles on the earth are
 singular. The laws of science will hold at them, just as they do at the North and South Poles on the earth.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (9 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 Figure 8:1
 The history of the universe in real time, however, would look very different. At about ten or twenty thousand million
 years ago, it would have a minimum size, which was equal to the maximum radius of the history in imaginary time. At
 later real times, the universe would expand like the chaotic inflationary model proposed by Linde (but one would not
 now have to assume that the universe was created somehow in the right sort of state). The universe would expand to
 a very large size Figure 8:1 and eventually it would collapse again into what looks like a singularity in real time. Thus,
 in a sense, we are still all doomed, even if we keep away from black holes. Only if we could picture the universe in
 terms of imaginary time would there be no singularities.
 If the universe really is in such a quantum state, there would be no singularities in the history of the universe in
 imaginary time. It might seem therefore that my more recent work had completely undone the results of my earlier
 work on singularities. But, as indicated above, the real importance of the singularity theorems was that they showed
 that the gravitational field must become so strong that quantum gravitational effects could not be ignored. This in turn
 led to the idea that the universe could be finite in imaginary time but without boundaries or singularities. When one
 goes back to the real time in which we live, however, there will still appear to be singularities. The poor astronaut
 who falls into a black hole will still come to a sticky end; only if he lived in imaginary time would he encounter no
 singularities.
 This might suggest that the so-called imaginary time is really the real time, and that what we call real time is just a
 figment of our imaginations. In real time, the universe has a beginning and an end at singularities that form a
 boundary to space-time and at which the laws of science break down. But in imaginary time, there are no
 singularities or boundaries. So maybe what we call imaginary time is really more basic, and what we call real is just
 an idea that we invent to help us describe what we think the universe is like. But according to the approach I
 described in Chapter 1, a scientific theory is just a mathematical model we make to describe our observations: it
 exists only in our minds. So it is meaningless to ask: which is real, “real” or “imaginary” time? It is simply a matter of
 which is the more useful description.
 One can also use the sum over histories, along with the no boundary proposal, to find which properties of the
 universe are likely to occur together. For example, one can calculate the probability that the universe is expanding at
 nearly the same rate in all different directions at a time when the density of the universe has its present value. In the
 simplified models that have been examined so far, this probability turns out to be high; that is, the proposed no
 boundary condition leads to the prediction that it is extremely probable that the present rate of expansion of the
 universe is almost the same in each direction. This is consistent with the observations of the microwave background
 radiation, which show that it has almost exactly the same intensity in any direction. If the universe were expanding
 faster in some directions than in others, the intensity of the radiation in those directions would be reduced by an
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (10 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 additional red shift.
 Further predictions of the no boundary condition are currently being worked out. A particularly interesting problem is
 the size of the small departures from uniform density in the early universe that caused the formation first of the
 galaxies, then of stars, and finally of us. The uncertainty principle implies that the early universe cannot have been
 completely uniform because there must have been some uncertainties or fluctuations in the positions and velocities
 of the particles. Using the no boundary condition, we find that the universe must in fact have started off with just the
 minimum possible non-uniformity allowed by the uncertainty principle. The universe would have then undergone a
 period of rapid expansion, as in the inflationary models. During this period, the initial non-uniformities would have
 been amplified until they were big enough to explain the origin of the structures we observe around us. In 1992 the
 Cosmic Background Explorer satellite (COBE) first detected very slight variations in the intensity of the microwave
 background with direction. The way these non-uniformities depend on direction seems to agree with the predictions
 of the inflationary model and the no boundary proposal. Thus the no boundary proposal is a good scientific theory in
 the sense of Karl Popper: it could have been falsified by observations but instead its predictions have been
 confirmed. In an expanding universe in which the density of matter varied slightly from place to place, gravity would
 have caused the denser regions to slow down their expansion and start contracting. This would lead to the formation
 of galaxies, stars, and eventually even insignificant creatures like ourselves. Thus all the complicated structures that
 we see in the universe might be explained by the no boundary condition for the universe together with the uncertainty
 principle of quantum mechanics.
 The idea that space and time may form a closed surface without boundary also has profound implications for the role
 of God in the affairs of the universe. With the success of scientific theories in describing events, most people have
 come to believe that God allows the universe to evolve according to a set of laws and does not intervene in the
 universe to break these laws. However, the laws do not tell us what the universe should have looked like when it
 started – it would still be up to God to wind up the clockwork and choose how to start it off. So long as the universe
 had a beginning, we could suppose it had a creator. But if the universe is really completely self-contained, having no
 boundary or edge, it would have neither beginning nor end: it would simply be. What place, then, for a creator?
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 8
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/g.html (11 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:29 AM]
 CHAPTER 9
 THE ARROW OF TIME
 In previous chapters we have seen how our views of the nature of time have changed over the years. Up to the
 beginning of this century people believed in an absolute time. That is, each event could be labeled by a number
 called “time” in a unique way, and all good clocks would agree on the time interval between two events.
 However, the discovery that the speed of light appeared the same to every observer, no matter how he was
 moving, led to the theory of relativity – and in that one had to abandon the idea that there was a unique
 absolute time. Instead, each observer would have his own measure of time as recorded by a clock that he
 carried: clocks carried by different observers would not necessarily agree. Thus time became a more personal
 concept, relative to the observer who measured it.
 When one tried to unify gravity with quantum mechanics, one had to introduce the idea of “imaginary” time.
 Imaginary time is indistinguishable from directions in space. If one can go north, one can turn around and head
 south; equally, if one can go forward in imaginary time, one ought to be able to turn round and go backward.
 This means that there can be no important difference between the forward and backward directions of
 imaginary time. On the other hand, when one looks at “real” time, there’s a very big difference between the
 forward and backward directions, as we all know. Where does this difference between the past and the future
 come from? Why do we remember the past but not the future?
 The laws of science do not distinguish between the past and the future. More precisely, as explained earlier,
 the laws of science are unchanged under the combination of operations (or symmetries) known as C, P, and T.
 (C means changing particles for antiparticles. P means taking the mirror image, so left and right are
 interchanged. And T means reversing the direction of motion of all particles: in effect, running the motion
 backward.) The laws of science that govern the behavior of matter under all normal situations are unchanged
 under the combination of the two operations C and P on their own. In other words, life would be just the same
 for the inhabitants of another planet who were both mirror images of us and who were made of antimatter,
 rather than matter.
 If the laws of science are unchanged by the combination of operations C and P, and also by the combination C,
 P, and T, they must also be unchanged under the operation T alone. Yet there is a big difference between the
 forward and backward directions of real time in ordinary life. Imagine a cup of water falling off a table and
 breaking into pieces on the floor. If you take a film of this, you can easily tell whether it is being run forward or
 backward. If you run it backward you will see the pieces suddenly gather themselves together off the floor and
 jump back to form a whole cup on the table. You can tell that the film is being run backward because this kind
 of behavior is never observed in ordinary life. If it were, crockery manufacturers would go out of business.
 The explanation that is usually given as to why we don’t see broken cups gathering themselves together off the
 floor and jumping back onto the table is that it is forbidden by the second law of thermodynamics. This says that
 in any closed system disorder, or entropy, always increases with time. In other words, it is a form of Murphy’s
 law: things always tend to go wrong! An intact cup on the table is a state of high order, but a broken cup on the
 floor is a disordered state. One can go readily from the cup on the table in the past to the broken cup on the
 floor in the future, but not the other way round.
 The increase of disorder or entropy with time is one example of what is called an arrow of time, something that
 distinguishes the past from the future, giving a direction to time. There are at least three different arrows of
 time. First, there is the thermodynamic arrow of time, the direction of time in which disorder or entropy
 increases. Then, there is the psychological arrow of time. This is the direction in which we feel time passes, the
 direction in which we remember the past but not the future. Finally, there is the cosmological arrow of time. This
 is the direction of time in which the universe is expanding rather than contracting.
 In this chapter I shall argue that the no boundary condition for the universe, together with the weak anthropic
 principle, can explain why all three arrows point in the same direction – and moreover, why a well-defined arrow
 of time should exist at all. I shall argue that the psychological arrow is determined by the thermodynamic arrow,
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 9
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/h.html (1 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:38 AM]
 and that these two arrows necessarily always point in the same direction. If one assumes the no boundary
 condition for the universe, we shall see that there must be well-defined thermodynamic and cosmological
 arrows of time, but they will not point in the same direction for the whole history of the universe. However, I
 shall argue that it is only when they do point in the same direction that conditions are suitable for the
 development of intelligent beings who can ask the question: why does disorder increase in the same direction
 of time as that in which the universe expands?
 I shall discuss first the thermodynamic arrow of time. The second law of thermodynamics results from the fact
 that there are always many more disordered states than there are ordered ones. For example, consider the
 pieces of a jigsaw in a box. There is one, and. only one, arrangement in which the pieces make a complete
 picture. On the other hand, there are a very large number of arrangements in which the pieces are disordered
 and don’t make a picture.
 Suppose a system starts out in one of the small number of ordered states. As time goes by, the system will
 evolve according to the laws of science and its state will change. At a later time, it is more probable that the
 system will be in a disordered state than in an ordered one because there are more disordered states. Thus
 disorder will tend to increase with time if the system obeys an initial condition of high order.
 Suppose the pieces of the jigsaw start off in a box in the ordered arrangement in which they form a picture. If
 you shake the box, the pieces will take up another arrangement. This will probably be a disordered
 arrangement in which the pieces don’t form a proper picture, simply because there are so many more
 disordered arrangements. Some groups of pieces may still form parts of the picture, but the more you shake
 the box, the more likely it is that these groups will get broken up and the pieces will be in a completely jumbled
 state in which they don’t form any sort of picture. So the disorder of the pieces will probably increase with time if
 the pieces obey the initial condition that they start off in a condition of high order.
 Suppose, however, that God decided that the universe should finish up in a state of high order but that it didn’t
 matter what state it started in. At early times the universe would probably be in a disordered state. This would
 mean that disorder would decrease with time. You would see broken cups gathering themselves together and
 jumping back onto the table. However, any human beings who were observing the cups would be living in a
 universe in which disorder decreased with time. I shall argue that such beings would have a psychological
 arrow of time that was backward. That is, they would remember events in the future, and not remember events
 in their past. When the cup was broken, they would remember it being on the table, but when it was on the
 table, they would not remember it being on the floor.
 It is rather difficult to talk about human memory because we don’t know how the brain works in detail. We do,
 however, know all about how computer memories work. I shall therefore discuss the psychological arrow of
 time for computers. I think it is reasonable to assume that the arrow for computers is the same as that for
 humans. If it were not, one could make a killing on the stock exchange by having a computer that would
 remember tomorrow’s prices! A computer memory is basically a device containing elements that can exist in
 either of two states. A simple example is an abacus. In its simplest form, this consists of a number of wires; on
 each wire there are a number of beads that can be put in one of two positions. Before an item is recorded in a
 computer’s memory, the memory is in a disordered state, with equal probabilities for the two possible states.
 (The abacus beads are scattered randomly on the wires of the abacus.) After the memory interacts with the
 system to be remembered, it will definitely be in one state or the other, according to the state of the system.
 (Each abacus bead will be at either the left or the right of the abacus wire.) So the memory has passed from a
 disordered state to an ordered one. However, in order to make sure that the memory is in the right state, it is
 necessary to use a certain amount of energy (to move the bead or to power the computer, for example). This
 energy is dissipated as heat, and increases the amount of disorder in the universe. One can show that this
 increase in disorder is always greater than the increase in the order of the memory itself. Thus the heat
 expelled by the computer’s cooling fan means that when a computer records an item in memory, the total
 amount of disorder in the universe still goes up. The direction of time in which a computer remembers the past
 is the same as that in which disorder increases.
 Our subjective sense of the direction of time, the psychological arrow of time, is therefore determined within our
 brain by the thermodynamic arrow of time. Just like a computer, we must remember things in the order in which
 entropy increases. This makes the second law of thermodynamics almost trivial. Disorder increases with time
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 9
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/h.html (2 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:38 AM]
 because we measure time in the direction in which disorder increases You can’t have a safer bet than that!
 But why should the thermodynamic arrow of time exist at all? Or, in other words, why should the universe be in
 a state of high order at one end of time, the end that we call the past? Why is it not in a state of complete
 disorder at all times? After all, this might seem more probable. And why is the direction of time in which
 disorder increases the same as that in which the universe expands?
 In the classical theory of general relativity one cannot predict how the universe would have begun because all
 the known laws of science would have broken down at the big bang singularity. The universe could have
 started out in a very smooth and ordered state. This would have led to well-defined thermodynamic and
 cosmological arrows of time, as we observe. But it could equally well have started out in a very lumpy and
 disordered state. In that case, the universe would already be in a state of complete disorder, so disorder could
 not increase with time. It would either stay constant, in which case there would be no well-defined
 thermodynamic arrow of time, or it would decrease, in which case the thermodynamic arrow of time would point
 in the opposite direction to the cosmological arrow. Neither of these possibilities agrees with what we observe.
 However, as we have seen, classical general relativity predicts its own downfall. When the curvature of
 space-time becomes large, quantum gravitational effects will become important and the classical theory will
 cease to be a good description of the universe. One has to use a quantum theory of gravity to understand how
 the universe began.
 In a quantum theory of gravity, as we saw in the last chapter, in order to specify the state of the universe one
 would still have to say how the possible histories of the universe would behave at the boundary of space-time in
 the past. One could avoid this difficulty of having to describe what we do not and cannot know only if the
 histories satisfy the no boundary condition: they are finite in extent but have no boundaries, edges, or
 singularities. In that case, the beginning of time would be a regular, smooth point of space-time and the
 universe would have begun its expansion in a very smooth and ordered state. It could not have been
 completely uniform, because that would violate the uncertainty principle of quantum theory. There had to be
 small fluctuations in the density and velocities of particles. The no boundary condition, however, implied that
 these fluctuations were as small as they could be, consistent with the uncertainty principle.
 The universe would have started off with a period of exponential or “inflationary” expansion in which it would
 have increased its size by a very large factor. During this expansion, the density fluctuations would have
 remained small at first, but later would have started to grow. Regions in which the density was slightly higher
 than average would have had their expansion slowed down by the gravitational attraction of the extra mass.
 Eventually, such regions would stop expanding and collapse to form galaxies, stars, and beings like us. The
 universe would have started in a smooth and ordered state, and would become lumpy and disordered as time
 went on. This would explain the existence of the thermodynamic arrow of time.
 But what would happen if and when the universe stopped expanding and began to contract? Would the
 thermodynamic arrow reverse and disorder begin to decrease with time? This would lead to all sorts of
 science-fiction-like possibilities for people who survived from the expanding to the contracting phase. Would
 they see broken cups gathering themselves together off the floor and jumping back onto the table? Would they
 be able to remember tomorrow’s prices and make a fortune on the stock market? It might seem a bit academic
 to worry about what will happen when the universe collapses again, as it will not start to contract for at least
 another ten thousand million years. But there is a quicker way to find out what will happen: jump into a black
 hole. The collapse of a star to form a black hole is rather like the later stages of the collapse of the whole
 universe. So if disorder were to decrease in the contracting phase of the universe, one might also expect it to
 decrease inside a black hole. So perhaps an astronaut who fell into a black hole would be able to make money
 at roulette by remembering where the ball went before he placed his bet. (Unfortunately, however, he would not
 have long to play before he was turned to spaghetti. Nor would he be able to let us know about the reversal of
 the thermodynamic arrow, or even bank his winnings, because he would be trapped behind the event horizon
 of the black hole.)
 At first, I believed that disorder would decrease when the universe recollapsed. This was because I thought that
 the universe had to return to a smooth and ordered state when it became small again. This would mean that
 the contracting phase would be like the time reverse of the expanding phase. People in the contracting phase
 would live their lives backward: they would die before they were born and get younger as the universe
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 9
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/h.html (3 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:38 AM]
 contracted.
 This idea is attractive because it would mean a nice symmetry between the expanding and contracting phases.
 However, one cannot adopt it on its own, independent of other ideas about the universe. The question is: is it
 implied by the no boundary condition, or is it inconsistent with that condition? As I said, I thought at first that the
 no boundary condition did indeed imply that disorder would decrease in the contracting phase. I was misled
 partly by the analogy with the surface of the earth. If one took the beginning of the universe to correspond to
 the North Pole, then the end of the universe should be similar to the beginning, just as the South Pole is similar
 to the North. However, the North and South Poles correspond to the beginning and end of the universe in
 imaginary time. The beginning and end in real time can be very different from each other. I was also misled by
 work I had done on a simple model of the universe in which the collapsing phase looked like the time reverse of
 the expanding phase. However, a colleague of mine, Don Page, of Penn State University, pointed out that the
 no boundary condition did not require the contracting phase necessarily to be the time reverse of the expanding
 phase. Further, one of my students, Raymond Laflamme, found that in a slightly more complicated model, the
 collapse of the universe was very different from the expansion. I realized that I had made a mistake: the no
 boundary condition implied that disorder would in fact continue to increase during the contraction. The
 thermodynamic and psychological arrows of time would not reverse when the universe begins to recontract, or
 inside black holes.
 What should you do when you find you have made a mistake like that? Some people never admit that they are
 wrong and continue to find new, and often mutually inconsistent, arguments to support their case – as
 Eddington did in opposing black hole theory. Others claim to have never really supported the incorrect view in
 the first place or, if they did, it was only to show that it was inconsistent. It seems to me much better and less
 confusing if you admit in print that you were wrong. A good example of this was Einstein, who called the
 cosmological constant, which he introduced when he was trying to make a static model of the universe, the
 biggest mistake of his life.
 To return to the arrow of time, there remains the question: why do we observe that the thermodynamic and
 cosmological arrows point in the same direction? Or in other words, why does disorder increase in the same
 direction of time as that in which the universe expands? If one believes that the universe will expand and then
 contract again, as the no boundary proposal seems to imply, this becomes a question of why we should be in
 the expanding phase rather than the contracting phase.
 One can answer this on the basis of the weak anthropic principle. Conditions in the contracting phase would not
 be suitable for the existence of intelligent beings who could ask the question: why is disorder increasing in the
 same direction of time as that in which the universe is expanding? The inflation in the early stages of the
 universe, which the no boundary proposal predicts, means that the universe must be expanding at very close to
 the critical rate at which it would just avoid recollapse, and so will not recollapse for a very long time. By then all
 the stars will have burned out and the protons and neutrons in them will probably have decayed into light
 particles and radiation. The universe would be in a state of almost complete disorder. There would be no strong
 thermodynamic arrow of time. Disorder couldn’t increase much because the universe would be in a state of
 almost complete disorder already. However, a strong thermodynamic arrow is necessary for intelligent life to
 operate. In order to survive, human beings have to consume food, which is an ordered form of energy, and
 convert it into heat, which is a disordered form of energy. Thus intelligent life could not exist in the contracting
 phase of the universe. This is the explanation of why we observe that the thermodynamic and cosmological
 arrows of time point in the same direction. It is not that the expansion of the universe causes disorder to
 increase. Rather, it is that the no boundary condition causes disorder to increase and the conditions to be
 suitable for intelligent life only in the expanding phase.
 To summarize, the laws of science do not distinguish between the forward and backward directions of time.
 However, there are at least three arrows of time that do distinguish the past from the future. They are the
 thermodynamic arrow, the direction of time in which disorder increases; the psychological arrow, the direction
 of time in which we remember the past and not the future; and the cosmological arrow, the direction of time in
 which the universe expands rather than contracts. I have shown that the psychological arrow is essentially the
 same as the thermodynamic arrow, so that the two would always point in the same direction. The no boundary
 proposal for the universe predicts the existence of a well-defined thermodynamic arrow of time because the
 universe must start off in a smooth and ordered state. And the reason we observe this thermodynamic arrow to
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 9
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/h.html (4 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:38 AM]
 agree with the cosmological arrow is that intelligent beings can exist only in the expanding phase. The
 contracting phase will be unsuitable because it has no strong thermodynamic arrow of time.
 The progress of the human race in understanding the universe has established a small corner of order in an
 increasingly disordered universe. If you remember every word in this book, your memory will have recorded
 about two million pieces of information: the order in your brain will have increased by about two million units.
 However, while you have been reading the book, you will have converted at least a thousand calories of
 ordered energy, in the form of food, into disordered energy, in the form of heat that you lose to the air around
 you by convection and sweat. This will increase the disorder of the universe by about twenty million million
 million million units – or about ten million million million times the increase in order in your brain – and that’s if
 you remember everything in this book. In the next chapter but one I will try to increase the order in our neck of
 the woods a little further by explaining how people are trying to fit together the partial theories I have described
 to form a complete unified theory that would cover everything in the universe.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 9
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/h.html (5 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:38 AM]
 CHAPTER 10
 WORMHOLES AND TIME TRAVEL
 The last chapter discussed why we see time go forward: why disorder increases and why we remember the
 past but not the future. Time was treated as if it were a straight railway line on which one could only go one way
 or the other.
 But what if the railway line had loops and branches so that a train could keep going forward but come back to a
 station it had already passed? In other words, might it be possible for someone to travel into the future or the
 past?
 H. G. Wells in The Time Machine explored these possibilities as have countless other writers of science fiction.
 Yet many of the ideas of science fiction, like submarines and travel to the moon, have become matters of
 science fact. So what are the prospects for time travel?
 The first indication that the laws of physics might really allow people to travel in time came in 1949 when Kurt
 Godel discovered a new space-time allowed by general relativity. Godel was a mathematician who was famous
 for proving that it is impossible to prove all true statements, even if you limit yourself to trying to prove all the
 true statements in a subject as apparently cut and dried as arithmetic. Like the uncertainty principle, Godel’s
 incompleteness theorem may be a fundamental limitation on our ability to understand and predict the universe,
 but so far at least it hasn’t seemed to be an obstacle in our search for a complete unified theory.
 Godel got to know about general relativity when he and Einstein spent their later years at the Institute for
 Advanced Study in Princeton. His space-time had the curious property that the whole universe was rotating.
 One might ask: “Rotating with respect to what?” The answer is that distant matter would be rotating with
 respect to directions that little tops or gyroscopes point in.
 This had the side effect that it would be possible for someone to go off in a rocket ship and return to earth
 before he set out. This property really upset Einstein, who had thought that general relativity wouldn’t allow time
 travel. However, given Einstein’s record of ill-founded opposition to gravitational collapse and the uncertainty
 principle, maybe this was an encouraging sign. The solution Godel found doesn’t correspond to the universe
 we live in because we can show that the universe is not rotating. It also had a non-zero value of the
 cosmological constant that Einstein introduced when he thought the universe was unchanging. After Hubble
 discovered the expansion of the universe, there was no need for a cosmological constant and it is now
 generally believed to be zero. However, other more reasonable space-times that are allowed by general
 relativity and which permit travel into the past have since been found. One is in the interior of a rotating black
 hole. Another is a space-time that contains two cosmic strings moving past each other at high speed. As their
 name suggests, cosmic strings are objects that are like string in that they have length but a tiny cross section.
 Actually, they are more like rubber bands because they are under enormous tension, something like a million
 million million million tons. A cosmic string attached to the earth could accelerate it from 0 to 60 mph in 1/30th
 of a second. Cosmic strings may sound like pure science fiction but there are reasons to believe they could
 have formed in the early universe as a result of symmetry-breaking of the kind discussed in Chapter 5.
 Because they would be under enormous tension and could start in any configuration, they might accelerate to
 very high speeds when they straighten out.
 The Godel solution and the cosmic string space-time start out so distorted that travel into the past was always
 possible. God might have created such a warped universe but we have no reason to believe he did.
 Observations of the microwave background and of the abundances of the light elements indicate that the early
 universe did not have the kind of curvature required to allow time travel. The same conclusion follows on
 theoretical grounds if the no boundary proposal is correct. So the question is: if the universe starts out without
 the kind of curvature required for time travel, can we subsequently warp local regions of space-time sufficiently
 to allow it?
 A closely related problem that is also of concern to writers of science fiction is rapid interstellar or intergalactic
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 10
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/i.html (1 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:45 AM]
 travel. According to relativity, nothing can travel faster than light. If we therefore sent a spaceship to our nearest
 neighboring star, Alpha Centauri, which is about four light-years away, it would take at least eight years before
 we could expect the travelers to return and tell us what they had found. If the expedition were to the center of
 our galaxy, it would be at least a hundred thousand years before it came back. The theory of relativity does
 allow one consolation. This is the so-called twins paradox mentioned in Chapter 2.
 Because there is no unique standard of time, but rather observers each have their own time as measured by
 clocks that they carry with them, it is possible for the journey to seem to be much shorter for the space travelers
 than for those who remain on earth. But there would not be much joy in returning from a space voyage a few
 years older to find that everyone you had left behind was dead and gone thousands of years ago. So in order to
 have any human interest in their stories, science fiction writers had to suppose that we would one day discover
 how to travel faster than light. What most of thee authors don’t seem to have realized is that if you can travel
 faster than light, the theory of relativity implies you can also travel back in the, as the following limerick says:
 There was a young lady of Wight
 Who traveled much faster than light.
 She departed one day,
 In a relative way,
 And arrived on the previous night
 The point is that the theory of relativity says hat there is no unique measure of time that all observers will agree
 on Rather, each observer has his or her own measure of time. If it is possible for a rocket traveling below the
 speed of light to get from event A (say, the final of the 100-meter race of the Olympic Games in 202) to event B
 (say, the opening of the 100,004th meeting of the Congress of Alpha Centauri), then all observers will agree
 that event A happened before event B according to their times. Suppose, however, that the spaceship would
 have to travel faster than light to carry the news of the race to the Congress. Then observers moving at
 different speeds can disagree about whether event A occurred before B or vice versa. According to the time of
 an observer who is at rest with respect to the earth, it may be that the Congress opened after the race. Thus
 this observer would think that a spaceship could get from A to B in time if only it could ignore the speed-of-light
 speed limit. However, to an observer at Alpha Centauri moving away from the earth at nearly the speed of light,
 it would appear that event B, the opening of the Congress, would occur before event A, the 100-meter race.
 The theory of relativity says that the laws of physics appear the same to observers moving at different speeds.
 This has been well tested by experiment and is likely to remain a feature even if we find a more advanced
 theory to replace relativity Thus the moving observer would say that if faster-than-light travel is possible, it
 should be possible to get from event B, the opening of the Congress, to event A, the 100-meter race. If one
 went slightly faster, one could even get back before the race and place a bet on it in the sure knowledge that
 one would win.
 There is a problem with breaking the speed-of-light barrier. The theory of relativity says that the rocket power
 needed to accelerate a spaceship gets greater and greater the nearer it gets to the speed of light. We have
 experimental evidence for this, not with spaceships but with elementary particles in particle accelerators like
 those at Fermilab or CERN (European Centre for Nuclear Research). We can accelerate particles to 99.99
 percent of the speed of light, but however much power we feed in, we can’t get them beyond the speed-of-light
 barrier. Similarly with spaceships: no matter how much rocket power they have, they can’t accelerate beyond
 the speed of light.
 That might seem to rule out both rapid space travel and travel back in time. However, there is a possible way
 out. It might be that one could warp space-time so that there was a shortcut between A and B One way of doing
 this would be to create a wormhole between A and B. As its name suggests, a wormhole is a thin tube of
 space-time which can connect two nearly flat regions far apart.
 There need be no relation between the distance through the wormhole and the separation of its ends in the
 nearly Hat background. Thus one could imagine that one could create or find a wormhole that world lead from
 the vicinity of the Solar System to Alpha Centauri. The distance through the wormhole might be only a few
 million miles even though earth and Alpha Centauri are twenty million million miles apart in ordinary space. This
 would allow news of the 100-meter race to reach the opening of the Congress. But then an observer moving
 toward 6e earth should also be able to find another wormhole that would enable him to get from the opening of
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 10
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/i.html (2 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:45 AM]
 the Congress on Alpha Centauri back to earth before the start of the race. So wormholes, like any other
 possible form of travel faster than light, would allow one to travel into the past.
 The idea of wormholes between different regions of space-time was not an invention of science fiction writers
 but came from a very respectable source.
 In 1935, Einstein and Nathan Rosen wrote a paper in which they showed that general relativity allowed what
 they called “bridges,” but which are now known as wormholes. The Einstein-Rosen bridges didn’t last long
 enough for a spaceship to get through: the ship would run into a singularity as the wormhole pinched off.
 However, it has been suggested that it might be possible for an advanced civilization to keep a wormhole open.
 To do this, or to warp space-time in any other way so as to permit time travel, one can show that one needs a
 region of space-time with negative curvature, like the surface of a saddle. Ordi-nary matter, which has a
 positive energy density, gives space-time a positive curvature, like the surface of a sphere. So what one needs,
 in order to warp space-time in a way that will allow travel into the past, is matter with negative energy density.
 Energy is a bit like money: if you have a positive balance, you can distribute it in various ways, but according to
 the classical laws that were believed at the beginning of the century, you weren’t allowed to be overdrawn. So
 these classical laws would have ruled out any possibility of time travel. However, as has been described in
 earlier chapters, the classical laws were superseded by quantum laws based on the uncertainty principle. The
 quantum laws are more liberal and allow you to be overdrawn on one or two accounts provided the total
 balance is positive. In other words, quantum theory allows the energy density to be negative in some places,
 provided that this is made up for by positive energy densities in other places, so that the total energy re-mains
 positive. An example of how quantum theory can allow negative energy densities is provided by what is called
 the Casimir effect. As we saw in Chapter 7, even what we think of as “empty” space is filled with pairs of virtual
 particles and antiparticles that appear together, move apart, and come back together and annihilate each other.
 Now, suppose one has two parallel metal plates a short distance apart. The plates will act like mirrors for the
 virtual photons or particles of light. In fact they will form a cavity between them, a bit like an organ pipe that will
 resonate only at certain notes. This means that virtual photons can occur in the space between the plates only
 if their wavelengths (the distance between the crest of one wave and the next) fit a whole number of times into
 the gap between the plates. If the width of a cavity is a whole number of wavelengths plus a fraction of a
 wave-length, then after some reflections backward and forward between the plates, the crests of one wave will
 coincide with the troughs of another and the waves will cancel out.
 Because the virtual photons between the plates can have only the resonant wavelengths, there will be slightly
 fewer of them than in the region outside the plates where virtual photons can have any wavelength. Thus there
 will be slightly fewer virtual photons hitting the inside surfaces of the plates than the outside surfaces. One
 would therefore expect a force on the plates, pushing them toward each other. This force has actually been
 detected and has the predicted value. Thus we have experimental evidence that virtual particles exist and have
 real effects.
 The fact that there are fewer virtual photons between the plates means that their energy density will be less
 than elsewhere. But the total energy density in “empty” space far away from the plates must be zero, because
 otherwise the energy density would warp the space and it would not be almost flat. So, if the energy density
 between the plates is less than the energy density far away, it must be negative.
 We thus have experimental evidence both that space-time can be warped (from the bending of light during
 eclipses) and that it can be curved in the way necessary to allow time travel (from the Casimir effect). One
 might hope therefore that as we advance in science and technology, we would eventually manage to build a
 time machine. But if so, why hasn’t anyone come back from the future and told us how to do it? There might be
 good reasons why it would be unwise to give us the secret of time travel at our present primitive state of
 development, but unless human nature changes radically, it is difficult to believe that some visitor from the
 future wouldn’t spill the beans. Of course, some people would claim that sightings of UFOs are evidence that
 we are being visited either by aliens or by people from the future. (If the aliens were to get here in reasonable
 time, they would need faster-than-light travel, so the two possibilities may be equivalent.)
 However, I think that any visit by aliens or people from the future would be much more obvious and, probably,
 much more unpleasant. If they are going to reveal themselves at all, why do so only to those who are not
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 10
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/i.html (3 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:45 AM]
 regarded as reliable witnesses? If they are trying to warn us of some great danger, they are not being very
 effective.
 A possible way to explain the absence of visitors from the future would be to say that the past is fixed because
 we have observed it and seen that it does not have the kind of warping needed to allow travel back from the
 future. On the other hand, the future is unknown and open, so it might well have the curvature required. This
 would mean that any time travel would be confined to the future. There would be no chance of Captain Kirk and
 the Starship Enterprise turning up at the present time.
 This might explain why we have not yet been overrun by tourists from the future, but it would not avoid the
 problems that would arise if one were able to go back and change history. Suppose, for example, you went
 back and killed your great-great-grandfather while he was still a child. There are many versions of this paradox
 but they are essentially equivalent: one would get contradictions if one were free to change the past.
 There seem to be two possible resolutions to the paradoxes posed by time travel. One I shall call the consistent
 histories approach. It says that even if space-time is warped so that it would be possible to travel into the past,
 what happens in space-time must be a consistent solution of the laws of physics. According to this viewpoint,
 you could not go back in time unless history showed that you had already arrived in the past and, while there,
 had not killed your great-great-grandfather or committed any other acts that would conflict with your current
 situation in the present. Moreover, when you did go back, you wouldn’t be able to change recorded history.
 That means you wouldn’t have free will to do what you wanted. Of course, one could say that free will is an
 illusion anyway. If there really is a complete unified theory that governs everything, it presumably also
 determines your actions. But it does so in a way that is impossible to calculate for an organism that is as
 complicated as a human being. The reason we say that humans have free will is because we can’t predict what
 they will do. However, if the human then goes off in a rocket ship and comes back before he or she set off, we
 will be able to predict what he or she will do because it will be part of recorded history. Thus, in that situation,
 the time traveler would have no free will.
 The other possible way to resolve the paradoxes of time travel might be called the alternative histories
 hypothesis. The idea here is that when time travelers go back to the past, they enter alternative histories which
 differ from recorded history. Thus they can act freely, without the constraint of consistency with their previous
 history. Steven Spiel-berg had fun with this notion in the Back to the Future films: Marty McFly was able to go
 back and change his parents’ courtship to a more satisfactory history.
 The alternative histories hypothesis sounds rather like Richard Feynman’s way of expressing quantum theory
 as a sum over histories, which was described in Chapters 4 and 8. This said that the universe didn’t just have a
 single history: rather it had every possible history, each with its own probability. However, there seems to be an
 important difference between Feynman’s proposal and alternative histories. In Feynman’s sum, each history
 comprises a complete space-time and everything in it. The space-time may be so warped that it is possible to
 travel in a rocket into the past. But the rocket would remain in the same space-time and therefore the same
 history, which would have to be consistent. Thus Feynman’s sum over histories proposal seems to support the
 consistent histories hypothesis rather than the alternative histories.
 The Feynman sum over histories does allow travel into the past on a microscopic scale. In Chapter 9 we saw
 that the laws of science are unchanged by combinations of the operations C, P, and T. This means that an
 antiparticle spinning in the anticlockwise direction and moving from A to B can also be viewed as an ordinary
 particle spinning clockwise and moving backward in time from B to A. Similarly, an ordinary particle moving
 forward in time is equivalent to an antiparticle moving backward in time. As has been discussed in this chapter
 and Chapter 7, “empty” space is filled with pairs of virtual particles and antiparticles that appear together, move
 apart, and then come back together and annihilate each other.
 So, one can regard the pair of particles as a single particle moving on a closed loop in space-time. When the
 pair is moving forward in time (from the event at which it appears to that at which it annihilates), it is called a
 particle. But when the particle is traveling back in time (from the event at which the pair annihilates to that at
 which it appears), it is said to be an antiparticle traveling forward in time.
 The explanation of how black holes can emit particles and radiation (given in Chapter 7) was that one member
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 10
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/i.html (4 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:45 AM]
 of a virtual particle/ antiparticle pair (say, the antiparticle) might fall into the black hole, leaving the other
 member without a partner with which to annihilate. The forsaken particle might fall into the hole as well, but it
 might also escape from the vicinity of the black hole. If so, to an observer at a distance it would appear to be a
 particle emitted by the black hole.
 One can, however, have a different but equivalent intuitive picture of the mechanism for emission from black
 holes. One can regard the member of the virtual pair that fell into the black hole (say, the antiparticle) as a
 particle traveling backward in time out of the hole. When it gets to the point at which the virtual
 particle/antiparticle pair appeared together, it is scattered by the gravitational field into a particle traveling
 forward in time and escaping from the black hole. If, instead, it were the particle member of the virtual pair that
 fell into the hole, one could regard it as an antiparticle traveling back in time and coming out of the black hole.
 Thus the radiation by black holes shows that quantum theory allows travel back in time on a microscopic scale
 and that such time travel can produce observable effects.
 One can therefore ask: does quantum theory allow time travel on a macroscopic scale, which people could
 use? At first sight, it seems it should. The Feynman sum over histories proposal is supposed to be over all
 histories. Thus it should include histories in which space-time is so warped that it is possible to travel into the
 past. Why then aren’t we in trouble with history? Suppose, for example, someone had gone back and given the
 Nazis the secret of the atom bomb?
 One would avoid these problems if what I call the chronology protection conjecture holds. This says that the
 laws of physics conspire to prevent macroscopic bodies from carrying information into the past. Like the cosmic
 censorship conjecture, it has not been proved but there are reasons to believe it is true.
 The reason to believe that chronology protection operates is that when space-time is warped enough to make
 travel into the past possible, virtual particles moving on closed loops in space-time can become real particles
 traveling forward in time at or below the speed of light. As these particles can go round the loop any number of
 times, they pass each point on their route many times. Thus their energy is counted over and over again and
 the energy density will become very large. This could give space-time a positive curvature that would not allow
 travel into the past. It is not yet clear whether these particles would cause positive or negative curvature or
 whether the curvature produced by some kinds of virtual particles might cancel that produced by other kinds.
 Thus the possibility of time travel remains open. But I’m not going to bet on it. My opponent might have the
 unfair advantage of knowing the future.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 10
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/i.html (5 of 5) [2/20/2001 3:15:45 AM]
 CHAPTER 11
 THE UNIFICATION OF PHYSICS
 As was explained in the first chapter, it would be very difficult to construct a complete unified theory of
 everything in the universe all at one go. So instead we have made progress by finding partial theories that
 describe a limited range of happenings and by neglecting other effects or approximating them by certain
 numbers. (Chemistry, for example, allows us to calculate the interactions of atoms, without knowing the internal
 structure of an atom’s nucleus.) Ultimately, however, one would hope to find a complete, consistent, unified
 theory that would include all these partial theories as approximations, and that did not need to be adjusted to fit
 the facts by picking the values of certain arbitrary numbers in the theory. The quest for such a theory is known
 as “the unification of physics.” Einstein spent most of his later years unsuccessfully searching for a unified
 theory, but the time was not ripe: there were partial theories for gravity and the electromagnetic force, but very
 little was known about the nuclear forces. Moreover, Einstein refused to believe in the reality of quantum
 mechanics, despite the important role he had played in its development. Yet it seems that the uncertainty
 principle is a fundamental feature of the universe we live in. A successful unified theory must, therefore,
 necessarily incorporate this principle.
 As I shall describe, the prospects for finding such a theory seem to be much better now because we know so
 much more about the universe. But we must beware of overconfidence – we have had false dawns before! At
 the beginning of this century, for example, it was thought that everything could be explained in terms of the
 properties of continuous matter, such as elasticity and heat conduction. The discovery of atomic structure and
 the uncertainty principle put an emphatic end to that. Then again, in 1928, physicist and Nobel Prize winner
 Max Born told a group of visitors to Gottingen University, “Physics, as we know it, will be over in six months.”
 His confidence was based on the recent discovery by Dirac of the equation that governed the electron. It was
 thought that a similar equation would govern the proton, which was the only other particle known at the time,
 and that would be the end of theoretical physics. However, the discovery of the neutron and of nuclear forces
 knocked that one on the head too. Having said this, I still believe there are grounds for cautious optimism that
 we may now be near the end of the search for the ultimate laws of nature.
 In previous chapters I have described general relativity, the partial theory of gravity, and the partial theories that
 govern the weak, the strong, and the electromagnetic forces. The last three may be combined in so-called
 grand unified theories, or GUTs, which are not very satisfactory because they do not include gravity and
 because they contain a number of quantities, like the relative masses of different particles, that cannot be
 predicted from the theory but have to be chosen to fit observations. The main difficulty in finding a theory that
 unifies gravity with the other forces is that general relativity is a “classical” theory; that is, it does not incorporate
 the uncertainty principle of quantum mechanics. On the other hand, the other partial theories depend on
 quantum mechanics in an essential way. A necessary first step, therefore, is to combine general relativity with
 the uncertainty principle. As we have seen, this can produce some remarkable consequences, such as black
 holes not being black, and the universe not having any singularities but being completely self-contained and
 without a boundary. The trouble is, as explained in Chapter 7, that the uncertainty principle means that even
 “empty” space is filled with pairs of virtual particles and antiparticles. These pairs would have an infinite amount
 of energy and, therefore, by Einstein’s famous equation E = mc2, they would have an infinite amount of mass.
 Their gravitational attraction would thus curve up the universe to infinitely small size.
 Rather similar, seemingly absurd infinities occur in the other partial theories, but in all these cases the infinities
 can be canceled out by a process called renormalization. This involves canceling the infinities by introducing
 other infinities. Although this technique is rather dubious mathematically, it does seem to work in practice, and
 has been used with these theories to make predictions that agree with observations to an extraordinary degree
 of accuracy. Renormalization, however, does have a serious drawback from the point of view of trying to find a
 complete theory, because it means that the actual values of the masses and the strengths of the forces cannot
 be predicted from the theory, but have to be chosen to fit the observations.
 In attempting to incorporate the uncertainty principle into general relativity, one has only two quantities that can
 be adjusted: the strength of gravity and the value of the cosmological constant. But adjusting these is not
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (1 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 sufficient to remove all the infinities. One therefore has a theory that seems to predict that certain quantities,
 such as the curvature of space-time, are really infinite, yet these quantities can be observed and measured to
 be perfectly finite! This problem in combining general relativity and the uncertainty principle had been
 suspected for some time, but was finally confirmed by detailed calculations in 1972. Four years later, a possible
 solution, called “supergravity,” was suggested. The idea was to combine the spin-2 particle called the graviton,
 which carries the gravitational force, with certain other particles of spin 3/2, 1, ½, and 0. In a sense, all these
 particles could then be regarded as different aspects of the same “superparticle,” thus unifying the matter
 particles with spin ½ and 3/2 with the force-carrying particles of spin 0, 1, and 2. The virtual particle/antiparticle
 pairs of spin ½ and 3/2 would have negative energy, and so would tend to cancel out the positive energy of the
 spin 2, 1, and 0 virtual pairs. This would cause many of the possible infinities to cancel out, but it was
 suspected that some infinities might still remain. However, the calculations required to find out whether or not
 there were any infinities left uncancelled were so long and difficult that no one was prepared to undertake them.
 Even with a computer it was reckoned it would take at least four years, and the chances were very high that
 one would make at least one mistake, probably more. So one would know one had the right answer only if
 someone else repeated the calculation and got the same answer, and that did not seem very likely!
 Despite these problems, and the fact that the particles in the super-gravity theories did not seem to match the
 observed particles, most scientists believed that supergravity was probably the right answer to the problem of
 the unification of physics. It seemed the best way of unifying gravity with the other forces. However, in 1984
 there was a remarkable change of opinion in favor of what are called string theories. In these theories the basic
 objects are not particles, which occupy a single point of space, but things that have a length but no other
 dimension, like an infinitely thin piece of string. These strings may have ends (the so-called open strings) or
 they may be joined up with themselves in closed loops (closed strings) Figure 11:1 and Figure 11:2.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (2 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 Figures 11:1 & 11:2
 A particle occupies one point of space at each instant of time. Thus its history can be represented by a line in
 space-time (the “world-line”). A string, on the other hand, occupies a line in space at each moment of time. So
 its history in space-time is a two-dimensional surface called the world-sheet. (Any point on such a world-sheet
 can be described by two numbers, one specifying the time and the other the position of the point on the string.)
 The world-sheet of an open string is a strip: its edges represent the paths through space-time of the ends of the
 string Figure 11:1. The world-sheet of a closed string is a cylinder or tube Figure 11:2: a slice through the tube
 is a circle, which represents the position of the string at one particular time.
 Two pieces of string can join together to form a single string; in the case of open strings they simply join at the
 ends Figure 11:3, while in the case of closed strings it is like the two legs joining on a pair of trousers Figure
 11:4.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (3 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 Figure 11:3
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (4 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 Figure 11:4
 Similarly, a single piece of string can divide into two strings. In string theories, what were previously thought of
 as particles are now pictured as waves traveling down the string, like waves on a vibrating kite string. The
 emission or absorption of one particle by another corresponds to the dividing or joining together of strings. For
 example, the gravitational force of the sun on the earth was pictured in particle theories as being caused by the
 emission of a graviton by a particle in the sun and its absorption by a particle in the earth Figure 11:5.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (5 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 Figures 11:5 & 11:6
 In string theory, this process corresponds to an H-shaped tube or pipe Figure 11:6 (string theory is rather like
 plumbing, in a way). The two vertical sides of the H correspond to the particles in the sun and the earth, and the
 horizontal crossbar corresponds to the graviton that travels between them.
 String theory has a curious history. It was originally invented in the late 1960s in an attempt to find a theory to
 describe the strong force. The idea was that particles like the proton and the neutron could be regarded as
 waves on a string. The strong forces between the particles would correspond to pieces of string that went
 between other bits of string, as in a spider’s web. For this theory to give the observed value of the strong force
 between particles, the strings had to be like rubber bands with a pull of about ten tons.
 In 1974 Joel Scherk from Paris and John Schwarz from the California Institute of Technology published a paper
 in which they showed that string theory could describe the gravitational force, but only if the tension in the string
 were very much higher, about a thousand million million million million million million tons (1 with thirty-nine
 zeros after it). The predictions of the string theory would be just the same as those of general relativity on
 normal length scales, but they would differ at very small distances, less than a thousand million million million
 million millionth of a centimeter (a centimeter divided by 1 with thirty-three zeros after it). Their work did not
 receive much attention, however, because at just about that time most people abandoned the original string
 theory of the strong force in favor of the theory based on quarks and gluons, which seemed to fit much better
 with observations. Scherk died in tragic circumstances (he suffered from diabetes and went into a coma when
 no one was around to give him an injection of insulin). So Schwarz was left alone as almost the only supporter
 of string theory, but now with the much higher proposed value of the string tension.
 In 1984 interest in strings suddenly revived, apparently for two reasons. One was that people were not really
 making much progress toward showing that supergravity was finite or that it could explain the kinds of particles
 that we observe. The other was the publication of a paper by John Schwarz and Mike Green of Queen Mary
 College, London, that showed that string theory might be able to explain the existence of particles that have a
 built-in left-handedness, like some of the particles that we observe. Whatever the reasons, a large number of
 people soon began to work on string theory and a new version was developed, the so-called heterotic string,
 which seemed as if it might be able to explain the types of particles that we observe.
 String theories also lead to infinities, but it is thought they will all cancel out in versions like the heterotic string
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (6 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 (though this is not yet known for certain). String theories, however, have a bigger problem: they seem to be
 consistent only if space-time has either ten or twenty-six dimensions, instead of the usual four! Of course, extra
 space-time dimensions are a commonplace of science fiction indeed, they provide an ideal way of overcoming
 the normal restriction of general relativity that one cannot travel faster than light or back in time (see Chapter
 10). The idea is to take a shortcut through the extra dimensions. One can picture this in the following way.
 Imagine that the space we live in has only two dimensions and is curved like the surface of an anchor ring or
 torus Figure 11:7.
 Figure 11:7
 If you were on one side of the inside edge of the ring and you wanted to get to a point on the other side, you
 would have to go round the inner edge of the ring. However, if you were able to travel in the third dimension,
 you could cut straight across.
 Why don’t we notice all these extra dimensions, if they are really there? Why do we see only three space
 dimensions and one time dimension? The suggestion is that the other dimensions are curved up into a space of
 very small size, something like a million million million million millionth of an inch. This is so small that we just
 don’t notice it: we see only one time dimension and three space dimensions, in which space-time is fairly flat. It
 is like the surface of a straw. If you look at it closely, you see it is two-dimensional (the position of a point on the
 straw is described by two numbers, the length along the straw and the distance round the circular direction).
 But if you look at it from a distance, you don’t see the thickness of the straw and it looks one-dimensional (the
 position of a point is specified only by the length along the straw). So it is with space-time: on a very small scale
 it is ten-dimensional and highly curved, but on bigger scales you don’t see the curvature or the extra
 dimensions. If this picture is correct, it spells bad news for would-be space travelers: the extra dimensions
 would be far too small to allow a spaceship through. However, it raises another major problem. Why should
 some, but not all, of the dimensions be curled up into a small ball? Presumably, in the very early universe all
 the dimensions would have been very curved. Why did one time dimension and three space dimensions flatten
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (7 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 out, while the other dimensions remain tightly curled up?
 One possible answer is the anthropic principle. Two space dimensions do not seem to be enough to allow for
 the development of complicated beings like us. For example, two-dimensional animals living on a
 one-dimensional earth would have to climb over each other in order to get past each other. If a two-dimensional
 creature ate something it could not digest completely, it would have to bring up the remains the same way it
 swallowed them, because if there were a passage right through its body, it would divide the creature into two
 separate halves: our two-dimensional being would fall apart Figure 11:8. Similarly, it is difficult to see how there
 could be any circulation of the blood in a two-dimensional creature.
 Figure 11:8
 There would also be problems with more than three space dimensions. The gravitational force between two
 bodies would decrease more rapidly with distance than it does in three dimensions. (In three dimensions, the
 gravitational force drops to 1/4 if one doubles the distance. In four dimensions it would drop to 1/5, in five
 dimensions to 1/6, and so on.) The significance of this is that the orbits of planets, like the earth, around the sun
 would be unstable: the least disturbance from a circular orbit (such as would be caused by the gravitational
 attraction of other planets) would result in the earth spiraling away from or into the sun. We would either freeze
 or be burned up. In fact, the same behavior of gravity with distance in more than three space dimensions
 means that the sun would not be able to exist in a stable state with pressure balancing gravity. It would either
 fall apart or it would collapse to form a black hole. In either case, it would not be of much use as a source of
 heat and light for life on earth. On a smaller scale, the electrical forces that cause the electrons to orbit round
 the nucleus in an atom would behave in the same way as gravitational forces. Thus the electrons would either
 escape from the atom altogether or would spiral into the nucleus. In either case, one could not have atoms as
 we know them.
 It seems clear then that life, at least as we know it, can exist only in regions of space-time in which one time
 dimension and three space dimensions are not curled up small. This would mean that one could appeal to the
 weak anthropic principle, provided one could show that string theory does at least allow there to be such
 regions of the universe – and it seems that indeed string theory does. There may well be other regions of the
 universe, or other universes (whatever that may mean), in which all the dimensions are curled up small or in
 which more than four dimensions are nearly flat, but there would be no intelligent beings in such regions to
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (8 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 observe the different number of effective dimensions.
 Another problem is that there are at least four different string theories (open strings and three different closed
 string theories) and millions of ways in which the extra dimensions predicted by string theory could be curled
 up. Why should just one string theory and one kind of curling up be picked out? For a time there seemed no
 answer, and progress got bogged down. Then, from about 1994, people started discovering what are called
 dualities: different string theories and different ways of curling up the extra dimensions could lead to the same
 results in four dimensions. Moreover, as well as particles, which occupy a single point of space, and strings,
 which are lines, there were found to be other objects called p-branes, which occupied two-dimensional or
 higher-dimensional volumes in space. (A particle can be regarded as a 0-brane and a string as a 1-brane but
 there were also p-branes for p=2 to p=9.) What this seems to indicate is that there is a sort of democracy
 among supergravity, string, and p-brane theories: they seem to fit together but none can be said to be more
 fundamental than the others. They appear to be different approximations to some fundamental theory that are
 valid in different situations.
 People have searched for this underlying theory, but without any success so far. However, I believe there may
 not be any single formulation of the fundamental theory any more than, as Godel showed, one could formulate
 arithmetic in terms of a single set of axioms. Instead it may be like maps – you can’t use a single map to
 describe the surface of the earth or an anchor ring: you need at least two maps in the case of the earth and four
 for the anchor ring to cover every point. Each map is valid only in a limited region, but different maps will have a
 region of overlap. The collection of maps provides a complete description of the surface. Similarly, in physics it
 may be necessary to use different formulations in different situations, but two different formulations would agree
 in situations where they can both be applied. The whole collection of different formulations could be regarded
 as a complete unified theory, though one that could not be expressed in terms of a single set of postulates.
 But can there really be such a unified theory? Or are we perhaps just chasing a mirage? There seem to be
 three possibilities:
 1. There really is a complete unified theory (or a collection of overlapping formulations), which we will someday
 discover if we are smart enough.
 2. There is no ultimate theory of the universe, just an infinite sequence of theories that describe the universe
 more and more accurately.
 3. There is no theory of the universe: events cannot be predicted beyond a certain extent but occur in a random
 and arbitrary manner.
 Some would argue for the third possibility on the grounds that if there were a complete set of laws, that would
 infringe God’s freedom to change his mind and intervene in the world. It’s a bit like the old paradox: can God
 make a stone so heavy that he can’t lift it? But the idea that God might want to change his mind is an example
 of the fallacy, pointed out by St. Augustine, of imagining God as a being existing in time: time is a property only
 of the universe that God created. Presumably, he knew what he intended when he set it up!
 With the advent of quantum mechanics, we have come to recognize that events cannot be predicted with
 complete accuracy but that there is always a degree of uncertainty. If one likes, one could ascribe this
 randomness to the intervention of God, but it would be a very strange kind of intervention: there is no evidence
 that it is directed toward any purpose. Indeed, if it were, it would by definition not be random. In modern times,
 we have effectively removed the third possibility above by redefining the goal of science: our aim is to formulate
 a set of laws that enables us to predict events only up to the limit set by the uncertainty principle.
 The second possibility, that there is an infinite sequence of more and more refined theories, is in agreement
 with all our experience so far. On many occasions we have increased the sensitivity of our measurements or
 made a new class of observations, only to discover new phenomena that were not predicted by the existing
 theory, and to account for these we have had to develop a more advanced theory. It would therefore not be
 very surprising if the present generation of grand unified theories was wrong in claiming that nothing essentially
 new will happen between the electroweak unification energy of about 100 GeV and the grand unification energy
 of about a thousand million million GeV. We might indeed expect to find several new layers of structure more
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (9 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 basic than the quarks and electrons that we now regard as “elementary” particles.
 However, it seems that gravity may provide a limit to this sequence of “boxes within boxes.” If one had a
 particle with an energy above what is called the Planck energy, ten million million million GeV (1 followed by
 nineteen zeros), its mass would be so concentrated that it would cut itself off from the rest of the universe and
 form a little black hole. Thus it does seem that the sequence of more and more refined theories should have
 some limit as we go to higher and higher energies, so that there should be some ultimate theory of the
 universe. Of course, the Planck energy is a very long way from the energies of around a hundred GeV, which
 are the most that we can produce in the laboratory at the present time. We shall not bridge that gap with
 particle accelerators in the foreseeable future! The very early stages of the universe, however, are an arena
 where such energies must have occurred. I think that there is a good chance that the study of the early
 universe and the requirements of mathematical consistency will lead us to a complete unified theory within the
 lifetime of some of us who are around today, always presuming we don’t blow ourselves up first.
 What would it mean if we actually did discover the ultimate theory of the universe? As was explained in Chapter
 1, we could never be quite sure that we had indeed found the correct theory, since theories can’t be proved.
 But if the theory was mathematically consistent and always gave predictions that agreed with observations, we
 could be reasonably confident that it was the right one. It would bring to an end a long and glorious chapter in
 the history of humanity’s intellectual struggle to understand the universe. But it would also revolutionize the
 ordinary person’s understanding of the laws that govern the universe. In Newton’s time it was possible for an
 educated person to have a grasp of the whole of human knowledge, at least in outline. But since then, the pace
 of the development of science has made this impossible. Because theories are always being changed to
 account for new observations, they are never properly digested or simplified so that ordinary people can
 understand them. You have to be a specialist, and even then you can only hope to have a proper grasp of a
 small proportion of the scientific theories. Further, the rate of progress is so rapid that what one learns at school
 or university is always a bit out of date. Only a few people can keep up with the rapidly advancing frontier of
 knowledge, and they have to devote their whole time to it and specialize in a small area. The rest of the
 population has little idea of the advances that are being made or the excitement they are generating. Seventy
 years ago, if Eddington is to be believed, only two people understood the general theory of relativity. Nowadays
 tens of thousands of university graduates do, and many millions of people are at least familiar with the idea. If a
 complete unified theory was discovered, it would only be a matter of time before it was digested and simplified
 in the same way and taught in schools, at least in outline. We would then all be able to have some
 understanding of the laws that govern the universe and are responsible for our existence.
 Even if we do discover a complete unified theory, it would not mean that we would be able to predict events in
 general, for two reasons. The first is the limitation that the uncertainty principle of quantum mechanics sets on
 our powers of prediction. There is nothing we can do to get around that. In practice, however, this first limitation
 is less restrictive than the second one. It arises from the fact that we could not solve the equations of the theory
 exactly, except in very simple situations. (We cannot even solve exactly for the motion of three bodies in
 Newton’s theory of gravity, and the difficulty increases with the number of bodies and the complexity of the
 theory.) We already know the laws that govern the behavior of matter under all but the most extreme
 conditions. In particular, we know the basic laws that underlie all of chemistry and biology. Yet we have
 certainly not reduced these subjects to the status of solved problems: we have, as yet, had little success in
 predicting human behavior from mathematical equations! So even if we do find a complete set of basic laws,
 there will still be in the years ahead the intellectually challenging task of developing better approximation
 methods, so that we can make useful predictions of the probable outcomes in complicated and realistic
 situations. A complete, consistent, unified theory is only the first step: our goal is a complete understanding of
 the events around us, and of our own existence.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (10 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 11
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/j.html (11 of 11) [2/20/2001 3:15:56 AM]
 CHAPTER 12
 CONCLUSION
 We find ourselves in a bewildering world. We want to make sense of what we see around us and to ask: What
 is the nature of the universe? What is our place in it and where did it and we come from? Why is it the way it is?
 To try to answer these questions we adopt some “world picture.” Just as an infinite tower of tortoises supporting
 the fiat earth is such a picture, so is the theory of superstrings. Both are theories of the universe, though the
 latter is much more mathematical and precise than the former. Both theories lack observational evidence: no
 one has ever seen a giant tortoise with the earth on its back, but then, no one has seen a superstring either.
 However, the tortoise theory fails to be a good scientific theory because it predicts that people should be able to
 fall off the edge of the world. This has not been found to agree with experience, unless that turns out to be the
 explanation for the people who are supposed to have disappeared in the Bermuda Triangle!
 The earliest theoretical attempts to describe and explain the universe involved the idea that events and natural
 phenomena were controlled by spirits with human emotions who acted in a very humanlike and unpredictable
 manner. These spirits inhabited natural objects, like rivers and mountains, including celestial bodies, like the
 sun and moon. They had to be placated and their favor sought in order to ensure the fertility of the soil and the
 rotation of the seasons. Gradually, however, it must have been noticed that there were certain regularities: the
 sun always rose in the east and set in the west, whether or not a sacrifice had been made to the sun god.
 Further, the sun, the moon, and the planets followed precise paths across the sky that could be predicted in
 advance with considerable accuracy. The sun and the moon might still be gods, but they were gods who
 obeyed strict laws, apparently without any exceptions, if one discounts stories like that of the sun stopping for
 Joshua.
 At first, these regularities and laws were obvious only in astronomy and a few other situations. However, as
 civilization developed, and particularly in the last 300 years, more and more regularities and laws were
 discovered. The success of these laws led Laplace at the beginning of the nineteenth century to postulate
 scientific determinism; that is, he suggested that there would be a set of laws that would determine the
 evolution of the universe precisely, given its configuration at one time.
 Laplace’s determinism was incomplete in two ways. It did not say how the laws should be chosen and it did not
 specify the initial configuration of the universe. These were left to God. God would choose how the universe
 began and what laws it obeyed, but he would not intervene in the universe once it had started. In effect, God
 was confined to the areas that nineteenth-century science did not understand.
 We now know that Laplace’s hopes of determinism cannot be realized, at least in the terms he had in mind.
 The uncertainty principle of quantum mechanics implies that certain pairs of quantities, such as the position and
 velocity of a particle, cannot both be predicted with complete accuracy. Quantum mechanics deals with this
 situation via a class of quantum theories in which particles don’t have well-defined positions and velocities but
 are represented by a wave. These quantum theories are deterministic in the sense that they give laws for the
 evolution of the wave with time. Thus if one knows the wave at one time, one can calculate it at any other time.
 The unpredictable, random element comes in only when we try to interpret the wave in terms of the positions
 and velocities of particles. But maybe that is our mistake: maybe there are no particle positions and velocities,
 but only waves. It is just that we try to fit the waves to our preconceived ideas of positions and velocities. The
 resulting mismatch is the cause of the apparent unpredictability.
 In effect, we have redefined the task of science to be the discovery of laws that will enable us to predict events
 up to the limits set by the uncertainty principle. The question remains, however: how or why were the laws and
 the initial state of the universe chosen?
 In this book I have given special prominence to the laws that govern gravity, because it is gravity that shapes
 the large-scale structure of the universe, even though it is the weakest of the four categories of forces. The
 laws of gravity were incompatible with the view held until quite recently that the universe is unchanging in time:
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 12
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/k.html (1 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:08 AM]
 the fact that gravity is always attractive implies that the universe must be either expanding or contracting.
 According to the general theory of relativity, there must have been a state of infinite density in the past, the big
 bang, which would have been an effective beginning of time. Similarly, if the whole universe recollapsed, there
 must be another state of infinite density in the future, the big crunch, which would be an end of time. Even if the
 whole universe did not recollapse, there would be singularities in any localized regions that collapsed to form
 black holes. These singularities would be an end of time for anyone who fell into the black hole. At the big bang
 and other singularities, all the laws would have broken down, so God would still have had complete freedom to
 choose what happened and how the universe began.
 When we combine quantum mechanics with general relativity, there seems to be a new possibility that did not
 arise before: that space and time together might form a finite, four-dimensional space without singularities or
 boundaries, like the surface of the earth but with more dimensions. It seems that this idea could explain many
 of the observed features of the universe, such as its large-scale uniformity and also the smaller-scale
 departures from homogeneity, like galaxies, stars, and even human beings. It could even account for the arrow
 of time that we observe. But if the universe is completely self-contained, with no singularities or boundaries,
 and completely described by a unified theory, that has profound implications for the role of God as Creator.
 Einstein once asked the question: “How much choice did God have in constructing the universe?” If the no
 boundary proposal is correct, he had no freedom at all to choose initial conditions. He would, of course, still
 have had the freedom to choose the laws that the universe obeyed. This, however, may not really have been all
 that much of a choice; there may well be only one, or a small number, of complete unified theories, such as the
 heterotic string theory, that are self-consistent and allow the existence of structures as complicated as human
 beings who can investigate the laws of the universe and ask about the nature of God.
 Even if there is only one possible unified theory, it is just a set of rules and equations. What is it that breathes
 fire into the equations and makes a universe for them to describe? The usual approach of science of
 constructing a mathematical model cannot answer the questions of why there should be a universe for the
 model to describe. Why does the universe go to all the bother of existing? Is the unified theory so compelling
 that it brings about its own existence? Or does it need a creator, and, if so, does he have any other effect on
 the universe? And who created him?
 Up to now, most scientists have been too occupied with the development of new theories that describe what
 the universe is to ask the question why. On the other hand, the people whose business it is to ask why, the
 philosophers, have not been able to keep up with the advance of scientific theories. In the eighteenth century,
 philosophers considered the whole of human knowledge, including science, to be their field and discussed
 questions such as: did the universe have a beginning? However, in the nineteenth and twentieth centuries,
 science became too technical and mathematical for the philosophers, or anyone else except a few specialists.
 Philosophers reduced the scope of their inquiries so much that Wittgenstein, the most famous philosopher of
 this century, said, “The sole remaining task for philosophy is the analysis of language.” What a comedown from
 the great tradition of philosophy from Aristotle to Kant!
 However, if we do discover a complete theory, it should in time be understandable in broad principle by
 everyone, not just a few scientists. Then we shall all, philosophers, scientists, and just ordinary people, be able
 to take part in the discussion of the question of why it is that we and the universe exist. If we find the answer to
 that, it would be the ultimate triumph of human reason – for then we would know the mind of God.
 ALBERT EINSTEIN
 Einstein’s connection with the politics of the nuclear bomb is well known: he signed the famous letter to
 President Franklin Roosevelt that persuaded the United States to take the idea seriously, and he engaged in
 postwar efforts to prevent nuclear war. But these were not just the isolated actions of a scientist dragged into
 the world of politics. Einstein’s life was, in fact, to use his own words, “divided between politics and equations.”
 Einstein’s earliest political activity came during the First World War, when he was a professor in Berlin.
 Sickened by what he saw as the waste of human lives, he became involved in antiwar demonstrations. His
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 12
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/k.html (2 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:08 AM]
 advocacy of civil disobedience and public encouragement of people to refuse conscription did little to endear
 him to his colleagues. Then, following the war, he directed his efforts toward reconciliation and improving
 international relations. This too did not make him popular, and soon his politics were making it difficult for him to
 visit the United States, even to give lectures.
 Einstein’s second great cause was Zionism. Although he was Jewish by descent, Einstein rejected the biblical
 idea of God. However, a growing awareness of anti-Semitism, both before and during the First World War, led
 him gradually to identify with the Jewish community, and later to become an outspoken supporter of Zionism.
 Once more unpopularity did not stop him from speaking his mind. His theories came under attack; an
 anti-Einstein organization was even set up. One man was convicted of inciting others to murder Einstein (and
 fined a mere six dollars). But Einstein was phlegmatic. When a book was published entitled 100 Authors
 Against Einstein, he retorted, “If I were wrong, then one would have been enough!”
 In 1933, Hitler came to power. Einstein was in America, and declared he would not return to Germany. Then,
 while Nazi militia raided his house and confiscated his bank account, a Berlin newspaper displayed the
 headline “Good News from Einstein – He’s Not Coming Back.” In the face of the Nazi threat, Einstein
 renounced pacifism, and eventually, fearing that German scientists would build a nuclear bomb, proposed that
 the United States should develop its own. But even before the first atomic bomb had been detonated, he was
 publicly warning of the dangers of nuclear war and proposing international control of nuclear weaponry.
 Throughout his life, Einstein’s efforts toward peace probably achieved little that would last – and certainly won
 him few friends. His vocal support of the Zionist cause, however, was duly recognized in 1952, when he was
 offered the presidency of Israel. He declined, saying he thought he was too naive in politics. But perhaps his
 real reason was different: to quote him again, “Equations are more important to me, because politics is for the
 present, but an equation is something for eternity.”
 GALILEO GALILEI
 Galileo, perhaps more than any other single person, was responsible for the birth of modern science. His
 renowned conflict with the Catholic Church was central to his philosophy, for Galileo was one of the first to
 argue that man could hope to understand how the world works, and, moreover, that we could do this by
 observing the real world.
 Galileo had believed Copernican theory (that the planets orbited the sun) since early on, but it was only when
 he found the evidence needed to support the idea that he started to publicly support it. He wrote about
 Copernicus’s theory in Italian (not the usual academic Latin), and soon his views became widely supported
 outside the universities. This annoyed the Aristotelian professors, who united against him seeking to persuade
 the Catholic Church to ban Copernicanism.
 Galileo, worried by this, traveled to Rome to speak to the ecclesiastical authorities. He argued that the Bible
 was not intended to tell us anything about scientific theories, and that it was usual to assume that, where the
 Bible conflicted with common sense, it was being allegorical. But the Church was afraid of a scandal that might
 undermine its fight against Protestantism, and so took repressive measures. It declared Copernicanism “false
 and erroneous” in 1616, and commanded Galileo never again to “defend or hold” the doctrine. Galileo
 acquiesced.
 In 1623, a longtime friend of Galileo’s became the Pope. Immediately Galileo tried to get the 1616 decree
 revoked. He failed, but he did manage to get permission to write a book discussing both Aristotelian and
 Copernican theories, on two conditions: he would not take sides and would come to the conclusion that man
 could in any case not determine how the world worked because God could bring about the same effects in
 ways unimagined by man, who could not place restrictions on God’s omnipotence.
 The book, Dialogue Concerning the Two Chief World Systems, was completed and published in 1632, with the
 full backing of the censors – and was immediately greeted throughout Europe as a literary and philosophical
 masterpiece. Soon the Pope, realizing that people were seeing the book as a convincing argument in favor of
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 12
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/k.html (3 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:08 AM]
 Copernicanism, regretted having allowed its publication. The Pope argued that although the book had the
 official blessing of the censors, Galileo had nevertheless contravened the 1616 decree. He brought Galileo
 before the Inquisition, who sentenced him to house arrest for life and commanded him to publicly renounce
 Copernicanism. For a second time, Galileo acquiesced.
 Galileo remained a faithful Catholic, but his belief in the independence of science had not been crushed. Four
 years before his death in 1642, while he was still under house arrest, the manuscript of his second major book
 was smuggled to a publisher in Holland. It was this work, referred to as Two New Sciences, even more than his
 support for Copernicus, that was to be the genesis of modern physics.
 ISAAC NEWTON
 Isaac Newton was not a pleasant man. His relations with other academics were notorious, with most of his later
 life spent embroiled in heated disputes. Following publication of Principia Mathematica – surely the most
 influential book ever written in physics – Newton had risen rapidly into public prominence. He was appointed
 president of the Royal Society and became the first scientist ever to be knighted.
 Newton soon clashed with the Astronomer Royal, John Flamsteed, who had earlier provided Newton with
 much-needed data for Principia, but was now withholding information that Newton wanted. Newton would not
 take no for an answer: he had himself appointed to the governing body of the Royal Observatory and then tried
 to force immediate publication of the data. Eventually he arranged for Flamsteed’s work to be seized and
 prepared for publication by Flamsteed’s mortal enemy, Edmond Halley. But Flamsteed took the case to court
 and, in the nick of time, won a court order preventing distribution of the stolen work. Newton was incensed and
 sought his revenge by systematically deleting all references to Flamsteed in later editions of Principia.
 A more serious dispute arose with the German philosopher Gottfried Leibniz. Both Leibniz and Newton had
 independently developed a branch of mathematics called calculus, which underlies most of modern physics.
 Although we now know that Newton discovered calculus years before Leibniz, he published his work much
 later. A major row ensued over who had been first, with scientists vigorously defending both contenders. It is
 remarkable, however, that most of the articles appearing in defense of Newton were originally written by his
 own hand – and only published in the name of friends! As the row grew, Leibniz made the mistake of appealing
 to the Royal Society to resolve the dispute. Newton, as president, appointed an “impartial” committee to
 investigate, coincidentally consisting entirely of Newton’s friends! But that was not all: Newton then wrote the
 committee’s report himself and had the Royal Society publish it, officially accusing Leibniz of plagiarism. Still
 unsatisfied, he then wrote an anonymous review of the report in the Royal Society’s own periodical. Following
 the death of Leibniz, Newton is reported to have declared that he had taken great satisfaction in “breaking
 Leibniz’s heart.”
 During the period of these two disputes, Newton had already left Cambridge and academe. He had been active
 in anti-Catholic politics at Cambridge, and later in Parliament, and was rewarded eventually with the lucrative
 post of Warden of the Royal Mint. Here he used his talents for deviousness and vitriol in a more socially
 acceptable way, successfully conducting a major campaign against counterfeiting, even sending several men to
 their death on the gallows.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Chapter 12
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/k.html (4 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:08 AM]
 GLOSSARY
 Absolute zero: The lowest possible temperature, at which substances contain no heat energy.
 Acceleration: The rate at which the speed of an object is changing.
 Anthropic principle: We see the universe the way it is because if it were different we would not be here to
 observe it.
 Antiparticle: Each type of matter particle has a corresponding antiparticle. When a particle collides with its
 antiparticle, they annihilate, leaving only energy.
 Atom: The basic unit of ordinary matter, made up of a tiny nucleus (consisting of protons and neutrons)
 surrounded by orbiting electrons.
 Big bang: The singularity at the beginning of the universe.
 Big crunch: The singularity at the end of the universe.
 Black hole: A region of space-time from which nothing, not even light, can escape, because gravity is so
 strong.
 Casimir effect: The attractive pressure between two flat, parallel metal plates placed very near to each other in
 a vacuum. The pressure is due to a reduction in the usual number of virtual particles in the space between the
 plates.
 Chandrasekhar limit: The maximum possible mass of a stable cold star, above which it must collapse into a
 black hole.
 Conservation of energy: The law of science that states that energy (or its equivalent in mass) can neither be
 created nor destroyed.
 Coordinates: Numbers that specify the position of a point in space and time.
 Cosmological constant: A mathematical device used by Einstein to give space-time an inbuilt tendency to
 expand.
 Cosmology: The study of the universe as a whole.
 Dark matter: Matter in galaxies, clusters, and possibly between clusters, that can not be observed directly but
 can be detected by its gravitational effect. As much as 90 percent of the mass of the universe may be in the
 form of dark matter.
 Duality: A correspondence between apparently different theories that lead to the same physical results.
 Einstein-Rosen bridge: A thin tube of space-time linking two black holes. Also see Wormhole.
 Electric charge: A property of a particle by which it may repel (or attract) other particles that have a charge of
 similar (or opposite) sign.
 Electromagnetic force: The force that arises between particles with electric charge; the second strongest of
 the four fundamental forces.
 Electron: A particle with negative electric charge that orbits the nucleus of an atom.
 Electroweak unification energy: The energy (around 100 GeV) above which the distinction between the
 electromagnetic force and the weak force disappears.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Glossary
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/l.html (1 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:19 AM]
 Elementary particle: A particle that, it is believed, cannot be subdivided.
 Event: A point in space-time, specified by its time and place.
 Event horizon: The boundary of a black hole.
 Exclusion principle: The idea that two identical spin-1/2 particles cannot have (within the limits set by the
 uncertainty principle) both the same position and the same velocity.
 Field: Something that exists throughout space and time, as opposed to a particle that exists at only one point at
 a time.
 Frequency: For a wave, the number of complete cycles per second.
 Gamma rays: Electromagnetic rays of very short wavelength, produced in radio-active decay or by collisions of
 elementary particles.
 General relativity: Einstein’s theory based on the idea that the laws of science should be the same for all
 observers, no matter how they are moving. It explains the force of gravity in terms of the curvature of a
 four-dimensional space-time.
 Geodesic: The shortest (or longest) path between two points.
 Grand unification energy: The energy above which, it is believed, the electro-magnetic force, weak force, and
 strong force become indistinguishable from each other.
 Grand unified theory (GUT): A theory which unifies the electromagnetic, strong, and weak forces.
 Imaginary time: Time measured using imaginary numbers.
 Light cone: A surface in space-time that marks out the possible directions for light rays passing through a
 given event.
 Light-second (light-year): The distance traveled by light in one second (year).
 Magnetic field: The field responsible for magnetic forces, now incorporated along with the electric field, into the
 electromagnetic field.
 Mass: The quantity of matter in a body; its inertia, or resistance to acceleration.
 Microwave background radiation: The radiation from the glowing of the hot early universe, now so greatly
 red-shifted that it appears not as light but as microwaves (radio waves with a wavelength of a few centimeters).
 Also see COBE, on page 145.
 Naked singularity: A space-time singularity not surrounded by a black hole.
 Neutrino: An extremely light (possibly massless) particle that is affected only by the weak force and gravity.
 Neutron: An uncharged particle, very similar to the proton, which accounts for roughly half the particles in an
 atomic nucleus.
 Neutron star: A cold star, supported by the exclusion principle repulsion between neutrons.
 No boundary condition: The idea that the universe is finite but has no boundary (in imaginary time).
 Nuclear fusion: The process by which two nuclei collide and coalesce to form a single, heavier nucleus.
 Nucleus: The central part of an atom, consisting only of protons and neutrons, held together by the strong
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Glossary
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/l.html (2 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:19 AM]
 force.
 Particle accelerator: A machine that, using electromagnets, can accelerate moving charged particles, giving
 them more energy.
 Phase: For a wave, the position in its cycle at a specified time: a measure of whether it is at a crest, a trough,
 or somewhere in between.
 Photon: A quantum of light.
 Planck’s quantum principle: The idea that light (or any other classical waves) can be emitted or absorbed
 only in discrete quanta, whose energy is proportional to their wavelength.
 Positron: The (positively charged) antiparticle of the electron.
 Primordial black hole: A black hole created in the very early universe.
 Proportional: ‘X is proportional to Y’ means that when Y is multiplied by any number, so is X. ‘X is inversely
 proportional to Y’ means that when Y is multiplied by any number, X is divided by that number.
 Proton: A positively charged particle, very similar to the neutron, that accounts for roughly half the particles in
 the nucleus of most atoms.
 Pulsar: A rotating neutron star that emits regular pulses of radio waves.
 Quantum: The indivisible unit in which waves may be emitted or absorbed.
 Quantum chromodynamics (QCD): The theory that describes the interactions of quarks and gluons.
 Quantum mechanics: The theory developed from Planck’s quantum principle and Heisenberg’s uncertainty
 principle.
 Quark: A (charged) elementary particle that feels the strong force. Protons and neutrons are each composed of
 three quarks.
 Radar: A system using pulsed radio waves to detect the position of objects by measuring the time it takes a
 single pulse to reach the object and be reflected back.
 Radioactivity: The spontaneous breakdown of one type of atomic nucleus into another.
 Red shift: The reddening of light from a star that is moving away from us, due to the Doppler effect.
 Singularity: A point in space-time at which the space-time curvature becomes infinite.
 Singularity theorem: A theorem that shows that a singularity must exist under certain circumstances – in
 particular, that the universe must have started with a singularity.
 Space-time: The four-dimensional space whose points are events.
 Spatial dimension: Any of the three dimensions that are spacelike – that is, any except the time dimension.
 Special relativity: Einstein’s theory based on the idea that the laws of science should be the same for all
 observers, no matter how they are moving, in the absence of gravitational phenomena.
 Spectrum: The component frequencies that make up a wave. The visible part of the sun’s spectrum can be
 seen in a rainbow.
 Spin: An internal property of elementary particles, related to, but not identical to, the everyday concept of spin.
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Glossary
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/l.html (3 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:19 AM]
 Stationary state: One that is not changing with time: a sphere spinning at a constant rate is stationary because
 it looks identical at any given instant.
 String theory: A theory of physics in which particles are described as waves on strings. Strings have length but
 no other dimension.
 Strong force: The strongest of the four fundamental forces, with the shortest range of all. It holds the quarks
 together within protons and neutrons, and holds the protons and neutrons together to form atoms.
 Uncertainty principle: The principle, formulated by Heisenberg, that one can never be exactly sure of both the
 position and the velocity of a particle; the more accurately one knows the one, the less accurately one can
 know the other.
 Virtual particle: In quantum mechanics, a particle that can never be directly detected, but whose existence
 does have measurable effects.
 Wave/particle duality: The concept in quantum mechanics that there is no distinction between waves and
 particles; particles may sometimes behave like waves, and waves like particles.
 Wavelength: For a wave, the distance between two adjacent troughs or two adjacent crests.
 Weak force: The second weakest of the four fundamental forces, with a very short range. It affects all matter
 particles, but not force-carrying particles.
 Weight: The force exerted on a body by a gravitational field. It is proportional to, but not the same as, its mass.
 White dwarf: A stable cold star, supported by the exclusion principle repulsion between electrons.
 Wormhole: A thin tube of space-time connecting distant regions of the universe. Wormholes might also link to
 parallel or baby universes and could provide the possibility of time travel.
 PREVIOUS NEXT
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Glossary
 file:///C|/WINDOWS/Desktop/blahh/Stephen Hawking - A brief history of time/l.html (4 of 4) [2/20/2001 3:16:19 AM]
 ACKNOWLEDGMENTS
 Many people have helped me in writing this book. My scientific colleagues have without exception been
 inspiring. Over the years my principal associates and collaborators were Roger Penrose, Robert Geroch,
 Brandon Carter, George Ellis, Gary Gibbons, Don Page, and Jim Hartle. I owe a lot to them, and to my
 research students, who have always given me help when needed.
 One of my students, Brian Whitt, gave me a lot of help writing the first edition of this book. My editor at Bantam
 Books, Peter Guzzardi, made innumerable comments which improved the book considerably. In addition, for
 this edition, I would like to thank Andrew Dunn, who helped me revise the text.
 I could not have written this book without my communication system. The software, called Equalizer, was
 donated by Walt Waltosz of Words Plus Inc., in Lancaster, California. My speech synthesizer was donated by
 Speech Plus, of Sunnyvale, California. The synthesizer and laptop computer were mounted on my wheelchair
 by David Mason, of Cambridge Adaptive Communication Ltd. With this system I can communicate better now
 than before I lost my voice.
 I have had a number of secretaries and assistants over the years in which I wrote and revised this book. On the
 secretarial side, I’m very grateful to Judy Fella, Ann Ralph, Laura Gentry, Cheryl Billington, and Sue Masey. My
 assistants have been Colin Williams, David Thomas, and Raymond Laflamme, Nick Phillips, Andrew Dunn,
 Stuart Jamieson, Jonathan Brenchley, Tim Hunt, Simon Gill, Jon Rogers, and Tom Kendall. They, my nurses,
 colleagues, friends, and family have enabled me to live a very full life and to pursue my research despite my
 disability.
 Stephen Hawking
 ABOUT THE AUTHOR
 Stephen Hawking, who was born in 1942 on the anniversary of Galileo’s death, holds Isaac Newton’s chair as
 Lucasian Professor of Mathematics at the University of Cambridge. Widely regarded as the most brilliant
 theoretical physicist since Einstein, he is also the author of Black Holes and Baby Universes, published in 1993,
 as well as numerous scientific papers and books.
 PREVIOUS
 A Brief History of Time - Stephen Hawking... Acknowledgments
Title: The Universe in a Nutshell
 Author: Stephen Hawking
 
 FOREWORD
 I
 HADN' T EXPECTE D M Y POPULA R BOOK , A Brief History of Time,
 to be such a success. It was on the London Sunday Times bestseller
 list for over four years, which is longer than any other book has
 been, and remarkable for a book on science that was not easy going.
 After that, people kept asking when I would write a sequel. I resisted
 because I didn't want to write Son of Brief History or A Slightly
 Longer History of Time, and because I was busy with research. But I
 have come to realize that there is room for a different kind of book
 that might be easier to understand. A Brief History of Time was
 organized in a linear fashion, with most chapters following and logically
 depending on the preceding chapters. This appealed to some
 readers, but others got stuck in the early chapters and never reached
 the more exciting material later on. By contrast, the present book is
 more like a tree: Chapters 1 and 2 form a central trunk from which
 the other chapters branch off.
 The branches are fairly independent of each other and can be
 tackled in any order after the central trunk. They correspond to
 areas I have worked on or thought about since the publication of A
 Brief History of Time. Thus they present a picture of some of the most
 active fields of current research. Within each chapter I have also
 tried to avoid a single linear structure. The illustrations and their
 captions provide an alternative route to the text, as in The Illustrated
 Brief History of Time, published in 1996 ; and the boxes, or sidebars,
 provide the opportunity to delve into certain topics in more detail
 than is possible in the main text.
 FOREWOR D 
 vii i
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 In 1988 , when A Brief History of Time was first published, the
 ultimate Theory of Everything seemed to be just over the horizon.
 How has the situation changed since then? Are we any closer to our
 goal? As will be described in this book, we have advanced a long
 way since then. But it is an ongoing journey still and the end is not
 yet in sight. According to the old saying, it is better to travel hopefully
 than to arrive. Our quest for discovery fuels our creativity in
 all fields, not just science. If we reached the end of the line, the
 human spirit would shrivel and die. But I don't think we will ever
 stand still: we shall increase in complexity, if not in depth, and shall
 always be the center of an expanding horizon of possibilities.
 I want to share my excitement at the discoveries that are being
 made and the picture of reality that is emerging. I have concentrated
 on areas I have worked on myself for a greater feeling of immediacy.
 The details of the work are very technical but I believe the
 broad ideas can be conveyed without a lot of mathematical baggage.
 I just hope I have succeeded.
 I have had a lot of help with this book. I would mention in particular
 Thomas Hertog and Neel Shearer, for assistance with the
 figures, captions, and boxes, Ann Harris and Kitty Ferguson, who
 edited the manuscript (or, more accurately, the computer files,
 because everything I write is electronic), Philip Dunn of the Book
 Laboratory and Moonrunner Design, who created the illustrations.
 But beyond that, I want to thank all those who have made it possible
 for me to lead a fairly normal life and carry on scientific
 research. Without them this book could not have been written.
 Stephen Hawking
 Cambridge, May 2, 2001 . 
 FOREWOR D
 M-theory
 Quantum mechanics
 General relativity
 10-dimensional
 membranes
 Superstrings
 Black holes
 11-dimensional
 supergravity
 P-branes 
 
 3
 CHAPTE R 1
 A BRIE F HISTORY O F
 RELATIVIT Y
 How Einstein laid the foundations of the two fundamental theories
 of the twentieth century: general relativity and quantum theory. 
 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 A
 LBERT EINSTEIN , TH E DISCOVERE R O F TH E SPECIA L AN D
 general theories of relativity, was born in Ulm, Germany, in
 1879 , but the following year the family moved to Munich,
 where his father, Hermann, and uncle, Jakob, set up a small and not
 very successful electrical business. Albert was no child prodigy, but
 claims that he did poorly at school seem to be an exaggeration. In
 189 4 his father's business failed and the family moved to Milan. His
 parents decided he should stay behind to finish school, but he did
 not like its authoritarianism, and within months he left to join his
 family in Italy. He later completed his education in Zurich, graduating
 from the prestigious Federal Polytechnical School, known as the
 ETH, in 1900 . His argumentative nature and dislike of authority did
 not endear him to the professors at the ETH and none of them
 offered him the position of assistant, which was the normal route to
 an academic career. Two years later, he finally managed to get a junior
 post at the Swiss patent office in Bern. It was while he held this
 job that in 190 5 he wrote three papers that both established him as
 one of the world's leading scientists and started two conceptual revolutions—revolutions
 that changed our understanding of time,
 space, and reality itself.
 Toward the end of the nineteenth century, scientists believed
 they were close to a complete description of the universe. They imagined
 that space was filled by a continuous medium called the "ether."
 Light rays and radio signals were waves in this ether, just as sound is
 pressure waves in air. All that was needed for a complete theory were
 careful measurements of the elastic properties of the ether. In fact,
 anticipating such measurements, the Jefferson Lab at Harvard
 University was built entirely without iron nails so as not to interfere
 with delicate magnetic measurements. However, the planners forgot
 that the reddish brown bricks of which the lab and most of Harvard
 are built contain large amounts of iron. The building is still in use
 today, although Harvard is still not sure how much weight a library
 floor without iron nails will support. 
 5
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 Albert Einstein in 1920. 
 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 By the century's end, discrepancies in the idea of an all-pervading
 ether began to appear. It was expected that light would travel at a
 fixed speed through the ether but that if you were traveling through
 the ether in the same direction as the light, its speed would appear
 lower, and if you were traveling in the opposite direction of the
 light, its speed would appear higher (Fig. 1.1) .
 Yet a series of experiments failed to support this idea. The
 most careful and accurate of these experiments was carried out by
 Albert Michelson and Edward Morley at the Case School of
 Applied Science in Cleveland, Ohio, in 1887 . They compared the
 speed of light in two beams at right angles to each other. As the
 Earth rotates on its axis and orbits the Sun, the apparatus moves
 through the ether with varying speed and direction (Fig. 1.2) . But
 Michelson and Morley found no daily or yearly differences
 between the two beams of light. It was as if light always traveled at
 the same speed relative to where one was, no matter how fast and
 in which direction one was moving (Fig. 1.3 , page 8) .
 Based on the Michelson-Morley experiment, the Irish physicist
 George FitzGerald and the Dutch physicist Hendrik Lorentz
 suggested that bodies moving through the ether would contract and
 that clocks would slow down. This contraction and the slowing
 down of clocks would be such that people would all measure the
 same speed for light, no matter how they were moving with respect
 to the ether. (FitzGerald and Lorentz still regarded ether as a real
 substance.) However, in a paper written in June 1905, Einstein
 (FIG. I.I, above)
 T H E FIXE D ETHE R THEOR Y
 If light were a wave in an elastic material
 called ether, the speed of light
 should appear higher to someone on
 a spaceship (a) moving toward it, and
 lower on a spaceship (b) traveling in
 the same direction as the light.
 (FIG. 1.2, opposite )
 No difference was found between the
 speed of light in the direction of the
 Earth's orbit and in a direction at right
 angles to it. 
 7
 BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y 
 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 9
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 pointed out that if one could not detect whether or not one was
 moving through space, the notion of an ether was redundant.
 Instead, he started from the postulate that the laws of science
 should appear the same to all freely moving observers. In particular,
 they should all measure the same speed for light, no matter how fast
 they were moving. The speed of light is independent of their
 motion and is the same in all directions.
 This required abandoning the idea that there is a universal
 quantity called time that all clocks would measure. Instead, everyone
 would have his or her own personal time. The times of two
 people would agree if the people were at rest with respect to each
 other, but not if they were moving.
 This has been confirmed by a number of experiments, including
 one in which two accurate clocks were flown in opposite directions
 around the world and returned showing very slightly different times
 (Fig. 1.4). This might suggest that if one wanted to live longer, one
 should keep flying to the east so that the plane's speed is added to the
 earth's rotation. However, the tiny fraction of a second one would
 gain would be more than canceled by eating airline meals.
 (FIG. 1.4)
 O ne version of the twins paradox
 (Fig. 1.5, page 10) has been tested
 experimentally by flying two accurate
 clocks in opposite directions around
 the world.
 When they met up again the clock
 that flew toward the east had recorded
 slightly less time.
 The time for passengers
 in the aircraft flying
 toward the east is less
 than that for those in the
 aircraft flying toward the
 Flying west. from west to east
 The clock in the aircraft
 flying toward the west
 records more time than
 its twin traveling in the
 opposite direction Flying from east to west 
 1 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 1 1
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 Einstein's postulate that the laws of nature should appear the
 same to all freely moving observers was the foundation of the theory
 of relativity, so called because it implied that only relative motion
 was important. Its beauty and simplicity convinced many thinkers,
 but there remained a lot of opposition. Einstein had overthrown two
 of the absolutes of nineteenth-century science: absolute rest, as represented
 by the ether, and absolute or universal time that all clocks
 would measure. Many people found this an unsettling concept. Did
 it imply, they asked, that everything was relative, that there were no
 absolute moral standards? This unease continued throughout the
 1920s and 1930s . When Einstein was awarded the Nobel Prize in
 1921, the citation was for important but (by his standard) comparatively
 minor work also carried out in 1905. It made no mention of
 relativity, which was considered too controversial. (I still get two or
 three letters a week telling me Einstein was wrong.) Nevertheless,
 the theory of relativity is now completely accepted by the
 scientific community, and its predictions have been verified in
 countless applications. 
 1 2
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 FIG. 1.7
 A very important consequence of relativity is the relation
 between mass and energy. Einstein's postulate that the speed of
 light should appear the same to everyone implied that nothing
 could be moving faster than light. What happens is that as one uses
 energy to accelerate anything, whether a particle or a spaceship, its
 mass increases, making it harder to accelerate it further. To accelerate
 a particle to the speed of light would be impossible because it
 would take an infinite amount of energy. Mass and energy are
 equivalent, as is summed up in Einstein's famous equation E = mc 2
 (Fig. 1.7) . This is probably the only equation in physics to have
 recognition on the street. Among its consequences was the realization
 that if the nucleus of a uranium atom fissions into two nuclei
 with slightly less total mass, this will release a tremendous amount
 of energy (see pages 14-15 , Fig. 1.8) .
 In 1939 , as the prospect of another world war loomed, a group
 of scientists who realized these implications persuaded Einstein to
 overcome his pacifist scruples and add his authority to a letter to 
 13
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 President Roosevelt urging the United States to start a program of
 nuclear research.
 This led to the Manhattan Project and ultimately to the bombs
 that exploded over Hiroshima and Nagasaki in 1945 . Some people
 have blamed the atom bomb on Einstein because he discovered the
 relationship between mass and energy; but that is like blaming
 Newton for causing airplanes to crash because he discovered gravity.
 Einstein himself took no part in the Manhattan Project and was
 horrified by the dropping of the bomb.
 After his groundbreaking papers in 1905 , Einstein's scientific
 reputation was established. But it was not until 190 9 that he was
 offered a position at the University of Zurich that enabled him to
 leave the Swiss patent office. Two years later, he moved to the
 German University in Prague, but he came back to Zurich in 1912 ,
 this time to the ETH. Despite the anti-Semitism that was common in
 much of Europe, even in the universities, he was now an academic hot
 property. Offers came in from Vienna and Utrecht, but he chose to 
 14
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Uranium (U-235)
 Uranium (U-236) (n)
 Gamma ray
 (n)
 Impact by neutron (n)
 (U-235) compound
 nucleus oscillates and
 is unstable
 (Ba-144) compound
 nucleus
 oscillates and is
 unstable
 accept a research position with the Prussian Academy of Sciences in
 Berlin because it freed him from teaching duties. He moved to Berlin
 in April 1914 and was joined shortly after by his wife and two sons.
 The marriage had been in a bad way for some time, however, and his
 family soon returned to Zurich. Although he visited them occasionally,
 he and his wife were eventually divorced. Einstein later married
 his cousin Elsa, who lived in Berlin. The fact that he spent the war
 years as a bachelor, without domestic commitments, may be one reason
 why this period was so productive for him scientifically.
 Although the theory of relativity fit well with the laws that
 governed electricity and magnetism, it was not compatible with
 Newton's law of gravity. This law said that if one changed the distribution
 of matter in one region of space, the change in the gravitational
 field would be felt instantaneously everywhere else in the
 universe. Not only would this mean one could send signals faster
 than light (something that was forbidden by relativity); in order to
 know what instantaneous meant, it also required the existence of
 absolute or universal time, which relativity had abolished in favor
 of personal time. 
 15
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 Bound neutron
 Proton
 Free neutron
 Einstein's equation between
 energy (E), mass (m), and
 the speed of light (c) is such
 that a small amount of mass
 is equivalent to an enormous
 amount of energy: E=mc 2
 .
 (Kr-89) compound nucleus
 oscillates and is unstable
 Fission yields an average
 of 2.4 neutrons and an
 energy of 2l5MeV
 (n) neutrons can
 initiate a chain reaction
 CHAI N REACTIO N
 A neutron from the original U-235 fission impacts
 another nucleus. This causes it to fission in turn, and
 a chain reaction of further collisions begins.
 If the reaction sustains itself it is called "critical" and
 the mass of U-235 is said to be a "critical mass." 
 1 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 1.9)
 An observer in a box cannot tell the difference
 between being in a stationary
 elevator on Earth (a) and being accelerated
 by a rocket in free space (b),
 If the rocket motor is turned off (c),
 it feels as if the elevator is in free fall
 to the bottom of the shaft (d).
 Einstein was aware of this difficulty in 1907, while he was still
 at the patent office in Bern, but it was not until he was in Prague in
 1911 that he began to think seriously about the problem. He realized
 that there is a close relationship between acceleration and a gravitational
 field. Someone inside a closed box, such as an elevator, could
 not tell whether the box was at rest in the Earth's gravitational field
 or was being accelerated by a rocket in free space. (Of course, this
 was before the age of Star Trek, and so Einstein thought of people in
 elevators rather than spaceships.) But one cannot accelerate or fall
 freely very far in an elevator before disaster strikes (Fig. 1.9). 
 17
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 FIG. 1.10
 FIG. I.II
 If the Earth were flat (FIG. 1. 10) one
 could say that either the apple fell on
 Newton's head because of gravity or
 that the Earth and Newton were
 accelerating upward. This equivalence
 didn't work for a spherical Earth (FIG.
 I. I I) because people on opposite
 sides of the world would be getting
 farther away from each other Einstein
 overcame this difficulty by making
 space and time curved.
 If the Earth were flat, one could equally well say that the apple
 fell on Newton's head because of gravity or because Newton and
 the surface of the Earth were accelerating upward (Fig. 1.10). This
 equivalence between acceleration and gravity didn't seem to work
 for a round Earth, however—people on the opposite sides of the
 world would have to be accelerating in opposite directions but staying
 at a constant distance from each other (Fig. 1.11).
 But on his return to Zurich in 1912 Einstein had the brain wave
 of realizing that the equivalence would work if the geometry of
 spacetime was curved and not flat, as had been assumed hitherto. 
 1 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 1.12) SPACETIM E CURVE S
 Acceleration and gravity can be equivalent
 only if a massive body curves
 spacetime, thereby bending the paths
 of objects in its neighborhood.
 His idea was that mass and energy would warp spacetime in some
 manner yet to be determined. Objects such as apples or planets
 would try to move in straight lines through spacetime, but their
 paths would appear to be bent by a gravitational field because
 spacetime is curved (Fig. 1.12).
 With the help of his friend Marcel Grossmann, Einstein studied
 the theory of curved spaces and surfaces that had been developed
 earlier by Georg Friedrich Riemann. However, Riemann
 thought only of space being curved. It took Einstein to realize that
 it is spacetime which is curved. Einstein and Grossmann wrote a
 joint paper in 191 3 in which they put forward the idea that what we
 think of as gravitational forces are just an expression of the fact that 
 1 9
 BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 spacetime is curved. However, because of a mistake by Einstein
 (who was quite human and fallible), they weren't able to find the
 equations that related the curvature of spacetime to the mass and
 energy in it. Einstein continued to work on the problem in Berlin,
 undisturbed by domestic matters and largely unaffected by the war,
 until he finally found the right equations in November 1915. He
 had discussed his ideas with the mathematician David Hilbert during
 a visit to the University of Gottingen in the summer of 1915,
 and Hilbert independently found the same equations a few days
 before Einstein. Nevertheless, as Hilbert himself admitted, the
 credit for the new theory belonged to Einstein. It was his idea to
 relate gravity to the warping of spacetime. It is a tribute to the civilized
 state of Germany at this period that such scientific discussions
 and exchanges could go on undisturbed even in wartime. It
 was a sharp contrast to the Nazi era twenty years later.
 The new theory of curved spacetime was called general relativity
 to distinguish it from the original theory without gravity,
 which was now known as special relativity. It was confirmed in a
 spectacular fashion in 1919 when a British expedition to West
 Africa observed a slight bending of light from a star passing near 
 2 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 2 1
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 (FIG. 1.13) LIGH T CURVE S
 Light from a star passing near the Sun is deflected by the way the mass of the Sun
 curves spacetime (a).This produces a slight shift in the apparent position of the star
 as seen from the Earth (b).This can be observed during an eclipse.
 the sun during an eclipse (Fig. 1.13). Her e was direct evidence that
 space and time are warped, and it spurred the greatest change in our
 perception of the universe in which we live since Euclid wrote his
 Elements of Geometry around 30 0 B.C.
 Einstein's general theory of relativity transformed space and
 time from a passive background in which events take place to active
 participants in the dynamics of the universe. Thi s led to a great
 problem that remains at the forefront of physics in the twenty-first
 century. Th e universe is full of matter, and matter warps spacetime
 in such a way that bodies fall together. Einstein found that his equations
 didn't have a solution that described a static universe,
 unchanging in time. Rather than give up such an everlasting universe,
 which he and mos t othe r people believed in, he fudged the
 equations by adding a term called the cosmological constant, which
 warped spacetime in the opposite sense, so that bodies move apart.
 T h e repulsive effect of the cosmological constant could balance the
 attractive effect of the matter, thus allowing a static solution for the
 universe. Thi s was one of the great missed opportunities of theoretical
 physics. If Einstein had stuck with his original equations, he
 could have predicted that the universe must be either expanding or
 contracting. As it was, the possibility of a time-dependent universe
 wasn't taken seriously until observations in the 1920s by the 100-
 inch telescope on Mount Wilson.
 Thes e observations revealed that the farther othe r galaxies are
 from us, the faster they are moving away. Th e universe is expanding,
 with the distance between any two galaxies steadily increasing
 with time (Fig. 1.14, page 22). Thi s discovery removed the need for
 a cosmological constant in order to have a static solution for the
 universe. Einstein later called the cosmological constant the greatest
 mistake of his life. However, it now seems that it may not have
 been a mistake after all: recent observations, described in Chapte r
 3, suggest that there may indeed be a small cosmological constant. 
 11
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 1.14)
 Observations of galaxies indicate that
 the universe is expanding: the distance
 between almost any pair of galaxies is
 increasing.
 General relativity completely changed the discussion of the origin
 and fate of the universe. A static universe could have existed forever
 or could have been created in its present form at some time in
 the past. However, if galaxies are moving apart now, it means that
 they must have been closer together in the past. About fifteen billion
 years ago, they would all have been on top of each other and the density
 would have been very large. This state was called the "primeval
 atom" by the Catholic priest Georges Lemaitre, who was the first to
 investigate the origin of the universe that we now call the big bang.
 Einstein seems never to have taken the big bang seriously. He
 apparently thought that the simple model of a uniformly expanding
 universe would break down if one followed the motions of the
 galaxies back in time, and that the small sideways velocities of the
 galaxies would cause them to miss each other. He thought the universe
 might have had a previous contracting phase, with a bounce
 into the present expansion at a fairly moderate density. However, we
 now know that in order for nuclear reactions in the early universe to 
 2 3
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y
 The 100-inch Hooker telescope at
 Mount Wilson Observatory.
 produce the amounts of light elements we observe around us, the
 density must have been at least ten tons per cubic inch and the temperature
 ten billion degrees. Further, observations of the microwave
 background indicate that the density was probably once a trillion
 trillion trillion trillion trillion trillion (1 with 72 zeros after it) tons
 per cubic inch. We also now know that Einstein's general theory of
 relativity does not allow the universe to bounce from a contracting
 phase to the present expansion. As will be discussed in Chapter 2,
 Roger Penrose and I were able to show that general relativity predicts
 that the universe began in the big bang. So Einstein's theory
 does imply that time has a beginning, although he was never happy
 with the idea.
 Einstein was even more reluctant to admit that general relativity
 predicted that time would come to an end for massive stars when they
 reached the end of their life and no longer generated enough heat to
 balance the force of their own gravity, which was trying to make them
 smaller. Einstein thought that such stars would settle down to some 
 24
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 1.15)
 When a massive star exhausts its
 nuclear fuel, it will lose heat and contract.
 The warping of spacetime will
 become so great that a black hole will
 be created from which light cannot
 escape. Inside the black hole time will
 come to an end.
 final state, but we now know that there are no final-state configurations
 for stars of more than twice the mass of the sun. Such stars will
 continue to shrink until they become black holes, regions of spacetime
 that are so warped that light cannot escape from them (Fig. 1.15).
 Penrose and I showed that general relativity predicted that
 time would come to an end inside a black hole, both for the star and
 for any unfortunate astronaut who happened to fall into it. But both
 the beginning and the end of time would be places where the equations
 of general relativity could not be defined. Thus the theory
 could not predict what should emerge from the big bang. Some saw
 this as an indication of Cod's freedom to start the universe off in any
 way God wanted, but others (including myself) felt that the beginning
 of the universe should be governed by the same laws that held
 at other times. We have made some progress toward this goal, as
 will be described in Chapter 3, but we don't yet have a complete
 understanding of the origin of the universe.
 The reason general relativity broke down at the big bang was
 that it was not compatible with quantum theory, the other great conceptual
 revolution of the early twentieth century. The first step
 toward quantum theory had come in 1900, when Max Planck in
 Berlin discovered that the radiation from a body that was glowing
 red-hot was explainable if light could be emitted or absorbed only if
 it came in discrete packets, called quanta. In one of his groundbreaking
 papers, written in 1905 when he was at the patent office, Einstein
 showed that Planck's quantum hypothesis could explain what is called
 the photoelectric effect, the way certain metals give off electrons
 when light falls on them. This is the basis of modern light detectors
 and television cameras, and it was for this work that Einstein was
 awarded the Nobel Prize for physics.
 Einstein continued to work on the quantum idea into the 1920s,
 but he was deeply disturbed by the work of Werner Heisenberg in
 Copenhagen, Paul Dirac in Cambridge, and Erwin Schrodinger in
 Zurich, who developed a new picture of reality called quantum
 mechanics. No longer did tiny particles have a definite position and 
 25
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y 
 2 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Albert Einstein with a puppet of
 himself shortly after arriving in
 America for good.
 speed. Instead, the more accurately one determined a particle's position,
 the less accurately one could determine its speed, and vice
 versa. Einstein was horrified by this random, unpredictable element
 in the basic laws and never fully accepted quantum mechanics. His
 feelings were expressed in his famous dictum "God does not play
 dice." Most other scientists, however, accepted the validity of the
 new quantum laws because of the explanations they gave for a
 whole range of previously unaccounted-for phenomena and their
 excellent agreement with observations. They are the basis of modern
 developments in chemistry, molecular biology, and electronics,
 and the foundation for the technology that has transformed the
 world in the last fifty years.
 In December 1932, aware that the Nazis and Hitler were about
 to come to power, Einstein left Germany and four months later
 renounced his citizenship, spending the last twenty years of his life
 at the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton, New Jersey.
 In Germany, the Nazis launched a campaign against "Jewish
 science" and the many German scientists who were Jews; this is part
 of the reason that Germany was not able to build an atomic bomb.
 Einstein and relativity were principal targets of this campaign.
 When told of the publication of a book entitled 1OO Authors Against
 Einstein, he replied: "Why one hundred? If I were wrong, one would
 have been enough." After the Second World War, he urged the
 Allies to set up a world government to control the atomic bomb. In
 1948, he was offered the presidency of the new state of Israel but
 turned it down. He once said: "Politics is for
 moment, but an equation is for eternity." The
 Einstein equations of general relativity are his best
 epitaph and memorial. They should last as long
 as the universe.
 The world has changed far more in the last
 hundred years than in any previous century. The
 reason has not been new political or economic
 doctrines but the vast developments in technology
 made possible by advances in basic science.
 Who better symbolizes those advances than
 Albert Einstein?
 the 
 27
 A BRIE F HISTOR Y O F RELATIVIT Y 
 
 29
 Einstein's general relativity gives time a shape.
 How this can be reconciled with quantum theory.
 CHAPTE R 2
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E 
 30
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2.1) TH E MODE L O F TIM E A S A RAILROA D TRAC K
 But is it a main line that only operates in one direction
 —toward the future—or can it loop back to rejoin the
 main line at an earlier junction? 
 3 1
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 W
 H A T I S TIME ? I S I T A N EVER-ROLLIN G STREA M THA T
 bears all our dreams away, as the old hymn says? Or is
 it a railroad track? Maybe it has loops and branches, so
 you can keep going forward and yet return to an earlier station on
 the line (Fig. 2.1) .
 The nineteenth-century author Charles Lamb wrote: "Nothing
 puzzles me like time and space. And yet nothing troubles me less
 than time and space, because I never think of them." Most of us
 don't worry about time and space most of the time, whatever that
 may be; but we all do wonder sometimes what time is, how it began,
 and where it is leading us.
 Any sound scientific theory, whether of time or of any other
 concept, should in my opinion be based on the most workable philosophy
 of science: the positivist approach put forward by Karl
 Popper and others. According to this way of thinking, a scientific
 theory is a mathematical model that describes and codifies the
 observations we make. A good theory will describe a large range of
 phenomena on the basis of a few simple postulates and will make
 definite predictions that can be tested. If the predictions agree with
 the observations, the theory survives that test, though it can never
 be proved to be correct. On the other hand, if the observations disagree
 with the predictions, one has to discard or modify the theory.
 (At least, that is what is supposed to happen. In practice, people
 often question the accuracy of the observations and the reliability
 and moral character of those making the observations.) If one takes
 the positivist position, as I do, one cannot say what time actually is.
 All one can do is describe what has been found to be a very good
 mathematical model for time and say what predictions it makes. 
 32
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2.2)
 Newton's time
 was separate
 from space,
 as if it were a
 railroad track
 that stretched
 to infinity in
 both directions.
 Isaac Newton published his
 mathematical model of time
 and space over 30 0 years ago.
 Isaac Newton gave us the first mathematical model for time
 and space in his Principia Mathematica, published in 1687. Newton
 occupied the Lucasian chair at Cambridge that I now hold, though
 it wasn't electrically operated in his time. In Newton's model, time
 and space were a background in which events took place but which
 weren't affected by them. Time was separate from space and was
 considered to be a single line, or railroad track, that was infinite in
 both directions (Fig. 2.2). Time itself was considered eternal, in the
 sense that it had existed, and would exist, forever. By contrast, most
 people thought the physical universe had been created more or less
 in its present state only a few thousand years ago. This worried
 philosophers such as the German thinker Immanuel Kant. If the
 universe had indeed been created, why had there been an infinite
 wait before the creation? On the other hand, if the universe had
 existed forever, why hadn't everything that was going to happen
 already happened, meaning that history was over? In particular,
 why hadn't the universe reached thermal equilibrium, with everything
 at the same temperature? 
 33
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E 
 34
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Kant called this problem an "antimony of pure reason," because
 it seemed to be a logical contradiction; it didn't have a resolution.
 But it was a contradiction only within the context of the Newtonian
 mathematical model, in which time was an infinite line, independent
 of what was happening in the universe. However, as we saw in
 Chapter 1, in 1915 a completely new mathematical model was put
 forward by Einstein: the general theory of relativity. In the years
 since Einstein's paper, we have added a few ribbons and bows, but
 our model of time and space is still based on what Einstein proposed.
 This and the following chapters will describe how our ideas have
 developed in the years since Einstein's revolutionary paper. It has
 been a success story of the work of a large number of people, and
 I'm proud to have made a small contribution.
 (FIG. 2.4 )
 T H E RUBBE R SHEE T ANALOG Y
 The large ball in the center represents
 a massive body such as a star
 Its weight curves the sheet near it
 The ball bearings rolling on the sheet
 are deflected by this curvature and go
 around the large ball, in the same way
 that planets in the gravitational field of
 a star can orbit it. 
 35
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 General relativity combines the time dimension with the three
 dimensions of space to form what is called spacetime (see page 33 ,
 Fig. 2.3) . The theory incorporates the effect of gravity by saying
 that the distribution of matter and energy in the universe warps and
 distorts spacetime, so that it is not flat. Objects in this spacetime try
 to move in straight lines, but because spacetime is curved, their
 paths appear bent. They move as if affected by a gravitational field.
 As a rough analogy, not to be taken too literally, imagine a sheet
 of rubber. One can place a large ball on the sheet to represent the
 Sun. The weight of the ball will depress the sheet and cause it to be
 curved near the Sun. If one now rolls little ball bearings on the sheet,
 they won't roll straight across to the other side but instead will go
 around the heavy weight, like planets orbiting the Sun (Fig. 2.4) .
 The analogy is incomplete because in it only a two-dimensional
 section of space (the surface of the rubber sheet) is curved, and
 time is left undisturbed, as it is in Newtonian theory. However, in
 the theory of relativity, which agrees with a large number of experiments,
 time and space are inextricably tangled up. One cannot curve
 space without involving time as well. Thus time has a shape. By curving
 space and time, general relativity changes them from being a
 passive background against which events take place to being active,
 dynamic participants in what happens. In Newtonian theory, where
 time existed independently of anything else, one could ask: What
 did God do before He created the universe? As Saint Augustine said,
 one should not joke about this, as did a man who said, "He was
 preparing Hell for those who pry too deep." It is a serious question
 that people have pondered down the ages. According to Saint
 Augustine, before God made heaven and earth, He did not make
 anything at all. In fact, this is very close to modern ideas.
 In general relativity, on the other hand, time and space do not
 exist independently of the universe or of each other. They are defined
 by measurements within the universe, such as the number of vibrations
 of a quartz crystal in a clock or the length of a ruler. It is quite
 conceivable that time defined in this way, within the universe, should
 have a minimum or maximum value—in other words, a beginning or
 an end. It would make no sense to ask what happened before the
 beginning or after the end, because such times would not be defined. 
 36
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 It was clearly important to decide whether the mathematical
 model of general relativity predicted that the universe, and time
 itself, should have a beginning or end. The general prejudice among
 theoretical physicists, including Einstein, held that time should be
 infinite in both directions. Otherwise, there were awkward questions
 about the creation of the universe, which seemed to be outside
 the realm of science. Solutions of the Einstein equations were
 known in which time had a beginning or end, but these were all
 very special, with a large amount of symmetry. It was thought that
 in a real body, collapsing under its own gravity pressure or sideways
 velocities would prevent all the matter falling together to the same
 point, where the density would be infinite. Similarly, if one traced
 the expansion of the universe back in time, one would find that the
 matter of the universe didn't all emerge from a point of infinite density.
 Such a point of infinite density was called a singularity and
 would be a beginning or an end of time.
 In 1963 , two Russian scientists, Evgenii Lifshitz and Isaac
 Khalatnikov, claimed to have proved that solutions of the Einstein
 equations with a singularity all had a special arrangement of matter
 and velocities. The chances that the solution representing the universe
 would have this special arrangement were practically zero.
 Almost all solutions that could represent the universe would avoid
 having a singularity of infinite density: Before the era during which
 the universe has been expanding, there must have been a previous
 contracting phase during which matter fell together but missed colliding
 with itself, moving apart again in the present expanding
 phase. If this were the case, time would continue on forever, from
 the infinite past to the infinite future.
 Not everyone was convinced by the arguments of Lifshitz and
 Khalatnikov. Instead, Roger Penrose and I adopted a different
 approach, based not on a detailed study of solutions but on the
 global structure of spacetime. In general relativity, spacetime is
 curved not only by massive objects in it but also by the energy in
 it. Energy is always positive, so it gives spacetime a curvature that
 bends the paths of light rays toward each other.
 Now consider our past light cone (Fig. 2.5), that is, the paths
 through spacetime of the light rays from distant galaxies that reach
 (FIG. 2.5 ) OU R PAS T LIGH T CON E
 When we look at distant galaxies, we
 are looking at the universe at an earlier
 time because light travels at a finite
 speed. If we represent time by the
 vertical direction and represent two
 of the three space directions horizontally,
 the light now reaching us at the
 point at the top has traveled toward
 us on a cone.
 Observer looking back through time
 Galaxies as they appeared recently
 Galaxies as they appeared 5
 billion years ago
 The background radiation 
 3 7
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E 
 38
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 COSMI C MICROWAV E BACKGROUN D SPECTRU M FRO M COB E
 (FIG. 2.6 )
 MEASUREMEN T O F TH E SPECTRU M
 O F MICROWAV E BACKGROUN D
 The spectrum—the distribution of intensity
 with frequency—of the cosmic
 microwave background radiation is
 characteristic of that from a hot body.
 For the radiation to be in thermal
 equilibrium, matter must have scattered
 it many times. This indicates that
 there must have been sufficient matter
 in our past light cone to cause it to
 bend in.
 us at the present time. In a diagram with time plotted upward and
 space plotted sideways, this is a cone with its vertex, or point, at us.
 As we go toward the past, down the cone from the vertex, we see
 galaxies at earlier and earlier times. Because the universe has been
 expanding and everything used to be much closer together, as we
 look back further we are looking back through regions of higher
 matter density. We observe a faint background of microwave radiation
 that propagates to us along our past light cone from a much
 earlier time, when the universe was much denser and hotter than it
 is now. By tuning receivers to different frequencies of microwaves,
 we can measure the spectrum (the distribution of power arranged 
 39
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 (FIG. 2.7) WARPIN G SPACETIM E
 Because gravity is attractive, matter
 always warps spacetime so that light
 rays bend toward each other.
 by frequency) of this radiation. We find a spectrum that is characteristic
 of radiation from a body at a temperature of 2. 7 degrees
 above absolute zero. This microwave radiation is not much good
 for defrosting frozen pizza, but the fact that the spectrum agrees so
 exactly with that of radiation from a body at 2. 7 degrees tells us that
 the radiation must have come from regions that are opaque to
 microwaves (Fig. 2.6) .
 Thus we can conclude that our past light cone must pass
 through a certain amount of matter as one follows it back. This
 amount of matter is enough to curve spacetime, so the light rays in
 our past light cone are bent back toward each other (Fig. 2.7) . 
 40
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 4 1
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 As one goes back in time, the cross sections of our past light
 cone reach a maximum size and begin to get smaller again. Our past
 is pear-shaped (Fig. 2.8).
 As one follows our past light cone back still further, the positive
 energy density of matter causes the light rays to bend toward
 each other more strongly. The cross section of the light cone will
 shrink to zero size in a finite time. This means that all the matter
 inside our past light cone is trapped in a region whose boundary
 shrinks to zero. It is therefore not very surprising that Penrose and
 I could prove that in the mathematical model of general relativity,
 time must have a beginning in what is called the big bang. Similar
 arguments show that time would have an end, when stars or galaxies
 collapse under their own gravity to form black holes. We had
 sidestepped Kant's antimony of pure reason by dropping his implicit
 assumption that time had a meaning independent of the universe.
 Our paper, proving time had a beginning, won the second prize in
 the competition sponsored by the Gravity Research Foundation in
 1968, and Roger and I shared the princely sum of $300. I don't think
 the other prize essays that year have shown much enduring value.
 There were various reactions to our work. It upset many physicists,
 but it delighted those religious leaders who believed in an act
 of creation, for here was scientific proof. Meanwhile, Lifshitz and
 Khalatnikov were in an awkward position. They couldn't argue with
 the mathematical theorems that we had proved, but under the
 Soviet system they couldn't admit they had been wrong and
 Western science had been right. However, they saved the situation
 by finding a more general family of solutions with a singularity,
 which weren't special in the way their previous solutions had been.
 This enabled them to claim singularities, and the beginning or end
 of time, as a Soviet discovery.
 (FIG. 2.8 ) TIM E I S PEAR-SHAPE D
 If one follows our past light cone back in time, it will be bent back by the matter in the
 early universe. The whole universe we observe is contained within a region whose
 boundary shrinks to zero at the big bang. This would be a singularity, a place where the
 density of matter would be infinite and classical general relativity would break down. 
 4 2
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Low-frequency wavelengths disturb
 the velocity of the particle less.
 High-frequency wavelengths disturb
 the velocity of the particle more.
 The longer the wavelength used to
 observe a particle, the greater the
 uncertainty of its position.
 The shorter the wavelength used to
 observe a particle, the greater the
 certainty of its position.
 T H E UNCERTAINT Y PRINCIPL E 
 4 3
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 HEISENBERG' S UNCERTAINT Y EQUATIO N
 The uncertainty
 of the position
 of the particle
 N o t smaller than Planck's constant
 The mass of
 the particle
 The uncertainty
 of the velocity
 of the particle
 Most physicists still instinctively disliked the idea of time having
 a beginning or end. They therefore pointed out that the mathematical
 model might not be expected to be a good description of
 spacetime near a singularity. The reason is that general relativity,
 which describes the gravitational force, is a classical theory, as
 noted in Chapter 1, and does not incorporate the uncertainty of
 quantum theory that governs all other forces we know. This inconsistency
 does not matter in most of the universe most of the time,
 because the scale on which spacetime is curved is very large and the
 scale on which quantum effects are important is very small. But near
 a singularity, the two scales would be comparable, and quantum
 gravitational effects would be important. So what the singularity
 theorems of Penrose and myself really established is that our classical
 region of spacetime is bounded to the past, and possibly to the
 future, by regions in which quantum gravity is important. To understand
 the origin and fate of the universe, we need a quantum theory
 of gravity, and this will be the subject of most of this book.
 Quantum theories of systems such as atoms, with a finite number
 of particles, were formulated in the 1920s, by Heisenberg, Schrodinger,
 and Dirac. (Dirac was another previous holder of my chair in
 Cambridge, but it still wasn't motorized.) However, people encountered
 difficulties when they tried to extend quantum ideas to the Maxwell
 field, which describes electricity, magnetism, and light. 
 4 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Direction of oscillation of pendulum
 The wavelength is the distance
 between the peaks of a wave.
 (FIG. 2.9)
 TRAVELIN G WAV E WIT H OSCILLAT ­
 N G PENDULU M
 Electromagnetic radiation travels
 through space as a wave, with its electric
 and magnetic fields oscillating, like
 a pendulum, in directions transverse
 to the wave's direction of motion. The
 radiation can be made up of fields of
 different wavelengths.
 One can think of the Maxwell field as being made up of waves
 of different wavelengths (the distance between one wave crest and
 the next). In a wave, the field will swing from one value to another
 like a pendulum (Fig. 2.9).
 According to quantum theory, the ground state, or lowest
 energy state, of a pendulum is not just sitting at the lowest energy
 point, pointing straight down. That would have both a definite
 position and a definite velocity, zero. This would be a violation of
 the uncertainty principle, which forbids the precise measurement
 of both position and velocity at the same time. The uncertainty
 in the position multiplied by the uncertainty in the
 momentum must be greater than a certain quantity, known as
 Planck's constant—a number that is too long to keep writing
 down, so we use a symbol for it: ħ
 4 5
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 Direction
 So the ground state, or lowest energy state, of a pendulum
 does not have zero energy, as one might expect. Instead, even in its
 ground state a pendulum or any oscillating system must have a certain
 minimum amount of what are called zero point fluctuations.
 These mean that the pendulum won't necessarily be pointing
 straight down but will also have a probability of being found at a
 small angle to the vertical (Fig. 2.10). Similarly, even in the vacuum
 or lowest energy state, the waves in the Maxwell field won't be
 exactly zero but can have small sizes. The higher the frequency
 (the number of swings per minute) of the pendulum or wave, the
 higher the energy of the ground state.
 Calculations of the ground state fluctuations in the Maxwell
 and electron fields made the apparent mass and charge of the electron
 infinite, which is not what observations show. However, in the
 (FIG. 2.10)
 PENDULU M WIT H PROBABILIT Y
 DISTRIBUTIO N
 According to the Heisenberg principle
 it is impossible for a pendulum to
 absolutely point straight down, with
 zero velocity. Instead quantum theory
 predicts that, even in its lowest energy
 state, the pendulum must have a minimum
 amount of fluctuations.
 This means that the pendulum's position
 will be given by a probability distribution.
 In its ground state, the most
 likely position is pointing straight down,
 but it has also a probability of being
 found at a small angle to the vertical. 
 46
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 1940s the physicists Richard Feynman, Julian Schwinger, and
 Shin'ichiro Tomonaga developed a consistent way of removing or
 "subtracting out" these infinities and dealing only with the finite
 observed values of the mass and charge. Nevertheless, the ground
 state fluctuations still caused small effects that could be measured
 and that agreed well with experiment. Similar subtraction schemes
 for removing infinities worked for the Yang-Mills field in the theory
 put forward by Chen Ning Yang and Robert Mills. Yang-Mills
 theory is an extension of Maxwell theory that describes interactions
 in two other forces called the weak and strong nuclear forces.
 However, ground state fluctuations have a much more serious effect
 in a quantum theory of gravity. Again, each wavelength would have
 a ground state energy. Since there is no limit to how short the wavelengths
 of the Maxwell field can be, there are an infinite number of
 different wavelengths in any region of spacetime and an infinite
 amount of ground state energy. Because energy density is, like matter,
 a source of gravity, this infinite energy density ought to mean
 there is enough gravitational attraction in the universe to curl
 spacetime into a single point, which obviously hasn't happened.
 One might hope to solve the problem of this seeming contradiction
 between observation and theory by saying that the ground
 state fluctuations have no gravitational effect, but this would not
 work. One can detect the energy of ground state fluctuations by the
 Casimir effect. If you place a pair of metal plates parallel to each
 other and close together, the effect of the plates is to reduce slightly
 the number of wavelengths that fit between the plates relative to
 the number outside. This means that the energy density of ground
 state fluctuations between the plates, although still infinite, is less
 than the energy density outside by a finite amount (Fig. 2.11). This
 difference in energy density gives rise to a force pulling the plates
 together, and this force has been observed experimentally. Forces
 are a source of gravity in general relativity, just as matter is, so it
 would not be consistent to ignore the gravitational effect of this
 energy difference. 
 4 7
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 Reduced number
 of wavelengths
 that can fit
 between the
 plates
 The energy density of ground state
 fluctuations between the plates is
 less than the density outside, causing
 the plates to draw together.
 The energy density of ground
 state fluctuations is greater
 outside the plates.
 Wavelengths outside the
 confines of the plates
 (FIG. 2.1 1)
 T H E CASIMI R EFFEC T
 The existence of ground
 state fluctuations has been
 confirmed experimentally
 by the Casimir effect, a slight
 force between parallel
 metal plates. 
 48
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 49
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 Another possible solution to the problem might be to suppose
 there was a cosmological constant such as Einstein introduced in an
 attempt to have a static model of the universe. If this constant had
 an infinite negative value, it could exactly cancel the infinite positive
 value of the ground state energies in free space, but this cosmological
 constant seems very ad hoc, and it would have to be
 tuned to extraordinary accuracy.
 Fortunately, a totally new kind of symmetry was discovered in
 the 1970s that provides a natural physical mechanism to cancel the
 infinities arising from ground state fluctuations. Supersymmetry is a
 feature of our modern mathematical models that can be described in
 various ways. One way is to say that spacetime has extra dimensions
 besides the dimensions we experience. These are called Grassmann
 dimensions, because they are measured in numbers known as
 Grassmann variables rather than in ordinary real numbers. Ordinary
 numbers commute; that is, it does not matter in which order you
 multiply them: 6 times 4 is the same as 4 times 6. But Grassmann
 variables anticommute: x times y is the same as —y times x.
 Supersymmetry was first considered for removing infinities in
 matter fields and Yang-Mills fields in a spacetime where both the
 ordinary number dimensions and the Grassmann dimensions were
 flat, not curved. But it was natural to extend it to ordinary numbers
 and Grassmann dimensions that were curved. This led to a number
 of theories called supergravity, with different amounts of supersymmetry.
 One consequence of supersymmetry is that every field or
 particle should have a "superpartner" with a spin that is either 1/2
 greater than its own or 1/2 less (Fig 2.12). 
 5 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 5 1
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 MODEL S O F PARTICL E BEHAVIO R
 1If point particles actually existed as
 discrete elements like poo! balls, then
 when two collided their path would be
 deflected into two new trajectories.
 2This is what appears to happen when
 two particles interact, although the effect
 is far more dramatic.
 3Quantum field theory shows two
 particles, like an electron and its antiparticle,
 a positron, colliding. In doing so they
 briefly annihilate one another in a frantic
 burst of energy, creating a photon. This
 then releases its energy, producing
 another electron-positron pair. This still
 appears as if they are just deflected into
 new trajectories.
 4If particles are not zero points but
 one-dimensional strings in which the
 oscillating loops vibrate as an electron
 and positron. Then, when they collide
 and annihilate one another, they create a
 new string with a different vibrational
 pattern. Releasing energy, it divides into
 two strings continuing along new trajectories.
 
 5 If those original strings are viewed
 not as discrete moments but as an uninterrupted
 history in time, then the
 resulting strings are seen as a string
 world sheet. 
 52
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2.14, opposite)
 STRIN G OSCILLATION S
 In string theory the basic objects are
 not particles, which occupy a single
 point in space, but one-dimensional
 strings. These strings may have ends or
 they may join up with themselves in
 closed loops.
 Just like the strings on a violin, the
 strings in string theory support certain
 vibrational patterns, or resonant
 frequencies, whose wavelengths fit
 precisely between the two ends.
 But while the different resonant frequencies
 of a violin's strings give rise
 to different musical notes, the different
 oscillations of a string give rise to different
 masses and force charges,
 which are interpreted as fundamental
 particles. Roughly speaking, the shorter
 the wavelength of the oscillation on
 the string, the greater the mass of the
 particle.
 The ground state energies of bosons, fields whose spin is a
 whole number (0, 1,2 , etc.), are positive. On the other hand, the
 ground state energies of fermions, fields whose spin is a half number
 (1/2, 3/2 , etc.), are negative. Because there are equal numbers
 of bosons and fermions, the biggest infinities cancel in supergravity
 theories (see Fig 2.1 3, page 50).
 There remained the possibility that there might be smaller but
 still infinite quantities left over. No one had the patience needed to
 calculate whether these theories were actually completely finite. It
 was reckoned it would take a good student two hundred years, and
 how would you know he hadn't made a mistake on the second page?
 Still, up to 1985, most people believed that most supersymmetric
 supergravity theories would be free of infinities.
 Then suddenly the fashion changed. People declared there
 was no reason not to expect infinities in supergravity theories, and
 this was taken to mean they were fatally flawed as theories. Instead,
 it was claimed that a theory named supersymmetric string theory
 was the only way to combine gravity with quantum theory. Strings,
 like their namesakes in everyday experience, are one-dimensional
 extended objects. They have only length. Strings in string theory
 move through a background spacetime. Ripples on the string are
 interpreted as particles (Fig. 2.14).
 If the strings have Grassmann dimensions as well as their ordinary
 number dimensions, the ripples will correspond to bosons and
 fermions. In this case, the positive and negative ground state energies
 will cancel so exactly that there will be no infinities even of the
 smaller sort. Superstrings, it was claimed, were the TOE, the
 Theory of Everything.
 Historians of science in the future will find it interesting to
 chart the changing tide of opinion among theoretical physicists.
 For a few years, strings reigned supreme and supergravity was dismissed
 as just an approximate theory, valid at low energy. The qualification
 "low energy" was considered particularly damning, even
 though in this context low energies meant particles with energies of 
 53
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 less than a billion billion times those of particles in a TN T explosion.
 If supergravity was only a low energy approximation, it could
 not claim to be the fundamental theory of the universe. Instead, the
 underlying theory was supposed to be one of five possible superstring
 theories. But which of the five string theories described our
 universe? And how could string theory be formulated, beyond the
 approximation in which strings were pictured as surfaces with one
 space dimension and one time dimension moving through a flat
 background spacetime? Wouldn't the strings curve the background
 spacetime? 
 54
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2 .15 ) P-BRANE S
 P-branes are objects that are extended
 in p dimensions. Special cases are
 strings, which are p= I , and membranes,
 which are p=2, but higher values
 of p are possible in ten- or elevendimensional
 spacetime. Often, some
 or all of the p-dimensions are curled
 up like a torus.
 We hold these truths
 to be self-evident:
 All p-branes
 are created equal!
 In the years after 1985, it gradually became apparent that string
 theory wasn't the complete picture. To start with, it was realized that
 strings are just one member of a wide class of objects that can be
 extended in more than one dimension. Paul Townsend, who, like
 me, is a member of the Department of Applied Mathematics and
 Theoretical Physics at Cambridge, and who did much of the fundamental
 work on these objects, gave them the name "p-branes." A
 p-brane has length in p directions. Thus a p= 1 brane is a string, a
 p=2 brane is a surface or membrane, and so on (Fig. 2.15). There
 seems no reason to favor the p= 1 string case over other possible values
 of p. Instead, we should adopt the principle of p-brane democracy:
 all p-branes are created equal.
 All the p-branes could be found as solutions of the equations
 of supergravity theories in 10 or 11 dimensions. While 10 or 11
 dimensions doesn't sound much like the spacetime we experience,
 the idea was that the other 6 or 7 dimensions are curled up so small
 that we don't notice them; we are only aware of the remaining 4
 large and nearly flat dimensions.
 I must say that personally, I have been reluctant to believe in
 extra dimensions. But as I am a positivist, the question "Do extra
 dimensions really exist?" has no meaning. All one can ask is whether
 mathematical models with extra dimensions provide a good
 description of the universe. We do not yet have any observations
 that require extra dimensions for their explanation. However, there
 is a possibility we may observe them in the Large Hadron Collider 
 5 5
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 The spatial fabric of our universe may have both extended and
 curled-up dimensions. The membranes can be seen better if they
 are curled up.
 A 1-brane or
 string curled up
 A 2-brane sheet
 curled up into a torus 
 5 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2.1 6) A UNIFIE D FRAMEWORK ?
 There is a web of relationships, so-called dualities, that connect all five string theories as well as
 eleven-dimensional supergravity. The dualities suggest that the different string theories are just
 different expressions of the same underlying theory, which has been named M-theory.
 Type 1
 Type IIB
 Type IIA
 Heterotic-E
 I I -dimensional supergravity
 Heterotic-0 
 5 7
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 in Geneva. But what has convinced many people, including myself,
 that one should take models with extra dimensions seriously is that
 there is a web of unexpected relationships, called dualities, between
 the models. These dualities show that the models are all essentially
 equivalent; that is, they are just different aspects of the same underlying
 theory, which has been given the name M-theory. Not to take
 this web of dualities as a sign we are on the right track would be a
 bit like believing that God put fossils into the rocks in order to mislead
 Darwin about the evolution of life.
 These dualities show that the five superstring theories all
 describe the same physics and that they are also physically equivalent
 to supergravity (Fig. 2.16). One cannot say that superstrings
 are more fundamental than supergravity, or vice versa. Rather, they
 are different expressions of the same underlying theory, each useful
 for calculations in different kinds of situations. Because string theories
 don't have any infinities, they are good for calculating what
 happens when a few high energy particles collide and scatter off
 each other. However, they are not of much use for describing how
 the energy of a very large number of particles curves the universe or
 forms a bound state, like a black hole. For these situations, one
 needs supergravity, which is basically Einstein's theory of curved
 spacetime with some extra kinds of matter. It is this picture that I
 shall mainly use in what follows.
 Type IIB
 Type I
 Heterotic-0 Heterotic-E
 Type IIA
 Prior to the mid-nineties it appeared
 that there were five distinct string
 theories, each separate and unconnected.
 
 Type IIB
 Type I Type IIA
 Heterotic-0 Heterotic-E
 M-theory unites the five string
 theories within a single theoretical
 framework, but many of its properties
 have yet to be understood. 
 58
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 2.17)
 One can construct a mathematical
 model in which there is an imaginary
 time direction at right angles to ordinary
 real time. The model has rules
 that determine the history in imaginary
 time in terms of the history in real
 time, and vice versa. 
 59
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 (FIG. 2.18)
 Imaginary numbers are a mathematical
 construction. You can't have an
 imaginary number credit card bill.
 To describe how quantum theory shapes time and space, it is
 helpful to introduce the idea of imaginary time. Imaginary time
 sounds like something from science fiction, but it is a well-defined
 mathematical concept: time measured in what are called imaginary
 numbers. One can think of ordinary real numbers such as 1,2 , -3.5 ,
 and so on as corresponding to positions on a line stretching from
 left to right: zero in the middle, positive real numbers on the right,
 and negative real numbers on the left (Fig. 2.17).
 Imaginary numbers can then be represented as corresponding
 to positions on a vertical line: zero is again in the middle, positive
 imaginary numbers plotted upward, and negative imaginary numbers
 plotted downward. Thus imaginary numbers can be thought of
 as a new kind of number at right angles to ordinary real numbers.
 Because they are a mathematical construct, they don't need a physical
 realization; one can't have an imaginary number of oranges or
 an imaginary credit card bill (Fig. 2.18).
 One might think this means that imaginary numbers are just a
 mathematical game having nothing to do with the real world. From
 the viewpoint of positivist philosophy, however, one cannot determine
 what is real. All one can do is find which mathematical models
 describe the universe we live in. It turns out that a mathematical
 model involving imaginary time predicts not only effects we have
 already observed but also effects we have not been able to measure
 yet nevertheless believe in for other reasons. So what is real and
 what is imaginary? Is the distinction just in our minds? 
 60
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Direction of time History of observer Light cones
 (FIG. 2.19 )
 In the real time spacetime of classical
 general relativity time is distinguished
 from the space directions because it
 increases only along the history of an
 observer unlike the space directions,
 which can increase or decrease along
 that history. The imaginary time direction
 of quantum theory, on the other
 hand, is like another space direction,
 so can increase or decrease.
 Einstein's classical (i.e., nonquantum) general theory of relativity
 combined real time and the three dimensions of space into a
 four-dimensional spacetime. But the real time direction was distinguished
 from the three spatial directions; the world line or history
 of an observer always increased in the real time direction (that is,
 time always moved from past to future), but it could increase or
 decrease in any of the three spatial directions. In other words, one
 could reverse direction in space, but not in time (Fig. 2.19).
 On the other hand, because imaginary time is at right angles to
 real time, it behaves like a fourth spatial direction. It can therefore 
 61
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 s
 Imaginary time as degrees of latitude
 N
 Imaginary time as degrees of longitude
 which meet at the North and South Poles
 (FlG. 2.20) IMAGINARY TIME
 In an imaginary spacetime that is a
 sphere, the imaginary time direction
 could represent the distance from the
 South Pole. As one moves north, the
 circles of latitude at constant distances
 from the South Pole become bigger
 corresponding to the universe expanding
 with imaginary time. The universe
 would reach maximum size at the
 equator and then contract again with
 increasing imaginary time to a single
 point at the North Pole. Even though
 the universe would have zero size at
 the poles, these points would not be
 singularities, just as the North and
 South Poles on the Earth's surface are
 perfectly regular points. This suggests
 that the origin of the universe in imaginary
 time can be a regular point in
 spacetime.
 (FIG. 2.21)
 Instead of degrees of latitude, the
 imaginary time direction in a spacetime
 that is a sphere could also correspond
 to degrees of longitude.
 Because all the lines of longitude meet
 at the North and South Poles, time is
 standing still at the poles; an increase
 of imaginary time leaves one on the
 same spot, just as going west on the
 North Pole of the Earth still leaves
 one on the North Pole. 
 62
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Information falling
 into black hole
 Information
 re-stored
 T he area formula for the entropy—or number
 of internal states—of a black hole suggests
 that information about what falls into a black
 hole may be stored like that on a record, and
 played back as the black hole evaporates. 
 63
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E
 have a much richer range of possibilities than the railroad track of
 ordinary real time, which can only have a beginning or an end or go
 around in circles. It is in this imaginary sense that time has a shape.
 To see some of the possibilities, consider an imaginary time
 spacetime that is a sphere, like the surface of the Earth. Suppose that
 imaginary time was degrees of latitude (Fig. 2.20, see page 61). Then
 the history of the universe in imaginary time would begin at the
 South Pole. It would make no sense to ask, "Wha t happened before
 the beginning?" Such times are simply not defined, any more than
 there are points south of the South Pole. Th e South Pole is a perfectly
 regular point of the Earth's surface, and the same laws hold there as at
 other points. Thi s suggests that the beginning of the universe in
 imaginary time can be a regular point of spacetime, and that the same
 laws can hold at the beginning as in the rest of the universe. (The
 quantum origin and evolution of the universe will be discussed in the
 next chapter.)
 Another possible behavior is illustrated by taking imaginary
 time to be degrees of longitude on the Earth. All the lines of longitude
 meet at the North and South Poles (Fig. 2.21 , see page 61 )
 Thus time stands still there, in the sense that an increase of imaginary
 time, or of degrees of longitude, leaves one in the same spot.
 Thi s is very similar to the way that ordinary time appears to stand
 still on the horizon of a black hole. We have come to recognize that
 this standing still of real and imaginary time (either both stand still
 or neither does) means that the spacetime has a temperature, as I
 discovered for black holes. Not only does a black hole have a temperature,
 it also behaves as if it has a quantity called entropy. Th e
 entropy is a measure of the number of internal states (ways it could
 be configured on the inside) that the black hole could have without
 looking any different to an outside observer, who can only observe
 its mass, rotation, and charge. Thi s black hole entropy is given by
 a very simple formula I discovered in 1974. It equals the area of the
 horizon of the black hole: there is one bit of information about the
 internal state of the black hole for each fundamental unit of area of 
 6 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Even a tiny fragment of the 2-D
 holographic plate contains
 enough information to reconstruct
 the whole 3-D image of
 the apple.
 the horizon. Thi s shows that there is a deep connection between
 quantum gravity and thermodynamics , the science of heat (which
 includes the study of entropy). It also suggests that quantum gravity
 may exhibit what is called holography (Fig. 2.22) .
 Information about the quantum states in a region of spacetime
 may be somehow coded on the boundary of the region, which has
 two dimensions less. Thi s is like the way that a hologram carries a
 three-dimensional image on a two-dimensional surface. If quantum
 gravity incorporates the holographi c principle, it may mean that we
 can keep track of what is inside black holes. Thi s is essential if we
 are to be able to predict the radiation that comes out of black holes.
 If we can't do that, we won't be able to predict the future as fully as
 we thought. Thi s is discussed in Chapte r 4. Holography is discussed
 again in Chapte r 7. It seems we may live on a 3-brane—a
 four-dimensional (three space plus one time) surface that is the
 boundary of a five-dimensional region, with the remaining dimensions
 curled up very small. Th e state of the world on a brane
 encode s what is happening in the five-dimensional region. 
 6 5
 T H E SHAP E O F TIM E 
 
 6 7
 CHAPTE R 3
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 The universe has multiple histories, each of which is determined by a tiny nut. 
 6 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 6 9
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 I could be bounded in a nutshell
 and count myself a king of infinite space...
 —Shakespeare,
 Hamlet, Act 2, Scene 2
 H
 AMLE T MA Y HAV E MEAN T THA T ALTHOUG H W E HUMA N
 beings are very limited physically, our minds are free to
 explore the whole universe, and to go boldly where even
 Star Trek fears to tread—bad dreams permitting.
 Is the universe actually infinite or just very large? And is it
 everlasting or just long-lived? Ho w could our finite minds compre -
 hend an infinite universe? Isn't it presumptuous of us even to make
 the attempt? Do we risk the fate of Prometheus, who in classical
 mythology stole fire from Zeus for human beings to use, and was
 punished for his temerity by being chained to a rock where an eagle
 picked at his liver?
 Despite this cautionary tale, I believe we can and should try to
 understand the universe. We have already made remarkable progress
 in understanding the cosmos, particularly in the last few years. We
 don't yet have a complete picture, but this may not be far off.
 T h e most obvious thing about space is that it goes on and on
 and on. Thi s has been confirmed by modern instruments such as the
 Hubble telescope, which allows us to probe deep into space. Wha t
 we see are billions and billions of galaxies of various shapes and
 sizes (see page 70, Fig. 3.1). Each galaxy contains uncounted billions
 of stars, many of which have planets around them. We live on
 a planet orbiting a star in an outer arm of the spiral Milky Wa y
 Above: Prometheus. Etruscan vase
 painting, 6th century B.C.
 Left: Hubble space telescope lens
 and mirrors being upgraded by a
 space shuttle mission. Australia can
 be seen below. 
 7 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Spiral galaxy NGC 4414 Spiral bar galaxy NGC 4314 Elliptical galaxy NGC 147
 (FIG. 3.1) When we look deep into the universe, we see billions and billions of galaxies.
 Galaxies can have various shapes and sizes; they can be either elliptical or spiral, like our own Milky Way. 
 71
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.2)
 Our planet Earth (E) orbits the Sun in
 the outer region of the spiral Milky
 Way galaxy. The stellar dust in the spiral
 arms blocks our view within the
 plane of the galaxy but we have a
 clear view on either side of that plane.
 galaxy. The dust in the spiral arms blocks our view of the universe in
 the plane of the galaxy, but we have a clear line of sight in cones of
 directions on each side of the plane, and we can plot the positions
 of distant galaxies (Fig. 3.2). We find that the galaxies are distributed
 roughly uniformly throughout space, with some local concentrations
 and voids. The density of galaxies appears to drop off at very
 large distances, but that seems to be because they are so far away and
 faint that we can't make them out. As far as we can tell, the universe
 goes on in space forever (see page 72, Fig. 3.3).
 Although the universe seems to be much the same at each
 position in space, it is definitely changing in time. This was not
 realized until the early years of the twentieth century. Up to then,
 it was thought the universe was essentially constant in time. It
 might have existed for an infinite time, but that seemed to lead to
 absurd conclusions. If stars had been radiating for an infinite time,
 they would have heated up the universe to their temperature. Even 
 72
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.3)
 Apart from some local concentrations,
 we find that galaxies are distributed
 roughly uniformly throughout space.
 at night, the whole sky would be as bright as the sun, because every
 line of sight would end either on a star or on a cloud of dust that
 had been heated up until it was as hot as the stars (Fig. 3.4).
 T h e observation that we have all made, that the sky at night is
 dark, is very important. It implies that the universe cannot have
 existed forever in the state we see today. Something must have happened
 in the past to make the stars light up a finite time ago, which
 means that the light from very distant stars has not had time to
 reach us yet. Thi s would explain why the sky at night isn't glowing
 in every direction. 
 7 3
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.4)
 If the universe was static and infinite in
 every direction, every line of sight
 would end in a star which would make
 the night sky as bright as the sun.
 If the stars had just been sitting there forever, why did they
 suddenly light up a few billion years ago? Wha t was the clock that
 told them it was time to shine? As we've seen, this puzzled those
 philosophers, much like Immanuel Kant, who believed that the universe
 had existed forever. But for most people, it was consistent
 with the idea that the universe had been created, much as it is now,
 only a few thousand years ago.
 However, discrepancies with this idea began to appear with
 the observations by Vesto Slipher and Edwin Hubbl e in the second
 decade of the twentieth century. In 1923 , Hubble discovered that 
 7 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 7 5
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 many faint patches of light, called nebulae, were in fact other galaxies,
 vast collections of stars like our sun but at a great distance. In
 order for them to appear so small and faint, the distances had to be
 so great that light from them would have taken millions or even billions
 of years to reach us. This indicated that the beginning of the
 universe couldn't have been just a few thousand years ago.
 But the second thing Hubble discovered was even more
 remarkable. Astronomers had learned that by analyzing the light
 from other galaxies, it was possible to measure whether they are
 moving toward us or away from us (Fig. 3.5) . To their great surprise,
 they had found that nearly all galaxies are moving away. Moreover,
 the farther they are from us, the faster they are moving away. It was
 Hubble who recognized the dramatic implications of this discovery:
 (FIG. 3.5 )
 The Doppler effect is also true of light
 waves. If a galaxy were to remain at a
 constant distance from Earth, characteristic
 lines in the spectrum would
 appear in a normal or standard position.
 However, if the galaxy is moving
 away from us, the waves will appear
 elongated or stretched and the characteristic
 lines will be shifted toward
 the red (right). If the galaxy is moving
 toward us then the waves will appear
 to be compressed, and the lines will
 be blue-shifted (left). 
 7 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Our galactic neighbor, Andromeda,
 measured by Hubble and Slipher.
 on the large scale, every galaxy is moving away from every other
 galaxy. The universe is expanding (Fig. 3.6).
 The discovery of the expansion of the universe was one of the
 great intellectual revolutions of the twentieth century. It came as a
 total surprise, and it completely changed the discussion of the origin
 of the universe. If the galaxies are moving apart, they must have been
 closer together in the past. From the present rate of expansion, we
 can estimate that they must have been very close together indeed ten
 to fifteen billion years ago. As described in the last chapter, Roger
 Penrose and I were able to show that Einstein's general theory of relativity
 implied that the universe and time itself must have had a
 beginning in a tremendous explosion. Here was the explanation of 
 7 7
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 78
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 7 9
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 why the sky at night is dark: no star could have been shining longer
 than ten to fifteen billion years, the time since the big bang.
 We are used to the idea that events are caused by earlier
 events, which in turn are caused by still earlier events. Ther e is a
 chain of causality stretching back into the past. But suppose this
 chain has a beginning. Suppose there was a first event. Wha t caused
 it? Thi s was not a question that many scientists wanted to address.
 The y tried to avoid it, either by claiming, like the Russians, that the
 universe didn't have a beginning or by maintaining that the origin
 of the universe did not lie within the realm of science but belonged
 to metaphysics or religion. In my opinion, this is not a position any
 true scientist should take. If the laws of science are suspended at the
 beginning of the universe, might not they fail at other times also? A
 law is not a law if it only holds sometimes . We must try to understand
 the beginning of the universe on the basis of science. It may he a task beyond
 our powers, hut we should at least make the attempt.
 Whil e the theorems that Penrose and I proved showed that the
 universe must have had a beginning, they didn't give much information
 about the nature of that beginning. The y indicated that the universe
 began in a big bang, a point where the whole universe, and
 everything in it, was scrunched up into a single point of infinite density.
 At this point, Einstein's general theory of relativity would have
 broken down, so it cannot be used to predict in what manner the
 universe began. On e is left with the origin of the universe apparently
 being beyond the scope of science.
 Thi s was not a conclusion that scientists should be happy with.
 As Chapters 1 and 2 point out, the reason general relativity broke
 down near the big bang is that it did not incorporate the uncertainty
 principle, the random element of quantum theory that Einstein had
 objected to on the grounds that God does not play dice. However,
 all the evidence is that God is quite a gambler. On e can think of the
 universe as being like a giant casino, with dice being rolled or wheels 
 8 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.7, above, and FIG. 3.8, opposite)
 If a gambler bets on red for a large
 number of rolls of the dice, one can
 fairly accurately predict his return
 because the results of the single rolls
 average out.
 On the other hand, it is impossible
 to predict the outcome of any particular
 bet.
 being spun on every occasion (Fig. 3.7) . You might think that operating
 a casino is a very chancy business, because you risk losing
 money each time dice are thrown or the wheel is spun. But over a
 large number of bets, the gains and losses average out to a result that
 can be predicted, even though the result of any particular bet cannot
 be predicted (Fig. 3.8) . Th e casino operators make sure the odds average
 out in their favor. Tha t is why casino operators are so rich. Th e
 only chance you have of winning against them is to stake all your
 money on a few rolls of the dice or spins of the wheel.
 It is the same with the universe. When the universe is big, as it is
 today, there are a very large number of rolls of the dice, and the results
 average out to something one can predict. Tha t is why classical laws
 work for large systems. But when the universe is very small, as it was
 near in time to the big bang, there are only a small number of rolls of
 the dice, and the uncertainty principle is very important.
 Because the universe keeps on rolling the dice to see what happens
 next, it doesn't have just a single history, as one might have
 thought. Instead, the universe must have every possible history,
 each with its own probability. Ther e must be a history of the universe
 in which Belize won every gold medal at the Olympi c Games ,
 though maybe the probability is low.
 Thi s idea that the universe has multiple histories may sound
 like science fiction, but it is now accepted as science fact. It was formulated
 by Richard Feynman, who was both a great physicist and
 quite a character.
 We are now working to combine Einstein's general theory of
 relativity and Feynman's idea of multiple histories into a complete
 unified theory that will describe everything that happens in the
 universe. Thi s unified theory will enable us to calculate how the universe
 will develop if we know how the histories started. But the
 unified theory will not in itself tell us how the universe began or
 what its initial state was. For that, we need what are called boundary
 conditions , rules that tell us what happens on the frontiers of
 the universe, the edges of space and time.
 If the frontier of the universe was just at a normal point of
 space and time, we could go past it and claim the territory beyond
 as part of the universe. On the other hand, if the boundary of the 
 8 1
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 8 2
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 If the boundary of the universe was
 simply a point of spacetime, we could
 keep extending frontiers.
 universe was at a jagged edge where space and time were scrunched
 up and the density was infinite, it would be very difficult to define
 meaningful boundary conditions .
 However, a colleague named Jim Hartle and I realized there was
 a third possibility. Maybe the universe has no boundary in space and
 time. At first sight, this seems to be in direct contradiction with the
 theorems that Penrose and I proved, which showed that the universe
 must have had a beginning, a boundary in time. However, as
 explained in Chapter 2, there is another kind of time, called imaginary
 time, that is at right angles to the ordinary real time that we feel going
 by. Th e history of the universe in real time determines its history in
 imaginary time, and vice versa, but the two kinds of history can be 
 83
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 very different. In particular, the universe need have no beginning or
 end in imaginary time. Imaginary time behaves just like another direction
 in space. Thus, the histories of the universe in imaginary time can
 be thought of as curved surfaces, like a ball, a plane, or a saddle shape,
 but with four dimensions instead of two (see Fig. 3.9, page 84).
 If the histories of the universe went off to infinity like a saddle
 or a plane, one would have the problem of specifying what the
 boundary conditions were at infinity. But one can avoid having to
 specify boundary conditions at all if the histories of the universe in
 imaginary time are closed surfaces, like the surface of the Earth. Th e
 surface of the Earth doesn't have any boundaries or edges. Ther e are
 no reliable reports of people falling off. 
 84
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FlG. 3.9) HISTORIE S O F TH E UNIVERS E
 If the histories of the universe went off to infinity like a saddle, imaginary time are closed surfaces like that of the Earth,
 one would have the problem of specifying what the boundary one would not have to specify boundary conditions at all.
 conditions were at infinity. If all the histories of the universe in 
 8 5
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 If the histories of the universe in imaginary time are indeed
 closed surfaces, as Hartle and I proposed, it would have fundamental
 implications for philosophy and our picture of where we
 came from. Th e universe would be entirely self-contained; it
 wouldn't need anything outside to
 wind up the clockwork and set it
 going. Instead, everything in the universe
 would be determined by the laws
 of science and by rolls of the dice within
 the universe. Thi s may sound presumptuous,
 but it is what I and many othe r
 scientists believe.
 Even if the boundary condition of the universe is that it has no
 boundary, it won't have just a single history. It will have multiple
 histories, as suggested by Feynman. Ther e will be a history in imaginary
 time corresponding to every possible closed surface, and each
 history in imaginary time will determine a history in real time. Thus
 we have a superabundance of possibilities
 for the universe. Wha t picks out
 the particular universe that we live in
 from the set of all possible universes?
 O n e point we can notice is that
 many of the possible histories of
 the universe won't go through the
 sequence of forming galaxies and stars
 that was essential to our own development.
 Whil e it may be that intelligent
 beings can evolve without galaxies and stars, this seems unlikely.
 Thus , the very fact that we exist as beings who can
 ask the question "Wh y is the universe the way it
 is?" is a restriction on the history we live in.
 It implies it is one of the minority of
 histories that have galaxies and stars.
 Thi s is an example of what is called
 the anthropic principle. Th e anthropic
 principle says that the universe has to be
 more or less as we see it, because if it were
 The surface of the Earth doesn't have
 any boundaries or edges. Reports of
 people falling off are thought to be
 exaggerations. 
 86
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 8 7
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.10, opposite)
 On the far left of the illustration
 are those universes (a)
 that collapsed on themselves,
 becoming closed. On the far
 right are those open universes
 (b) that will continue expanding
 forever
 Those critical universes that
 are balanced between falling
 back on themselves and continuing
 to expand like (cl) or
 the double inflation of (c2)
 might harbor intelligent life.
 Our own universe (d) is poised
 to continue expanding for now.
 different, there wouldn't be anyone here to observe it (Fig. 3.10).
 Many scientists dislike the anthropic principle because it seems rather
 vague and does not appear to have much predictive power. But the
 anthropic principle can be given a precise formulation, and it seems
 to be essential when dealing with the origin of the universe. M-theory,
 described in Chapter 2, allows a very large number of possible
 histories for the universe. Mos t of these histories are not suitable for
 the development of intelligent life; either they are empty, last for too
 short a time, are too highly curved, or wrong in some other way. Yet
 according to Richard Feynman's idea of multiple histories, these uninhabited
 histories can have quite a high probability (see page 84).
 In fact, it doesn't really matter how many histories there may
 be that don't contain intelligent beings. We are interested only
 in the subset of histories in which intelligent life develops.
 Thi s intelligent life need not be anything like humans. Little
 green aliens would do as well. In fact, they might do rather
 better. Th e human race does not have a very good record of
 intelligent behavior.
 As an example of the power of the anthropic principle,
 consider the number of directions in space. It is a matter of
 common experience that we live in three-dimensional space. Tha t
 is to say, we can represent the position of a point in space by three
 The double inflation could
 harbor intelligent life.
 The inflation of our own universe
 continues to expand for now. 
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 numbers, for example, latitude, longitude, and height above sea level.
 But why is space three-dimensional? Wh y isn't it two, or four, or some
 other number of dimensions, as in science fiction? In M-theory, space
 has nine or ten dimensions, but it is thought that six or seven of the
 directions are curled up very small, leaving three dimensions that are
 large and nearly flat (Fig. 3.1 1).
 W h y don't we live in a history in which eight of the dimensions
 are curled up small, leaving only two dimensions that we
 notice? A two-dimensional animal would have a hard jo b digesting
 food. If it had a gut that went right through it, it would divide the
 animal in two, and the poor creature would fall apart. So two flat
 directions are not enough for anything as complicated as intelligent
 life. On the other hand, if there were four or more nearly flat directions,
 the gravitational force between two bodies would increase
 more rapidly as they approached each other. Thi s would mean that
 planets would not have stable orbits about their suns. The y would
 either fall into the sun (Fig. 3.12A) or escape to the outer darkness
 and cold (Fig. 3.12B).
 (FIG. 3 .11 )
 From a distance, a drinking straw looks
 like a one-dimensional line. 
 8 9
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 90
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.13 )
 The simplest imaginary time history
 without boundary is a sphere.
 This determines a history in real
 time that expands in an inflationary
 manner.
 Similarly, the orbits of electrons in atoms would not be stable,
 so matter as we know it would not exist. Thus , although the idea of
 multiple histories would allow any number of nearly flat directions,
 only histories with three flat directions will contain intelligent
 beings. Onl y in such histories will the question be asked, "Why
 does space have three dimensions?"
 T h e simplest history of the universe in imaginary time is a
 round sphere, like the surface of the Earth, but with two more dimensions
 (Fig. 3.13) . It determines a history of the universe in the real time
 that we experience, in which the universe is the same at every point of
 space and is expanding in time. In these respects, it is like the universe
 we live in. But the rate of expansion is very rapid, and it keeps on getting
 faster. Such accelerating expansion is called inflation, because it is
 like the way prices go up and up at an ever-increasing rate. 
 9 !
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 FIG. 3.1 4 MATTE R ENERGY GRAVITATIO N ENERG Y
 Inflation in prices is generally held to be a bad thing, but in
 the case of the universe, inflation is very beneficial. Th e large
 amount of expansion smoothes out any lumps and bumps there
 may have been in the early universe. As the universe expands, it
 borrows energy from the gravitational field to create more matter.
 T h e positive matter energy is exactly balanced by the negative
 gravitational energy, so the total energy is zero. Whe n the universe
 doubles in size, the matter and gravitational energies both double —
 so twice zero is still zero. If only the banking world were so simple
 (Fig. 3.14) .
 If the history of the universe in imaginary time were a perfectly
 round sphere, the corresponding history in real time would
 be a universe that continued to expand in an inflationary manner
 forever. Whil e the universe is inflating, matter could not fall 
 9 2
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 93
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 WHOLESAL E PRIC E INDE X - INFLATIO N AN D HYPERINFLATIO N
 July 191 4 1.0
 January 191 9 2.6
 July 191 9 3.4
 January 192 0 12.6
 January 1921 14.4
 July 1921 14.3
 January 192 2 36. 7
 July 192 2 100. 6
 January 1923 2,785. 0
 July 1923 194,000. 0
 November 1923 726,000,000,000. 0
 One German mark in 1914
 Ten thousand marks 1923
 Two million marks 1923
 Ten million marks 1923
 One milliard marks 1923
 together to form galaxies and stars, and life, let alone intelligent life
 like us, could not develop. Thus although histories of the universe
 in imaginary time that are perfectly round spheres are allowed by
 the notion of multiple histories, they are not of much interest.
 However, histories in imaginary time that are slightly flattened at
 the south pole of the spheres are much more relevant (Fig. 3.15).
 In this case, the corresponding history in real time will expand
 in an accelerated, inflationary manner at first. But then the expansion
 will begin to slow down, and galaxies can form. In order for intelligent
 life to be able to develop, the flattening at the South Pole must
 be very slight. Thi s will mean that the universe will expand initially
 by an enormous amount. Th e record level of monetary inflation
 occurred in Germany between the world wars, when prices rose billions
 of times—but the amount of inflation that must have occurred
 in the universe is at least a billion billion billion times that (Fig. 3.16).
 (FIG. 3.16)
 INFLATIO N MA Y B E A LA W O F
 NATUR E
 Inflation in Germany rose after the
 peace until by February 1920 the
 price level was five times as high as it
 had been in 1918. After July 1922 the
 phase of hyperinflation began. All confidence
 in money vanished and the
 price index rose faster and faster for
 fifteen months, outpacing the printing
 presses, which could not produce
 money as fast as it was depreciating.
 By late 1923, 300 paper mills were
 working at top speed and 150 printing
 companies had 2,000 presses running
 day and night turning out currency. 
 9 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 a b c
 (FIG. 3.17)
 PROBABL E AN D IMPROBABL E
 HISTORIE S
 Smooth histories like (a) are the most
 probable, but there are only a small
 number of them.
 Although slightly irregular histories
 (b) and (c) are each less probable,
 there are such a large number of
 them that the likely histories of the
 universe will have small departures
 from smoothness.
 Because of the uncertainty principle, there won't be just one history
 of the universe that contains intelligent life. Instead, the histories
 in imaginary time will be a whole family of slightly deformed
 spheres, each of which corresponds to a history in real time in which
 the universe inflates for a long time but not indefinitely. We can then
 ask which of these allowable histories is the most probable. It turns
 out that the most probable histories are not completely smooth but
 have tiny ups and downs (Fig. 3.17). Th e ripples on the most probable
 histories really are minuscule. Th e departures from smoothness
 are of the order of one part in a hundred thousand. Nevertheless,
 although they are extremely small, we have managed to observe
 them as small variations in the microwaves that come to us from different
 directions in space. Th e Cosmi c Background Explorer satellite
 was launched in 1989 and made a map of the sky in microwaves.
 T h e different colors indicate different temperatures, but the whole
 range from red to blue is only about a ten-thousandth of a degree. Yet 
 95
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 this is enough variation between different regions of the early universe
 for the extra gravitational attraction in the denser regions to stop them
 expanding eventually, and to cause them to collapse again under their
 own gravity to form galaxies and stars. So in principle, at least, the
 COB E map is the blueprint for all the structures in the universe.
 Wha t will be the future behavior of the most probable histories
 of the universe that are compatible with the appearance of
 intelligent beings? Ther e seem to be various possibilities, depending
 on the amount of matter in the universe. If there is more than a
 certain critical amount, the gravitational attraction between the
 galaxies will slow them down and will eventually stop them from
 flying apart. The y will then start falling toward each other and will
 all come together in a big crunch that will be the end of the history
 of the universe in real time (see Fig. 3.18 , page 96).
 If the density of the universe is below the critical value,
 gravity is too weak to stop the galaxies from flying apart forever.
 The full sky map made by the
 COBE satellite DMR instrument,
 showing evidence for the wrinkles in
 time. 
 96
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 3.1 8, above)
 O ne possible end of the universe is
 the big crunch in which all matter will
 be sucked back into a vast cataclysmic
 gravity well.
 (FIG, 3.19, opposite)
 The long cold whimper in which
 everything runs down and the last
 stars flicker out, having exhausted
 their fuel.
 All the stars will burn out, and the universe will get increasingly
 emptier and colder. So, again, things will come to an end, but in a
 less dramatic way. Either way, the universe will last a good few billion
 years more (Fig. 3.19).
 As well as matter, the universe may contain what is called "vacuum
 energy," energy that is present even in apparently empty space.
 By Einstein's famous equation, E = mc 2
 , this vacuum energy has
 mass. Thi s means that it has a gravitational effect on the expansion
 of the universe. But, remarkably enough, the effect of vacuum energy
 is the opposite of that of matter. Matter causes the expansion to
 slow down and can eventually stop and reverse it. On the other
 hand, vacuum energy causes the expansion to accelerate, as in inflation.
 In fact, vacuum energy acts just like the cosmological constant
 mentioned in Chapter 1 that Einstein added to his original equations 
 97
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 in 1917, when he realized that they didn't admit a solution representing
 a static universe. After Hubble's discovery of the expansion
 of the universe, this motivation for adding a term to the equations
 disappeared, and Einstein rejected the cosmological constant as a
 mistake.
 However, it may not have been a mistake at all. As described
 in Chapter 2, we now realize that quantum theory implies that
 spacetime is filled with quantum fluctuations. In a supersymmetric
 theory, the infinite positive and negative energies of these ground
 state fluctuations cancel out between particles of different spin. But
 we wouldn't expect the positive and negative energies to cancel so
 completely that there wasn't a small, finite amount of vacuum energy
 left over, because the universe is not in a supersymmetric state.
 T h e only surprise is that the vacuum energy is so nearly zero that it 
 9 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Galaxies
 cannot form
 in this region Anthropic line
 MATTE R DENSIT Y
 (FIG. 3.20 )
 By combining observations from
 distant supernovae, the cosmic
 microwave background radiation, and
 the distribution of matter in the universe,
 the vacuum energy and matter
 density in the universe can be fairly
 well estimated.
 was not obvious some time ago. Maybe this is another example of the
 anthropic principle. A history with a larger vacuum energy would not
 have formed galaxies, so would not contain beings who could ask the
 question: "Wh y is the vacuum energy the value we observe?"
 We can try to determine the amounts of matter and vacuum
 energy in the universe from various observations. We can show the
 results in a diagram in which the matter density is the horizontal
 direction and vacuum energy is the vertical direction. Th e dotted
 line shows the boundary of the region in which intelligent life could
 develop (Fig. 3.20). 
 9 9
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 "I could be bounded in a nutshell
 and count myself a king
 of infinite space."
 —Shakespeare,
 Hamlet, Act 2, Scene 2
 Observations of supernovae, clustering, and the microwave
 background each mark out regions in this diagram. Fortunately, all
 three regions have a common intersection. If the matter density and
 vacuum energy lie in this intersection, it means that the expansion
 of the universe has begun to speed up again, after a long period of
 slowing down. It seems that inflation may be a law of nature.
 In this chapter we have seen how the behavior of the vast universe
 can be understood in terms of its history in imaginary time,
 which is a tiny, slightly flattened sphere. It is like Hamlet's nutshell,
 yet this nut encodes everything that happens in real time. So
 Hamlet was quite right. We could be bounded in a nutshell and still
 count ourselves kings of infinite space. 
 
 1 0 1
 CHAPTE R 4
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 How the loss of information in black boles may reduce our ability
 to predict the future. 
 102
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 103
 PREDICTIN G T H E FUTUR E
 (FIG. 4.1 )
 An observer on Earth (blue) orbiting
 the sun watches Mars (red) against a
 backdrop of constellations.
 The complicated apparent motion
 of the planets in the sky can be
 explained by Newton's laws and has
 no influence on personal fortunes.
 T
 H E HUMA N RAC E HAS ALWAYS WANTE D T O CONTRO L TH E
 future, or at least to predict what will happen. Tha t is why
 astrology is so popular. Astrology claims that events on
 Earth are related to the motions of the planets across the sky. Thi s
 is a scientifically testable hypothesis, or would be if astrologers
 stuck their necks out and made definite predictions that could be
 tested. However, wisely enough, they make their forecasts so vague
 that they can apply to any outcome. Statement s such as "Personal
 relations may become intense" or "You will have a financially
 rewarding opportunity" can never be proved wrong.
 But the real reason mos t scientists don't believe in astrology is
 not scientific evidence or the lack of it but because it is not consistent
 with other theories that have been tested by experiment.
 Whe n Copernicus and Galileo discovered that the planets orbit the
 Sun rather than the Earth, and Newton discovered the laws that
 govern their motion, astrology became extremely implausible. Wh y
 should the positions of other planets against the background sky as
 seen from Earth have any correlations with the macromolecules on
 a minor planet that call themselves intelligent life (Fig. 4.1) ? Yet this
 is what astrology would have us believe. Ther e is no more experimental
 evidence for some of the theories described in this book 
 104
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.2 )
 If you know where and at what speed
 a baseball is thrown, you can predict
 where it will go.
 than there is for astrology, but we believe them because they are
 consistent with theories that have survived testing.
 T h e success of Newton's laws and other physical theories led to
 the idea of scientific determinism, which was first expressed at the
 beginning of the nineteenth century by the French scientist the
 Marquis de Laplace. Laplace suggested that if we knew the positions
 and velocities of all the particles in the universe at one time, the laws
 of physics should allow us to predict what the state of the universe
 would be at any other time in the past or in the future (Fig. 4.2).
 In other words, if scientific determinism holds, we should in
 principle be able to predict the future and wouldn't need astrology.
 Of course, in practice even something as simple as Newton's theory
 of gravity produces equations that we can't solve exactly for more
 than two particles. Furthermore, the equations often have a property
 known as chaos , so that a small change in position or velocity at
 one time can lead to completely different behavior at later times. As
 those who have seen Jurassic Park know, a tiny disturbance in one
 place can cause a major change in another. A butterfly flapping its
 wings in Tokyo can cause rain in New York's Central Park (Fig. 4.3).
 T h e trouble is the sequence of events is not repeatable. Th e next time
 the butterfly flaps its wings, a host of other factors will be different (FIG. 4.3 ) 
 1 0 5
 PREDICTIN G TH E F U T U R E
 and will also influence the weather. That is why weather forecasts
 are so unreliable.
 Thus, although in principle the laws of quantum electrodynamics
 should allow us to calculate everything in chemistry and
 biology, we have not had much success in predicting human
 behavior from mathematical equations. Nevertheless,
 despite these practical difficulties most scientists
 have comforted themselves with the idea that, again
 in principle, the future is predictable.
 At first sight, determinism would also seem to be
 threatened by the uncertainty principle, which says
 that we cannot measure accurately both the position and the velocity
 of a particle at the same time. The more accurately we measure the
 position, the less accurately we can determine the velocity, and vice
 versa. The Laplace version of scientific determinism held that if we
 knew the positions and velocities of particles at one time, we could
 determine their positions and velocities at any time in the past or
 future. But how could we even get started if the uncertainty principle
 prevented us from knowing accurately both the positions and the
 velocities at one time? However good our computer is, if we put lousy
 data in, we will get lousy predictions out. 
 1 0 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 STRONGL Y PEAKED WAV E FUNCTIO N
 PROBABILITY DISTRIBUTION FOR VELOCITY
 OF PARTICLE
 WAV E TRAI N WAV E FUNCTIO N
 PROBABILITY DISTRIBUTION FOR VELOCITY
 OF PARTICLE
 (FIG. 4.4 )
 The wave function determines the
 probabilities that the particle will
 have different positions and velocities
 in such a way that Δx and Δv
 obey the uncertainty principle.
 However, determinism was restored in a modified form in a
 new theory called quantum mechanics, which incorporated the
 uncertainty principle. In quantum mechanics, one can, roughly
 speaking, accurately predict half of what one would expect to predict
 in the classical Laplace point of view. In quantum mechanics, a
 particle does not have a well­defined position or velocity, but its
 state can be represented by what is called a wave function (Fig. 4.4) .
 A wave function is a number at each point of space that gives
 the probability that the particle is to be found at that position. The
 rate at which the wave function changes from point to point tells
 how probable different particle velocities are. Some wave functions
 are sharply peaked at a particular point in space. In these cases,
 there is only a small amount of uncertainty in the position of the
 particle. But we can also see in the diagram that in such cases, the
 wave function changes rapidly near the point, up on one side and
 1 0 7
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 down on the other. That means the probability distribution for the
 velocity is spread over a wide range. In other words, the uncertainty
 in the velocity is large. Consider, on the other hand, a continuous
 train of waves. Now there is a large uncertainty in position but
 a small uncertainty in velocity. So the description of a particle by a
 wave function does not have a well-defined position or velocity. It
 satisfies the uncertainty principle. We now realize that the wave
 function is all that can be well defined. We cannot even suppose
 that the particle has a position and velocity that are known to God
 but are hidden from us. Such "hidden-variable" theories predict
 results that are not in agreement with observation. Even God is
 bound by the uncertainty principle and cannot know the position
 and velocity; He can only know the wave function.
 The rate at which the wave function changes with time is given
 by what is called the Schrodinger equation (Fig. 4.5) . If we know the 
 108
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.6)
 In the flat spacetime of special
 relativity observers moving at different
 speeds will have different
 measures of time, but we can use
 the Schrodinger equation in any of
 these times to predict what the
 wave function will be in the future.
 wave function at one time, we can use the Schrodinger equation to
 calculate it at any other time, past or future. Therefore, there is still
 determinism in quantum theory, but it is on a reduced scale. Instead
 of being able to predict both the positions and the velocities, we can
 predict only the wave function. This can allow us to predict either the
 positions or the velocities, but not both accurately. Thus in quantum
 theory the ability to make exact predictions is just half what it was in
 the classical Laplace worldview. Nevertheless, within this restricted
 sense it is still possible to claim that there is determinism.
 However, the use of the Schrodinger equation to evolve the
 wave function forward in time (that is, to predict what it will be at
 future times) implicitly assumes that time runs on smoothly everywhere,
 forever. This was certainly true in Newtonian physics. Time
 was assumed to be absolute, meaning that each event in the history
 of the universe was labeled by a number called time, and that a series
 of time labels ran smoothly from the infinite past to the infinite
 future. This is what might be called the commonsense view of time,
 and it is the view of time that most people and even most physicists
 have at the back of their minds. However, in 1905 , as we have seen,
 the concept of absolute time was overthrown by the special theory of
 relativity, in which time was no longer an independent quantity on its
 own but was just one direction in a four-dimensional continuum
 called spacetime. In special relativity, different observers traveling at 
 109
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 different velocities move through spacetime on different paths.
 Each observer has his or her own measure of time along the path he
 or she is following, and different observers will measure different
 intervals of time between events (Fig. 4.6) .
 Thus in special relativity there is no unique absolute time that
 we can use to label events. However, the spacetime of special relativity
 is flat. This means that in special relativity, the time measured
 by any freely moving observer increases smoothly in spacetime
 from minus infinity in the infinite past to plus infinity in the infinite
 future. We can use any of these measures of time in the Schrodinger
 equation to evolve the wave function. In special relativity, therefore,
 we still have the quantum version of determinism.
 The situation was different in the general theory of relativity, in
 which spacetime was not flat but curved, and distorted by the matter
 and energy in it. In our solar system, the curvature of spacetime is so
 slight, at least on a macroscopic scale, that it doesn't interfere with
 our usual idea of time. In this situation, we could still use this time in
 the Schrodinger equation to get a deterministic evolution of the wave
 function. However, once we allow spacetime to be curved, the door
 is opened to the possibility that it may have a structure that doesn't
 admit a time that increases smoothly for every observer, as we would
 expect for a reasonable measure of time. For example, suppose that
 spacetime was like a vertical cylinder (Fig. 4.7).
 (FIG. 4.7) TIM E STAND S STIL L
 A measure of time would necessarily
 have stagnation points where the handle
 joined the main cylinder: points
 where time stood still. At these points,
 time would not increase in any direction.Therefore,
 one could not use the
 Schrodinger equation to predict what
 the wave function will be in the future. 
 1 1 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Light escaping from
 a star
 Light trapped by a
 massive star
 FIG. 4.9
 Height up the cylinder would be a measure of time
 that increased for every observer and ran from minus infinity to
 plus infinity. However, imagine instead that spacetime was like a
 cylinder with a handle (or "wormhole") that branched off and
 then joined back on. Then any measure of time would necessarily
 have stagnation points where the handle joined the main cylinder:
 points where time stood still. At these points, time would not
 increase for any observer. In such a spacetime, we could not use the
 Schrodinger equation to get a deterministic evolution for the wave
 function. Watch out for wormholes: you never know what may come
 out of them.
 Black holes are the reason we think time will not increase for
 every observer. The first discussion of black holes appeared in 1783 .
 A former Cambridge don, John Michell, presented the following argument.
 If one fires a particle, such as a cannonball, vertically upward, its
 ascent will be slowed by gravity, and eventually the particle will stop
 moving upward and will fall back (Fig. 4.8) . However, if the initial
 upward velocity is greater than a critical value called the escape velocity,
 gravity will never be strong enough to stop the particle, and it will
 get away. The escape velocity is about 12 kilometers per second for
 the Earth, and about 61 8 kilometers per second for the Sun. 
 1 1 1
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 Both of these escape velocities are much higher than the
 speed of real cannonballs, but they are small compared to the speed
 of light, which is 300,00 0 kilometers per second. Thus, light can
 get away from the Earth or Sun without much difficulty. However,
 Michell argued that there could be stars that are much more massive
 than the Sun and have escape velocities greater than the speed
 of light (Fig. 4.9) . We would not be able to see these stars, because
 any light they sent out would be dragged back by the gravity of the
 star. Thus they would be what Michell called dark stars and we now
 call black holes.
 Michell's idea of dark stars was based on Newtonian physics, in
 which time was absolute and went on regardless of what happened.
 Thus they didn't affect our ability to predict the future in the classical
 Newtonian picture. But the situation was very different in the general
 theory of relativity, in which massive bodies curve spacetime.
 In 1916 , shortly after the theory was first formulated, Karl
 Schwarzschild (who died soon after of an illness contracted on the
 Russian front in the First World War) found a solution of the field
 equations of general relativity that represented a black hole. What
 Schwarzschild had found wasn't understood or its importance recognized
 for many years. Einstein himself never believed in black 
 1 12
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.10)
 The quasar 3C273, the first quasistellar
 radio source to be discovered,
 produces a large amount of power in
 a small region. Matter falling into a
 black hole seems to be the only
 mechanism that can account for such
 a high luminosity. 
 1 13
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 (FIG.4.1 1)
 Stars form in clouds of gas and dust
 like the Orion Nebula.
 holes, and his attitude was shared by most of the old guard in general
 relativity. I remember going to Paris to give a seminar on my
 discovery that quantum theory means that black holes aren't completely
 black. My seminar fell rather flat because at that time almost
 no one in Paris believed in black holes. The French also felt that the
 name as they translated it, trou noir, had dubious sexual connotations
 and should be replaced by astre occlu, or "hidden star." However, neither
 this nor other suggested names caught the public imagination
 like the term black bole, which was first introduced by John
 Archibald Wheeler, the American physicist who inspired much of
 the modern work in this field.
 The discovery of quasars in 196 3 brought forth an outburst of
 theoretical work on black holes and observational attempts to
 detect them (Fig. 4.10) . Here is the picture that has emerged.
 Consider what we believe would be the history of a star with a mass
 twenty times that of the Sun. Such stars form from clouds of gas,
 like those in the Orion Nebula (Fig. 4. 1 1). As clouds of gas contract
 under their own gravity, the gas heats up and eventually becomes
 hot enough to start the nuclear fusion reaction that converts hydrogen
 into helium. The heat generated by this process creates a pressure
 that supports the star against its own gravity and stops it from
 contracting further. A star will stay in this state for a long time,
 burning hydrogen and radiating light into space.
 The gravitational field of the star will affect the paths of light
 rays coming from it. One can draw a diagram with time plotted
 upward and distance from the center of the star plotted horizontally
 (see Fig. 4.12 , page 114) . In this diagram, the surface of the star is represented
 by two vertical lines, one on either side of the center. One
 can choose that time be measured in seconds and distance in lightseconds—the
 distance light travels in a second. When we use these
 units, the speed of light is 1; that is, the speed of light is 1 light-second
 per second. This means that far from the star and its gravitational
 field, the path of a light ray on the diagram is a line at a 45-degree
 angle to the vertical. However, nearer the star, the curvature of spacetime
 produced by the mass of the star will change the paths of the
 light rays and cause them to be at a smaller angle to the vertical. 
 1 1 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.12) Spacetime around a noncollapsing
 star Light rays can escape
 from the surface of the star (the red
 vertical lines). Far from the star, the light
 rays are at 45 degrees to the vertical,
 but near the star the warping of spacetime
 by the mass of the star causes light
 rays to be at a smaller angle to the
 vertical.
 (FIG. 4.13) If the star collapses (the red
 lines meeting at a point) the warping
 becomes so large that light rays near the
 surface move inward. A black hole is
 formed, a region of spacetime from
 which it is not possible for light to escape.
 Massive stars will burn their hydrogen into helium much faster
 than the Sun does. This means they can run out of hydrogen in as
 little as a few hundred million years. After that, such stars face a crisis.
 They can burn their helium into heavier elements such as carbon
 and oxygen, but these nuclear reactions do not release much
 energy, so the stars lose heat and the thermal pressure that supports
 them against gravity. Therefore they begin to get smaller. If they
 are more than about twice the mass of the Sun, the pressure will
 never be sufficient to stop the contraction. They will collapse to
 zero size and infinite density to form what is called a singularity
 (Fig. 4. 1 3). In the diagram of time against distance from the center,
 as a star shrinks, the paths of light rays from its surface will start out 
 115
 P R E D I C T I N G TH E F U T U R E
 at smaller and smaller angles to the vertical. When the star reaches
 a certain critical radius, the path will be vertical on the diagram,
 which means that the light will hover at a constant distance from
 the center of the star, never getting away. This critical path of light
 will sweep out a surface called the event horizon, which separates
 the region of spacetime from which light can escape from the
 region from which it cannot. Any light emitted by the star after it
 passes the event horizon will be bent back inward by the curvature
 of spacetime. The star will have become one of Michell's dark stars,
 or, as we say now, a black hole.
 How can you detect a black hole if no light can get out of it?
 The answer is that a black hole still exerts the same gravitational
 The horizon, the outer boundary of a
 black hole, is formed by light rays that
 just fail to get away from the black
 hole, but stay hovering at a constant
 distance from the center. 
 1 1 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.15 )
 A BLAC K HOL E A T TH E CENTE R O F
 A GALAX Y
 Left: The galaxy NGC 4151 revealed
 by the wide-field planetary camera.
 Center: The horizontal line passing
 through the image is from light generated
 by the black hole at the center of
 4151 .
 Right Image showing the velocity of
 oxygen emissions. All the evidence
 indicates that NGC 4151 contains a
 black hole about a hundred million
 times the mass of the Sun.
 (FIG. 4.14)
 pull on neighboring objects as did the body that collapsed. If the
 Sun were a black hole and had managed to become one without losing
 any of its mass, the planets would still orbit as they do now.
 One way of searching for a black hole is therefore to look for
 matter that is orbiting what seems to be an unseen compact massive
 object. A number of such systems have been observed. Perhaps the
 most impressive are the giant black holes that occur in the centers
 of galaxies and quasars (Fig. 4.15) .
 The properties of black holes that have been discussed thus far
 don't raise any great problems with determinism. Time will come to
 an end for an astronaut who falls into a black hole and hits the singularity.
 However, in general relativity, one is free to measure time at
 different rates in different places. One could therefore speed up the
 astronaut's watch as he or she approached the singularity, so that it
 still registered an infinite interval of time. On the time-and-distance
 diagram (Fig. 4.14) , the surfaces of constant values of this new time
 would be all crowded together at the center, below the point where
 the singularity appeared. But they would agree with the usual measure
 of time in the nearly flat spacetime far away from the black hole.
 One could use this time in the Schrodinger equation and calculate
 the wave function at later times if one knew it initially. Thus
 one still has determinism. It is worth noting, however, that at late
 times, part of the wave function is inside the black hole, where it
 can't be observed by someone outside. Thus an observer who is sensible
 enough not to fall into a black hole cannot run the
 Schrodinger equation backward and calculate the wave function at
 early times. To do that, he or she would need to know the part of
 the wave function that is inside the black hole. This contains the 
 1 1 7
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E 
 118
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 The no-hair result.
 information about what fell into the hole. This is potentially a very
 large amount of information, because a black hole of a given mass
 and rate of rotation can be formed from a very large number of different
 collections of particles; a black hole does not depend on the
 nature of the body that had collapsed to form it. John Wheeler
 called this result "a black hole has no hair." For the French, this just
 confirmed their suspicions.
 The difficulty with determinism arose when I discovered that
 black holes aren't completely black. As we saw in Chapter 2, quantum
 theory means that fields can't be exactly zero even in what is
 called the vacuum. If they were zero, they would have both an exact
 value or position at zero and an exact rate of change or velocity that
 was also zero. This would be a violation of the uncertainty principle,
 which says that the position and velocity can't both be well defined.
 All fields must instead have a certain amount of what are called vacuum
 fluctuations (in the same way that the pendulum in Chapter 2
 had to have zero point fluctuations). Vacuum fluctuations can be
 interpreted in several ways that seem different but are in fact mathematically
 equivalent. From a positivist viewpoint, one is free to use
 whatever picture is most useful for the problem in question. In this
 case it is helpful to think of vacuum fluctuations as pairs of virtual
 particles that appear together at some point of spacetime, move
 apart, and come back together and annihilate each other. "Virtual"
 means that these particles cannot be observed directly, but their
 indirect effects can be measured, and they agree with theoretical predictions
 to a remarkable degree of accuracy (Fig. 4.16) .
 If a black hole is present, one member of a pair of particles
 may fall into the black hole, leaving the other member free to
 escape to infinity (Fig. 4.17) . To someone far from the black hole,
 the escaping particles appear to have been radiated by the black
 hole. The spectrum of a black hole is exactly what we would expect
 from a hot body, with a temperature proportional to the gravitational
 field on the horizon—the boundary—of the black hole. In
 other words, the temperature of a black hole depends on its size.
 A black hole of a few solar masses would have a temperature of
 about a millionth of a degree above absolute zero, and a larger black
 hole would have an even lower temperature. Thus any quantum 
 1 19
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 (FIG. 4.17)
 Above; Virtual particles appearing and
 annihilating one another; close to the
 event horizon of a black hole.
 One of the pair falls into the black hole
 while its twin is free to escape. From
 outside the event horizon it appears
 that the black hole is radiating the particles
 that escape.
 (FIG. 4.16 )
 Left: In empty space particle pairs
 appear lead a brief existence, and then
 annihilate one another 
 1 2 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Events that will never be seen by the observer
 Observer's event horizon History of observer Observer's event horizon Surface of constant time
 (FIG. 4.18)
 The de Sitter solution of the field
 equations of general relativity represents
 a universe that expands in an
 inflationary manner In the diagram
 time is shown in the upward and the
 size of the universe in the horizontal
 direction. Spatial distances increase so
 rapidly that light from distant galaxies
 never reaches us, and there is an event
 horizon, a boundary of the region we
 cannot observe, as in a black hole.
 radiation from such black holes would be utterly swamped by the
 2.7-degree radiation left over from the hot big bang—the cosmic
 background radiation that we discussed in Chapter 2. It would be
 possible to detect the radiation from much smaller and hotter black
 holes, but there don't seem to be many of them around. That is a
 pity. If one were discovered, I would get a Nobel Prize. However,
 we have indirect observational evidence for this radiation, and that
 evidence comes from the early universe. As described in Chapter 3,
 it is thought that very early in its history, the universe went through
 an inflationary period during which it expanded at an ever-increasing
 rate. The expansion during this period would have been so rapid 
 121
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 that some objects would be too distant from us for their light ever
 to reach us; the universe would have expanded too much and too
 rapidly while that light was traveling toward us. Thus there would
 be a horizon in the universe like the horizon of a black hole, separating
 the region from which light can reach us and the region from
 which it cannot (Fig. 4.18) .
 Very similar arguments show that there should be thermal
 radiation from this horizon, as there is from a black hole horizon.
 In thermal radiation, we have learned to expect a characteristic
 spectrum of density fluctuations. In this case, these density fluctuations
 would have expanded with the universe. When their length
 scale became longer than the size of the event horizon, they would
 have become frozen in, so that we can observe them today as small
 variations in the temperature of the cosmic background radiation
 left over from the early universe. The observations of those variations
 agree with the predictions of thermal fluctuations with
 remarkable accuracy.
 Even if the observational evidence for black hole radiation is a
 bit indirect, everyone who has studied the problem agrees it must
 occur in order to be consistent with our other observationally tested
 theories. This has important implications for determinism. The radiation
 from a black hole will carry away energy, which must mean that
 the black hole will lose mass and get smaller. In turn, this will mean
 that its temperature will rise and the rate of radiation will increase.
 Eventually the black hole will get down to zero mass. We don't know
 how to calculate what happens at this point, but the only natural, reasonable
 outcome would seem to be that the black hole disappears
 completely. So what happens then to the part of the wave function
 inside the black hole and the information it contains about what
 had fallen into the black hole? The first guess might be that this
 part of the wave function, and the information it carries,
 would emerge when the black hole finally disappears.
 However, information cannot be carried for free, as
 one realizes when one gets a telephone bill.
 Information requires energy to carry it, and
 there's very little energy left in the final stages of a
 black hole. The only plausible way the information 
 1 2 2
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.19 )
 The positive energy carried away by
 the thermal radiation from its horizon
 reduces the black hole's mass. As it
 loses mass, the temperature of the
 black hole rises and its rate of radiation
 increases, so it loses mass more
 and more quickly. We don't know
 what happens if the mass becomes
 extremely small, but the most likely
 outcome seems to be that the black
 hole would disappear completely.
 inside could get out would be if it emerged continuously with the
 radiation, rather than waiting for this final stage. However, according
 to the picture of one member of a virtual-particle pair falling in and
 the other member escaping, one would not expect the escaping particle
 to be related to what fell in, or to carry away information about
 it. So the only answer would seem to be that the information in the
 part of the wave function inside the black hole gets lost (Fig. 4.19) .
 Such loss of information would have important implications
 for determinism. To start with, we have noted that even if you knew
 the wave function after the black hole disappeared, you could not
 run the Schrodinger equation backward and calculate what the
 wave function was before the black hole formed. What that was
 would depend in part on the bit of the wave function that got lost
 in the black hole. We are used to thinking we can know the past
 exactly. However, if information gets lost in black holes, this is not
 the case. Anything could have happened. 
 123
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 In general, however, people such as astrologers and those who
 consult them are more interested in predicting the future than in
 retrodicting the past. At first glance, it might seem that the loss of
 part of the wave function down the black hole would not prevent
 us from predicting the wave function outside the black hole. But it
 turns out that this loss does interfere with such a prediction, as we
 can see when we consider a thought experiment proposed by
 Einstein, Boris Podolsky, and Nathan Rosen in the 1930s .
 Imagine that a radioactive atom decays and sends out two particles
 in opposite directions and with opposite spins. An observer
 who looks only at one particle cannot predict whethe r it will be
 spinning to the right or left. But if the observer measures it to be
 spinning to the right, then he or she can predict with certainty that
 the other particle will be spinning to the left, and vice versa (Fig.
 4 .20). Einstein thought that this proved that quantum theory was
 ridiculous: the other particle might be at the othe r side of the
 (FIG. 4.20 )
 In the Einstein-Podolsky-Rosen thought
 experiment, the observer who has
 measured the spin of one particle will
 know the direction of the spin of the
 second particle. 
 1 2 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.21 )
 A virtual-particle pair has a wave function
 that predicts that both particles
 will have opposite spins. But if one
 particle falls into the black hole, it is
 impossible to predict with certainty
 the spin of the remaining particle.
 galaxy by now, yet one would instantaneously know which way it
 was spinning. However, most other scientists agree that it was
 Einstein who was confused, not quantum theory. The EinsteinPodolsky-Rosen
 thought experiment does not show that one is able
 to send information faster than light. That would be the ridiculous
 part. One cannot choose that one's own particle will be measured to
 be spinning to the right, so one cannot prescribe that the distant
 observer's particle should be spinning to the left.
 In fact, this thought experiment is exactly what happens with
 black hole radiation. The virtual-particle pair will have a wave function
 that predicts that the two members will definitely have opposite
 spins (Fig. 4.21) . What we would like to do is predict the spin
 and wave function of the outgoing particle, which we could do if we
 could observe the particle that has fallen in. But that particle is now
 inside the black hole, where its spin and wave function cannot be 
 125
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 Intersecting branes
 Black hole
 measured. Because of this, it is not possible to predict the spin or the
 wave function of the particle that escapes. It can have different spins
 and different wave functions, with various probabilities, but it doesn't
 have a unique spin or wave function. Thus it would seem that our
 power to predict the future would be further reduced. The classical
 idea of Laplace, that one could predict both the positions and the
 velocities of particles, had to be modified when the uncertainty principle
 showed that one could not accurately measure both positions
 and velocities. However, one could still measure the wave function
 and use the Schrodinger equation to predict what it should be in the
 future. This would allow one to predict with certainty one combination
 of position and velocity—which is half of what one could predict
 according to Laplace's ideas. We can predict with certainty that the
 particles have opposite spins, but if one particle falls into the black
 hole, there is no prediction we can make with certainty about the
 (FIG. 4.22)
 Black holes can be thought of as the
 intersections of p-branes in the extra
 dimensions of spacetime. Information
 about the internal states of black holes
 would be stored as waves on the pbranes.
 
 126
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 4.23 )
 A particle falling into a black hole can
 be thought of as a closed loop of
 string hitting a p-brane (I). It will
 excite waves in the p-brane (2).
 Waves can come together and cause
 part of the p-brane to break off as a
 closed string (3). This would be a
 particle emitted by the black hole.
 remaining particle. This means that there isn't any measurement outside
 the black hole that can be predicted with certainty: our ability to
 make definite predictions would be reduced to zero. So maybe astrology
 is no worse at predicting the future than the laws of science.
 Many physicists didn't like this reduction in determinism and
 therefore suggested that information about what is inside can somehow
 get out of a black hole. For years it was just a pious hope that
 some way to save the information would be found. But in 199 6
 Andrew Strominger and Cumrun Vafa made an important advance.
 They chose to regard a black hole as being made up of a number of
 building blocks, called p-branes (see page 54) .
 Recall that one way of thinking about p-branes is as sheets that
 move through the three dimensions of space and also through seven
 extra dimensions that we don't notice (see Fig. 4.22 , page 125) . In
 certain cases, one can show that the number of waves on the pbranes
 is the same as the amount of information one would expect
 the black hole to contain. If particles hit the p-branes, they excite
 extra waves on the branes. Similarly, if waves moving in different 
 1 2 7
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 directions on the p-branes come together at some point, they can
 create a peak so great that a bit of the p-brane breaks away and goes
 off as a particle. Thus the p-branes can absorb and emit particles
 like black holes (Fig. 4.23) .
 One can regard the p-branes as an effective theory; that is,
 while we don't need to believe that there actually are little sheets
 moving through a flat spacetime, black holes can behave as if they
 were made up of such sheets. It is like water, which is made up of billions
 and billions of H 2 0 molecules with complicated interactions.
 But a smooth fluid is a very good effective model. The mathematical
 model of black holes as made of p-branes gives results similar to the
 virtual-particle pair picture described earlier. Thus from a positivist
 viewpoint, it is an equally good model, at least for certain classes of
 black hole. For these classes, the p-brane model predicts exactly the
 same rate of emission that the virtual-particle pair model predicts.
 However, there is one important difference: in the p-brane model,
 information about what falls into the black hole will be stored in the
 wave function for the waves on the p-branes. The p-branes are 
 128
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 1 2 9
 PREDICTIN G TH E FUTUR E
 regarded as sheets in flat spacetime, and for that reason, time will
 flow forward smoothly, the paths of light rays won't be bent, and
 the information in the waves won't be lost. Instead, the information
 will eventually emerge from the black hole in the radiation from the
 p-branes. Thus, according to the p-brane model, we can use the
 Schrodinger equation to calculate what the wave function will be at
 later times. Nothing will get lost, and time will roll smoothly on.
 We will have complete determinism in the quantum sense.
 So which of these pictures is correct? Does part of the wave
 function get lost down black holes, or does all the information get
 out again, as the p-brane model suggests? This is one of the outstanding
 questions in theoretical physics today. Many people
 believe that recent work shows that information is not lost. The
 world is safe and predictable, and nothing unexpected will happen.
 But it's not clear. If one takes Einstein's general theory of relativity
 seriously, one must allow the possibility that spacetime ties itself in
 a knot and information gets lost in the folds. When the starship
 Enterprise went through a wormhole, something unexpected happened.
 I know, because I was on board, playing poker with Newton,
 Einstein, and Data. I had a big surprise. Just look what appeared on
 my knee.
 Courtesy of Paramount Pictures.
 STA R TREK : TH E NEX T GENERATIO N
 Copyright © 200 1 by Paramount Pictures.
 All Right s Reserved 
 
 1 3 1
 CHAPTE R 5
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 Is time travel possible?
 Could an advanced civilization go back and change the past? 
 132
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 133
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 (2)
 In the future it is
 proved that the
 dynamical evolution
 from generic initial
 conditions can
 never produce a
 naked singularity.
 (3)
 Stephen Hawking
 signs a sure bet
 on 5 February,
 1997.
 (I)
 Stephen Hawking
 enters a wormhole
 on 6 February, 1997.
 Kip Thome
 M
 Y FRIEN D AN D COLLEAGU E KIP THORNE , WIT H WHO M
 I have had a number of bets (left), is not one to follow
 the accepted line in physics just because everyone else
 does. This led him to have the courage to be the first serious scientist
 to discuss time travel as a practical possibility.
 It is tricky to speculate openly about time travel. One risks
 either an outcry at the waste of public money being spent on something
 so ridiculous or a demand that the research be classified for
 military purposes. After all, how could we protect ourselves against
 someone with a time machine? They might change history and rule
 the world. There are only a few of us foolhardy enough to work on
 a subject that is so politically incorrect in physics circles. We disguise
 the fact by using technical terms that are code for time travel. 
 134
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 A spacecraft takes
 off at 12.00 hours.
 The spacecraft
 returns at 11.45
 hours, fifteen
 minutes before it
 is due to set out.
 FIG. 5.1 
 135
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 The basis of all modern discussions of time travel is Einstein's
 general theory of relativity. As we have seen in earlier chapters, the
 Einstein equations made space and time dynamic by describing how
 they were curved and distorted by the matter and energy in the universe.
 In general relativity someone's personal time as measured by
 their wristwatch would always increase, just as it did in Newtonian
 theory or the flat spacetime of special relativity. But there was now the
 possibility that spacetime could be warped so much that you could go
 off in a spaceship and come back before you set out (Fig. 5.1).
 One way this could happen is if there were wormholes, tubes
 of spacetime mentioned in Chapter 4 that connect different regions
 of space and time. The idea is that you steer your spaceship into
 one mouth of the wormhole and come out of the other mouth in a
 different place and at a different time (Fig. 5.2, see page 136).
 Wormholes, if they exist, would be the solution to the speed
 limit problem in space: it would take tens of thousands of years to 
 136
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 cross the galaxy in a spaceship that traveled at less than the speed
 of light, as relativity demands. But you might go through a wormhole
 to the other side of the galaxy and be back in time for dinner.
 However, one can show that if wormholes exist, you could also use
 them to get back before you set out. So you might think that you
 could do something like blowing up the rocket on its launch pad to
 prevent your setting out in the first place. This is a variation of the
 grandfather paradox: what happens if you go back and kill your
 grandfather before your father was conceived? (see Fig. 5.3 , page
 138 )
 Of course, this is a paradox only if you believe you have free
 will to do what you like when you go back in time. This book will
 SHALLO W WORMHOL E
 Enters at 12.00 hours Exits at 12.00 hours 
 1 3 7
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T 
 138
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 5.3)
 Can a bullet fired through a wormhole
 into an earlier time affect the
 one who fires it?
 not go into a philosophical discussion of free will. Instead it will concentrate
 on whether the laws of physics allow spacetime to be so
 warped that a macroscopic body such as a spaceship can return to its
 own past. According to Einstein's theory, a spaceship necessarily
 travels at less than the local speed of light and follows what is called
 a timelike path through spacetime. Thus one can formulate the question
 in technical terms: does spacetime admit timelike curves that are
 closed—that is, that return to their starting point again and again? I
 shall refer to such paths as "time loops."
 There are three levels on which we can try to answer this question.
 The first is Einstein's general theory of relativity, which assumes
 that the universe has a well-defined history without any uncertainty.
 For this classical theory we have a fairly complete picture. However,
 as we have seen, this theory can't be quite right, because we observe
 that matter is subject to uncertainty and quantum fluctuations.
 We can therefore ask the question about time travel on a second
 level, that of semiclassical theory. In this, we consider matter to behave
 according to quantum theory, with uncertainty and quantum fluctuations,
 but spacetime to be well defined and classical. Here the picture
 is less complete, but at least we have some idea of how to proceed. 
 139
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 (FIG. 5.4)
 Does spacetime admit timelike
 curves that are closed, returning to
 their starting point again and again?
 Finally, there is the full quantum theory of gravity, whatever
 that may be. In this theory, where not just matter but also time and
 space themselves are uncertain and fluctuate, it is not even clear
 how to pose the question of whethe r time travel is possible. Mayb e
 the best we can do is to ask how people in regions where spacetime
 is nearly classical and free from uncertainty would interpret their
 measurements. Would they think that time travel had taken place in
 regions of strong gravity and large quantum fluctuations?
 To start with the classical theory: the flat spacetime of special
 relativity (relativity without gravity) doesn't allow time travel, nor
 do the curved spacetimes that were known early on. It was therefore
 a great shock to Einstein when in 194 9 Kurt Godel, of Godel's
 theorem (see box), discovered a spacetime that was a universe full
 of rotating matter, with time loops through every point (Fig. 5.4) .
 T h e Godel solution required a cosmological constant, which
 may or may not exist in nature, but other solutions were subsequently
 found without a cosmological constant. A particularly
 interesting case is one in which two cosmi c strings move at high
 speed past each other.
 Cosmi c strings should not be confused with the strings of 
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 FIG. 5. 5
 string theory, though they are not entirely unrelated. They are
 objects with length but a tiny cross section. Their occurrence is predicted
 in some theories of elementary particles. The spacetime outside
 a single cosmic string is flat. However, it is flat spacetime with
 a wedge cut out, with the sharp end of the wedge at the string. It is
 like a cone: take a large circle of paper and cut out a segment like a
 slice of pie, a wedge with its corner at the center of the circle. Then
 discard the piece you have cut out and glue the cut edges of the
 remaining piece together so that you have a cone. This represents
 the spacetime in which the cosmic string exists (Fig. 5.5) .
 Notice that because the surface of the cone is the same flat sheet
 of paper with which you started (minus the wedge), you can still call
 it "flat" except at the apex. You can recognize that there is curvature
 at the apex by the fact that a circle around the apex has a smaller circumference
 than a circle drawn at the same distance around the center
 of the original round sheet of paper. In other words, a circle
 around the apex is shorter than one would expect for a circle of that
 radius in flat space because of the missing segment (Fig. 5.6) .
 Similarly, in the case of a cosmic string, the wedge that is
 removed from flat spacetime shortens circles around the string but
 does not affect time or distances along the string. This means that
 the spacetime around a single cosmic string does not contain any
 time loops, so it is not possible to travel into the past. However, if
 there is a second cosmic string that is moving relative to the first,
 its time direction will be a combination of the time and space directions
 of the first. This means that the wedge that is cut out for the
 second string will shorten both distances in space and time intervals
 as seen by someone moving with the first string (Fig. 5.7) . If the
 cosmic strings are moving at nearly the speed of light relative to
 each other, the saving of time going around both strings can be so
 great that one arrives back before one set out. In other words, there
 are time loops that one can follow to travel into the past.
 The cosmic string spacetime contains matter that has positive
 energy density and is consistent with the physics we know. However,
 the warping that produces the time loops extends all the way out to
 infinity in space and back to the infinite past in time. Thus these 
 141
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 FIG. 5.6
 Wedges removed from
 spacetime with sharp
 edges not parallel
 A wedge for a single cosmic string shortens distances
 in the rest frame of the string but leaves
 time unaffected. 
 142
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 FINITELY GENERATED TIME TRAVEL HORIZO N
 (FIG. 5.8)
 Even the most advanced civilization
 could warp spacetime only in a finite
 region. The time travel horizon, the
 boundary of the part of spacetime in
 which it is possible to travel into one's
 past, would be formed by light rays
 that emerge from finite regions.
 spacetimes were created with time travel in them. We have no reason
 to believe that our own universe was created in such a warped fashion,
 and we have no reliable evidence of visitors from the future. (I'm discounting
 the conspiracy theory that UFOs are from the future and
 that the government knows and is covering it up. Its record of coverups
 is not that good.) I shall therefore assume that there were no time
 loops in the distant past or, more precisely, in the past of some surface
 through spacetime that I shall call S. The question then is: could some
 advanced civilization build a time machine? That is, could it modify
 the spacetime to the future of S (above the surface S in the diagram)
 so that time loops appeared in a finite region? I say a finite region
 because no matter how advanced the civilization becomes, it could
 presumably control only a finite part of the universe.
 In science, finding the right formulation of a problem is often
 the key to solving it, and this was a good example. To define what
 was meant by a finite time machine, I went back to some early work
 of mine. Time travel is possible in a region of spacetime in which
 there are time loops, paths that move at less than the speed of light
 but which nevertheless manage to come back to the place and time
 they started because of the warping of spacetime. Since I have 
 143
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 assumed there were no
 time loops in the distant
 past, there must be what I
 call a time travel "horizon,"
 the boundary separating
 the region of time
 loops from the region
 without them (Fig.5.8).
 Time travel horizons
 are rather like black hole
 horizons. While a black
 hole horizon is formed by light
 rays that just miss falling into the black hole, a time travel horizon
 is formed by light rays on the verge of meeting up with themselves.
 I then take as my criterion for a time machine what I call a finitely
 generated horizon—that is, a horizon that is formed by light rays
 that all emerge from a bounded region. In other words, they don't
 come in from infinity or from a singularity, but originate from a
 finite region containing time loops—the sort of region our
 advanced civilization is supposed to create.
 In adopting this definition as the footprint of a time machine,
 we have the advantage of being able to use the machinery that Roger
 Penrose and I developed to study singularities and black holes. Even
 without using the Einstein equations, I can show that, in general, a
 finitely generated horizon will contain a light ray that actually meets
 up with itself—that is, a light ray that keeps coming back to the same
 point over and over again. Each time the light came around it would
 be more and more blue-shifted, so the images would get bluer and
 bluer. The wave crests of a pulse of light will get closer and closer
 together and the light will get around in shorter and shorter intervals
 of its time. In fact, a particle of light would have only a finite history,
 as defined by its own measure of time, even though it went around
 and around in a finite region and did not hit a curvature singularity.
 The question then is: could some
 advanced civilization build a time
 machine? 
 1 4 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 5.9, above)
 The danger of time travel.
 (FIG. 5.10, opposite)
 The prediction that black holes radiate
 and lose mass implies that quantum
 theory causes negative energy to flow
 into the black hole across the horizon.
 For the black hole to shrink in size, the
 energy density on the horizon must
 be negative, the sign that is required
 to build a time machine.
 One might not care if a particle of light completed its history
 in a finite time. But I can also prove that there would be paths moving
 at less than the speed of light that had only finite duration.
 These could be the histories of observers who would be trapped in
 a finite region before the horizon and would go around and around
 faster and faster until they reached the speed of light in a finite
 time. So if a beautiful alien in a flying saucer invites you into her
 time machine, step with care. You might fall into one of these
 trapped repeating histories of only finite duration (Fig. 5.9).
 These results do not depend on the Einstein equations but only
 on the way spacetime would have to warp to produce time loops in a
 finite region. However, we can now ask what kind of matter an
 advanced civilization would have to use to warp spacetime so as to
 build a finite-sized time machine. Can it have positive energy density
 everywhere, as in the cosmic string spacetime I described earlier? The
 cosmic string spacetime did not satisfy my requirement that the time
 loops appear in a finite region. However, one might think that this was
 just because the cosmic strings were infinitely long. One might imagine
 that one could build a finite time machine using finite loops of cosmic
 string and have the energy density positive everywhere. It is a pity
 to disappoint people such as Kip, who want to return to the past, but
 it can't be done with positive energy density everywhere. I can prove
 that to build a finite time machine, you need negative energy.
 Energy density is always positive in classical theory, so time
 machines of finite size are ruled out on this level. However, the situation
 is different in the semiclassical theory, in which one considers
 matter to behave according to quantum theory but spacetime to
 be well defined and classical. As we have seen, the uncertainty principle
 of quantum theory means that fields are always fluctuating up
 and down even in apparently empty space, and have an energy density
 that is infinite. Thus one has to subtract an infinite quantity to
 get the finite energy density that we observe in the universe. This
 subtraction can leave the energy density negative, at least locally.
 Even in flat space, one can find quantum states in which the energy 
 145
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 density is negative locally although the total energy is positive.
 O n e might wonder whether these negative values actually cause
 spacetime to warp in the appropriate way to build a finite time
 machine, but it seems they must. As we saw in Chapte r 4, quantum
 fluctuations mean that even apparently empty space is full of pairs
 of virtual particles that appear together, move apart, and then come
 back together and annihilate each othe r (Fig. 5 .10). On e membe r
 of a virtual-particle pair will have positive energy and the othe r
 negative energy. Whe n a black hole is present, the negative-energy
 member can fall in and the positive-energy membe r can escape to
 infinity, where it appears as radiation that carries positive energy
 away from the black hole. Th e negative-energy particles falling in
 cause the black hole to lose mass and to evaporate slowly, with its
 horizon shrinking in size (Fig. 5 .11) .
 Ordinary matter with positive energy density has an attractive
 gravitational effect and warps spacetime to bend light rays toward
 each other—jus t as the ball on the rubber sheet in Chapte r 2 always
 makes the smaller ball bearings curve toward it, never away. FIG. 5.1 0 
 146
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 My grandson,
 William Mackenzie Smith.
 This would imply that the area of the horizon of a black hole
 could only increase with time, never shrink. For the horizon of a
 black hole to shrink in size, the energy density on the horizon must
 be negative and warp spacetime to make light rays diverge from
 each other. This was something I first realized when I was getting
 into bed soon after the birth of my daughter. I won't say how long
 ago that was, but I now have a grandson.
 The evaporation of black holes shows that on the quantum
 level the energy density can sometimes be negative and warp spacetime
 in the direction that would be needed to build a time machine.
 Thus we might imagine that some very advanced civilization could
 arrange things so that the energy density is sufficiently negative to
 form a time machine that could be used by macroscopic objects
 such as spaceships. However, there's an important difference
 between a black hole horizon, which is formed by light rays that
 just keep going, and the horizon in a time machine, which contains
 closed light rays that keep going around and around. A virtual particle
 moving on such a closed path would bring its ground state
 energy back to the same point again and again. One would therefore
 expect the energy density to be infinite on the horizon—the
 boundary of the time machine, the region in which one can travel
 into the past. This is borne out by explicit calculations in a few
 backgrounds that are simple enough for exact calculations. It would
 mean that a person or a space probe that tried to cross the horizon
 to get into the time machine would get wiped out by a bolt of radiation
 (Fig. 5.12) . So the future looks black for time travel—or
 should one say blindingly white?
 The energy density of matter depends on the state it is in, so
 it is possible that an advanced civilization might be able to make
 the energy density finite on the boundary of the time machine by
 "freezing out" or removing the virtual particles that go around and
 around in a closed loop. It is not clear, however, that such a time
 machine would be stable: the least disturbance, such as someone
 crossing the horizon to enter the time machine, might set off circulating
 virtual particles and trigger a bolt of lightning. This is a 
 147
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 question that physicists should be free to discuss without being
 laughed to scorn. Even if it turns out that time travel is impossible,
 it is important that we understand why it is impossible.
 To answer that question definitively, we need to consider
 quantum fluctuations not only of matter fields but of spacetime
 itself. One might expect that these would cause a certain fuzziness
 in the paths of light rays and in the whole concept of time ordering.
 Indeed, one can regard the radiation from black holes as leaking
 out because quantum fluctuations of spacetime mean that the
 horizon is not exactly defined. Because we don't yet have a complete
 theory of quantum gravity, it is difficult to say what the effects
 of spacetime fluctuations should be. Nevertheless, we can hope to
 get some pointers from the Feynman sum over histories described
 in Chapter 3.
 (FIG. 5.12)
 O ne might get wiped out by a bolt
 of radiation when crossing the time
 travel horizon. 
 1 4 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 5.13)
 The Feynman sum over histories has
 to include histories in which particles
 travel back in time, and even histories
 that are closed loops in time and
 space.
 Each history will be a curved spacetime with matter fields in it.
 Since we are supposed to sum over all possible histories, not just those
 that satisfy some equations, the sum must include spacetimes that are
 warped enough for travel into the past (Fig. 5.13) . So the question is,
 why isn't time travel happening everywhere? The answer is that time
 travel is indeed taking place on a microscopic scale, but we don't
 notice it. If one applies the Feynman sum-over-histories idea to a particle,
 one has to include histories in which the particle travels faster
 than light and even backward in time. In particular, there will be histories
 in which the particle goes around and around on a closed loop
 in time and space. It would be like the film Groundhog Day, in which
 a reporter has to live the same day over and over again (Fig. 5.14) .
 One cannot observe particles with such closed-loop histories
 directly with a particle detector. However, their indirect effects have
 been measured in a number of experiments. One is a small shift in the 
 1 4 9
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 light given out by hydrogen atoms, caused by electrons moving in FIG. 5.1 5
 closed loops. Another is a small force between parallel metal plates,
 caused by the fact that there are slightly fewer closed-loop histories
 that can fit between the plates compared to the region outside—
 another equivalent interpretation of the Casimir effect. Thus the existence
 of closed-loop histories is confirmed by experiment (Fig. 5.15).
 O n e might dispute whethe r closed-loop particle histories
 have anything to do with the warping of spacetime, because they
 occur even in fixed backgrounds such as flat space. But in recent
 years we have found that phenomena in physics often have dual,
 equally valid descriptions. On e can equally well say that a particle
 moves on a closed loop in a given fixed background, or that the particle
 stays fixed and space and time fluctuate around it. It is just a
 question of whether you do the sum over particle paths first and
 then the sum over curved spacetimes, or vice versa. 
 150
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 It seems, therefore, that quantum theory allows time travel on
 a microscopi c scale. However, this is not much use for science fiction
 purposes, such as going back and killing your grandfather. Th e
 question therefore is: can the probability in the sum over histories
 be peaked around spacetimes with macroscopi c time loops?
 O n e can investigate this question by studying the sum over
 histories of matter fields in a series of background spacetimes that
 get closer and closer to admitting time loops. On e would expect
 something dramatic to happen when time loops first appear, and
 this is borne out in a simple example that I studied with my student
 Michae l Cassidy.
 T h e background spacetimes in the series we studied were
 closely related to what is called the Einstein universe, the spacetime
 that Einstein proposed when he believed that the universe was static
 and unchanging in time, neither expanding nor contracting (see
 Chapte r 1). In the Einstein universe time runs from the infinite past
 to the infinite future. Th e space directions, however, are finite and
 close on themselves, like the surface of the Earth but with one more
 dimension. On e can picture this spacetime as a cylinder with the
 long axis being the time direction and the cross section being the
 three space directions (Fig. 5.16).
 T h e Einstein universe does not represent the universe we live in
 because it is not expanding. Nevertheless, it is a convenient background
 to use when discussing time travel, because it is simple
 enough that one can do the sum over histories. Forgetting about time
 travel for the moment, consider matter in an Einstein universe that is
 rotating about some axis. If you were on the axis, you could remain
 at the same point of space, just as you do when standing at the center
 of a children's carousel. But if you were not on the axis, you would
 be moving through space as you rotated about the axis. Th e further
 you were from the axis, the faster you would be moving (Fig. 5.17).
 So if the universe were infinite in space, points sufficiently far from
 the axis would have to be rotating faster than light. However,
 because the Einstein universe is finite in the space directions, there
 is a critical rate of rotation below which no part of the universe is
 rotating faster than light.
 (FIG. 5.16 )
 The Einstein universe is like a cylinder:
 it is finite in space and constant in
 time. Because of its finite size, it can
 rotate at less than the speed of light
 everywhere. 
 151
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 ROTATING IN FLAT SPACE Rotating at less than
 the speed of light
 Axis of rotation
 Rotating at more than
 the speed of light
 (FIG. 5.17)
 In flat space a rigid rotation will move
 faster than the speed of light far from
 its axis.
 Now consider the sum over particle histories in a rotating
 Einstein universe. When the rotation is slow, there are many paths
 a particle can take using a given amount of energy. Thus the sum
 over all particle histories in this background gives a large amplitude.
 This means that the probability of this background would be high
 in the sum over all curved spacetime histories—that is, it is among
 the more probable histories. However, as the rate of rotation of the
 Einstein universe approaches the critical value, so that its outer
 edges are moving at a speed approaching the speed of light, there
 is only one particle path that is classically allowed on that edge,
 namely, one that is moving at the speed of light. This means that the
 sum over particle histories will be small. Thus the probability of
 these backgrounds will be low in the sum over all curved spacetime
 histories. That is, they are the least probable. 
 152
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 5.18 ) BACKGROUN D WIT H CLOSE D TIME-LIK E CURVE S
 Universe expanding in this
 direction
 Universe not expanding in
 this direction
 What do rotating Einstein universes have to do with
 time travel and time loops? The answer is that they are
 mathematically equivalent to other backgrounds
 that do admit time loops. These other backgrounds
 are universes that are expanding in
 two space directions. The universes are not
 expanding in the third space direction, which
 is periodic. That is to say, if you go a certain
 distance in this direction, you get back to
 where you started. However, each time you
 do a circuit of the third space direction, your
 speed in the first or second directions is
 increased (Fig. 5.18).
 If the boost is small, there are no time
 loops. However, consider a sequence of
 backgrounds with increasing boosts in speed.
 At a certain critical boost, time loops will appear. Not surprisingly,
 this critical boost corresponds to the critical rate of rotation of the
 Einstein universes. Since the sum-over-histories calculations in these 
 1 5 3
 PROTECTIN G TH E PAS T
 backgrounds are mathematically equivalent, one can conclude that
 the probability of these backgrounds goes to zero as they approach
 the warping needed for time loops. In other words, the probability of
 having sufficient warping for a time machine is zero. This supports
 what I have called the Chronology Protection Conjecture: that the
 laws of physics conspire to prevent time travel by macroscopic
 objects.
 Although time loops are allowed by the sum over histories, the
 probabilities are extremely small. Based on the duality arguments I
 mentioned earlier, I estimate the probability that Kip Thome could
 go back and kill his grandfather as less than one in ten with a trillion
 trillion trillion trillion trillion zeroes after it.
 That's a pretty small probability, but if you
 look closely at the picture of Kip, you may see a
 slight fuzziness around the edges. That corresponds
 to the faint possibility that some bastard
 from the future came back and killed his
 grandfather, so he's not really there.
 As gambling men, Kip and I
 would bet on odds like that. The
 trouble is, we can't bet each
 other because we are now
 both on the same side.
 On the other hand, I
 wouldn't take a bet
 with anyone else. He
 might be from the
 future and know that
 time travel worked.
 You might wonder
 if this chapter is part
 of a government coverup
 on time travel. You
 might be right.
 The probability that Kip could
 go back and kill his grandfather
 is
 In other words less than 1 in 1O
 —with a trillion trillion trillion
 trillion trillion zeroes after it. 
 
 1 5 5
 CHAPTE R 6
  OUR FUTURE? STAR TREK OR NOT?
 How biological and electronic life
 will go on developing in complexity at an ever-increasing rate. 
 1 5 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 6.1) GROWT H O F POPULATIO N 
 1 5 7
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 Newton, Einstein, Commander
 Data, and myself playing poker in
 a scene from Star Trek.
 Courtesy of Paramount Pictures.
 STAR TREK : TH E NEX T GENERATIO N
 Copyright ©200 1 by Paramount Pictures.
 All Right s Reserved
 T
 HE REASO N STAR TREK IS S O POPULA R IS BECAUS E IT IS A
 safe and comforting vision of the future. I'm a bit of a Star
 Trek fan myself, so I was easily persuaded to take part in an
 episode in which I played poker with Newton, Einstein, and
 Commander Data. I beat them all, but unfortunately there was a red
 alert, so I never collected my winnings.
 Star Trek shows a society that is far in advance of ours in science,
 in technology, and in political organization. (The last might not be
 difficult.) There must have been great changes, with their accompanying
 tensions and upsets, in the time between now and then, but in
 the period we are shown, science, technology, and the organization
 of society are supposed to have achieved a level of near perfection.
 I want to question this picture and ask if we will ever reach a
 final steady state in science and technology. At no time in the ten
 thousand years or so since the last ice age has the human race been
 in a state of constant knowledge and fixed technology. There have
 been a few setbacks, like the Dark Ages after the fall of the Roman
 Empire. But the world's population, which is a measure of our technological
 ability to preserve life and feed ourselves, has risen steadily
 with only a few hiccups such as the Black Death (Fig. 6.1). 
 158
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG 6.2)
 Left: The total worldwide energy consumption
 in billions of tons BCU,
 where 1 ton ~Bituminous Coal Unit
 = 8.13 MW-hr
 Right: The number of scientific articles
 published each year. The vertical scale
 is in thousands. In 190 0 there were
 9,000 . By 195 0 there were 90,00 0 and
 by the year 200 0 there were 900,000 .
 In the last two hundred years, population growth has become
 exponential; that is, the population grows by the same percentage
 each year. Currently, the rate is about 1.9 percent a year. That may
 not sound like very much, but it means that the world population
 doubles every forty years (Fig. 6.2) .
 Other measures of technological development in recent times
 are electricity consumption and the number of scientific articles. They
 too show exponential growth, with doubling times of less than forty
 years. There is no sign that scientific and technological development
 will slow down and stop in the near future—certainly not by the time
 of Star Trek, which is supposed to be not that far in the future. But if
 the population growth and the increase in the consumption of electricity
 continue at their current rates, by 260 0 the world's population
 will be standing shoulder to shoulder, and electricity use will make the
 Earth glow red-hot (see illustration opposite). 
 159
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 By the year 2600 the world's
 population would be standing
 shoulder to shoulder, and the
 electricity consumption would
 make the Earth glow red-hot.
 If you stacked all the new books being published next to each
 other, you would have to move at ninety miles an hour just to keep
 up with the end of the line. Of course, by 260 0 new artistic and scientific
 work will come in electronic forms, rather than as physical
 books and papers. Nevertheless, if the exponential growth continued,
 there would be ten papers a second in my kind of theoretical
 physics, and no time to read them.
 Clearly, the present exponential growth cannot continue
 indefinitely. So what will happen? One possibility is that we will
 wipe ourselves out completely by some disaster, such as a nuclear
 war. There is a sick joke that the reason we have not been contacted
 by extraterrestrials is that when a civilization reaches our stage
 of development, it becomes unstable and destroys itself. However,
 I'm an optimist. I don't believe the human race has come so far just
 to snuff itself out when things are getting interesting. 
 1 6 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 6.3)
 Star Trek's story line depends on the
 Enterprise, and starships like the one
 above, being able to travel at warp
 speed, which is much faster than light.
 However if the Chronology Protection
 Conjecture is correct, we shall have to
 explore the galaxy using rocketpropelled
 spaceships that travel slower
 than light.
 T h e Star Trek vision of the future—that we achieve an
 advanced but essentially static level—may come true in respect of
 our knowledge of the basic laws that govern the universe. As I shall
 describe in the next chapter, there may be an ultimate theory that
 we will discover in the not-too-distant future. Thi s ultimate theory,
 if it exists, will determine whethe r the Star Trek dream of warp drive
 can be realized. According to present ideas, we shall have to
 explore the galaxy in a slow and tedious manner, using spaceships
 traveling slower than light, but since we don't yet have a complete
 unified theory, we can't quite rule out warp drive (Fig. 6.3) . 
 161
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 On the other hand, we already know the laws that hold in all
 but the most extreme situations: the laws that govern the crew of the
 Enterprise, if not the spaceship itself. Yet it doesn't seem that we will
 ever reach a steady state in the uses we make of these laws or in the
 complexity of the systems that we can produce with them. It is with
 this complexity that the rest of this chapter will be concerned.
 By far the most complex systems that we have are our own
 bodies. Life seems to have originated in the primordial oceans that
 covered the Earth four billion years ago. How this happened we
 don't know. It may be that random collisions between atoms built
 up macromolecules that could reproduce themselves and assemble
 themselves into more complicated structures. What we do know is
 that by three and a half billion years ago, the highly complicated
 DNA molecule had emerged.
 DNA is the basis for all life on Earth. It has a double helix
 structure, like a spiral staircase, which was discovered by Francis
 Crick and James Watson in the Cavendish lab at Cambridge in
 1953 . The two strands of the double helix are linked by pairs of
 bases, like the treads in a spiral staircase. There are four bases in
 DNA: adenine, guanine, thymine, and cytosine. The order in
 which they occur along the spiral staircase carries the genetic information
 that enables the DNA to assemble an organism around it
 and reproduce itself. As it makes copies of itself, there are occasional
 errors in the proportion or order of the bases along the spiral.
 In most cases, the mistakes in copying make the DNA either
 unable or less likely to reproduce itself, meaning that such genetic
 errors, or mutations, as they are called, will die out. But in a few cases,
 the error or mutation will increase the chances of the DNA surviving
 and reproducing. Such changes in the genetic code will be favored.
 This is how the information contained in the sequence of DNA gradually
 evolves and increases in complexity (see Fig. 6.4 , page 162) .
 Because biological evolution is basically a random walk in the 
 162
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 6.4) EVOLUTIO N I N ACTIO N
 On the right are computer-generated
 biomorphs that evolved in a program
 devised by the biologist Richard
 Dawkins.
 Survival of a particular strain depended
 upon simple qualities like being
 "interesting," "different," or "insect-like."
 Starting from a single pixel, the early
 random generations developed through
 a process similar to natural selection.
 Dawkins bred an insect-like form in a
 remarkable 29 generations (with a number
 of evolutionary dead ends). 
 163
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 The development of
 complexity since the
 formation of the
 Earth (not to scale).
 space of all genetic possibilities, it has been very slow. The
 complexity, or number of bits of information, that is coded in
 DNA is roughly the number of bases in the molecule. For the
 first two billion years or so, the rate of increase in complexity
 must have been of the order of one bit of information every
 hundred years. The rate of increase of DNA complexity gradually
 rose to about one bit a year over the last few million years.
 But then, about six or eight thousand years ago, a major new
 development occurred. We developed written language. This
 meant that information could be passed from one generation to
 the next without having to wait for the very slow process of
 random mutations and natural selection to code it into the
 DNA sequence. The amount of complexity increased enormously.
 A single paperback romance could hold as much information
 as the difference in DNA between apes and humans,
 and a thirty-volume encyclopedia could describe the entire
 sequence of human DNA (Fig. 6.5) .
 Even more important, the information in books can be 
 1 6 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Growing embryos outside the human body will allow bigger brains and greater intelligence. 
 165
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 updated rapidly. The current rate at which human DNA is being
 updated by biological evolution is about one bit a year. But there are
 two hundred thousand new books published each year, a new-information
 rate of over a million bits a second. Of course, most of this
 information is garbage, but even if only one bit in a million is useful,
 that is still a hundred thousand times faster than biological evolution.
 This transmission of data through external, nonbiological means
 has led the human race to dominate the world and to have an exponentially
 increasing population. But now we are at the beginning of a
 new era, in which we will be able to increase the complexity of our
 internal record, the DNA, without having to wait for the slow process
 of biological evolution. There has been no significant change in human
 DNA in the last ten thousand years, but it is likely that we will be able
 to completely redesign it in the next thousand. Of course, many people
 will say that genetic engineering of humans should be banned, but
 it is doubtful we will be able to prevent it. Genetic engineering of plants
 and animals will be allowed for economic reasons, and someone is
 bound to try it on humans. Unless we have a totalitarian world order,
 someone somewhere will design improved humans.
 Clearly, creating improved humans will create great social and
 political problems with respect to unimproved humans. My intention
 is not to defend human genetic engineering as a desirable development,
 but just to say it is likely to happen whether we want it or
 not. This is the reason why I don't believe science fiction like Star
 Trek, where people four hundred years into the future are essentially
 the same as we are today. I think the human race, and its DNA, will
 increase its complexity quite rapidly. We should recognize that this
 is likely to happen and consider how we will deal with it.
 In a way, the human race needs to improve its mental and physical
 qualities if it is to deal with the increasingly complex world
 around it and meet new challenges such as space travel. Humans also
 need to increase their complexity if biological systems are to keep
 ahead of electronic ones. At the moment, computers have the advantage
 of speed, but they show no sign of intelligence. This is not surprising,
 because our present computers are less complex than the
 brain of an earthworm, a species not noted for its intellectual powers.
 But computers obey what is known as Moore's law: their speed
 At present our computers remain
 outstripped in computational power
 by the brain of a humble earthworm. 
 166
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 1 6 7
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 Neural implants will offer enhanced
 memory and complete packages of
 information, such as an entire language
 or the contents of this book learned
 within minutes. Such enhanced humans
 will bear little resemblance to ourselves.
 
 and complexity double every eighteen months (Fig. 6.6). It is one
 of those exponential growths that clearly cannot continue indefinitely.
 However, it will probably continue until computers have a
 complexity similar to that of the human brain. Some people say that
 computers can never show true intelligence, whatever that may be.
 But it seems to me that if very complicated chemical molecules can
 operate in humans to make them intelligent, then equally complicated
 electronic circuits can also make computers act in an intelligent
 way. And if they are intelligent, they can presumably design
 computers that have even greater complexity and intelligence.
 Will this increase of biological and electronic complexity go on
 forever, or is there a natural limit? On the biological side, the limit
 on human intelligence up to now has been set by the size of the
 brain that will pass through the birth canal. Having watched my
 three children being born, I know how difficult it is for the head to
 get out. But within the next hundred years, I expect we will be able
 to grow babies outside the human body, so this limitation will be
 removed. Ultimately, however, increases in the size of the human
 brain through genetic engineering will come up against the problem
 that the body's chemical messengers responsible for our mental 
 168
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 6.7)
 The human race has been in existence
 for only a tiny fraction of the
 history of the universe. (If this chart
 was to scale and the length that
 human beings have been around
 was 7cm, then the whole history of
 the universe would be over a kilometer)
 Any alien life we meet is
 likely to be much more primitive or
 much more advanced than we are.
 activity are relatively slow-moving. Thi s means that further increases
 in the complexity of the brain will be at the expense of speed.
 We can be quick-witted or very intelligent, but not both. Still, I
 think we can become a lot more intelligent than most of the people
 in Star Trek, not that that might be difficult.
 Electroni c circuits have the same complexity-versus-speed
 problem as the human brain. In this case, however, the signals are
 electrical, not chemical, and travel at the speed of light, which is
 much higher. Nevertheless, the speed of light is already a practical
 limit on the design of faster computers. On e can improve the situation
 by making the circuits smaller, but ultimately there will be a
 limit set by the atomi c nature of matter. Still, we have some way to
 go before we mee t that barrier.
 Anothe r way in which electroni c circuits can increase their 
 1 6 9
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 complexity while maintaining speed is to copy the
 human brain. The brain does not have a single CPU —
 central processing unit—that processes each command in
 sequence. Rather, it has millions of processors working
 together at the same time. Such massively parallel processing
 will be the future for electronic intelligence as well.
 Assuming we don't destroy ourselves in the next hundred
 years, it is likely that we will spread out first to the
 planets in the solar system and then to the nearby stars. But it won't
 be like Star Trek or Babylon 5, with a new race of nearly human beings
 in almost every stellar system. The human race has been in its present
 form for only two million years out of the fifteen billion years or
 so since the big bang (Fig. 6.7) .
 So even if life develops in other stellar systems, the chances of 
 170
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 171
 O U R FUTURE ? STA R TRE K O R NOT ?
 Does intelligence have much
 long-term survival value?
 catching it at a recognizably human stage are very small. Any
 alien life we encounter will likely be either much more primitive
 or much more advanced. If it is more advanced, why hasn't
 it spread through the galaxy and visited Earth? If aliens had
 come here, it should have been obvious: more like the film
 Independence Day than E.T.
 So how does one account for our lack of extraterrestrial
 visitors? It could be that there is an advanced race out there
 which is aware of our existence but is leaving us to stew in
 our own primitive juices. However, it is doubtful it would be
 so considerate to a lower life-form: do most of us worry how
 many insects and earthworms we squash underfoot? A more
 reasonable explanation is that there is a very low probability
 either of life developing on other planets or of that life developing
 intelligence. Because we claim to be intelligent,
 though perhaps without much ground, we tend to see intelligence
 as an inevitable consequence of evolution. However,
 one can question that. It is not clear that intelligence has
 much survival value. Bacteria do very well without intelligence
 and will survive us if our so-called intelligence causes
 us to wipe ourselves out in a nuclear war. So as we explore
 the galaxy we may find primitive life, but we are not likely to
 find beings like us.
 The future of science won't be like the comforting picture
 painted in Star Trek: a universe populated by many
 humanoid races, with an advanced but essentially static science
 and technology. Instead, I think we will be on our own,
 but rapidly developing in biological and electronic complexity.
 Not much of this will happen in the next hundred years,
 which is all we can reliably predict. But by the end of the
 next millennium, if we get there, the difference from Star Trek
 will be fundamental. 
 
 173
 CHAPTE R 7
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 Do we live on a brane or are we just holograms? 
 1 7 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.1 )
 M-theory is like a jigsaw. It is easy to
 identify and fit together the pieces
 around the edges but we don't have
 much idea of what happens in the
 middle, where we can't make the
 approximation that some quantity or
 other will be small. 
 175
 BRAN E NE W WORL D 
 176
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.2)
 Right The classical indivisible atom.
 Far right: An atom showing electrons
 orbiting a nucleus of protons and
 neutrons.
 (FIG. 7.3)
 Top: A proton consists of two up
 quarks, each with a positive two-thirds
 electrical charge, and one down
 quark, having a negative one-third
 charge. Bottom: A neutron consists of
 two down quarks, each with a negative
 one-third electrical charge, and one up
 quark, having a positive two-thirds
 charge.
 continuous medium with properties like elasticity and viscosity, but
 evidence began to emerge that matter is not smooth but grainy: it
 is made of tiny building blocks called atoms. The word atom comes
 from Creek and means indivisible, but it was soon found that atoms
 consisted of electrons orbiting a nucleus made up of protons and
 neutrons (Fig. 7.2).
 The work on atomic physics in the first thirty years of the century
 took our understanding down to lengths of a millionth of a millimeter.
 Then we discovered that protons and neutrons are made of
 even smaller particles called quarks (Fig. 7.3) .
 Our recent research on nuclear and high-energy physics has taken
 us to length scales that are smaller by a further factor of a billion. It
 might seem that we could go on forever, discovering structures on
 smaller and smaller length scales. However, there is a limit to this series,
 as there is to the series of Russian dolls within Russian dolls (Fig. 7.4).
 Eventually, one gets down to a smallest doll, which can't be
 taken apart any more. In physics, the smallest doll is called the
 Planck length. To probe to shorter distances would require particles
 of such high energy that they would be inside black holes. We don't
 know exactly what the fundamental Planck length is in M-theory,
 but it might be as small as a millimeter divided by a hundred thousand
 billion billion billion. We are not about to build particle accelerators
 that can probe to distances that small. They would have to 
 177
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.4) Each doll represents a theoretical understanding of nature down to a certain length
 scale. Each contains a smaller doll that corresponds to a theory that describes nature on
 shorter scales. But there exists a smallest fundamental length in physics, the Planck length, a
 scale at which nature may be described by M-theory. 
 178
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.5)
 The size of an accelerator needed to
 probe distances as small as a Planck
 length would be greater than the
 diameter of the solar system.
 be larger than the solar system, and they are not likely to be
 approved in the present financial climate (Fig. 7.5).
 However, there has been an exciting new development that
 means we might discover at least some of the dragons of M-theory
 more easily (and cheaply). As explained in Chapters 1 and 3, in the
 M-theory network of mathematical models, spacetime has ten or
 eleven dimensions. Up to recently it was thought that the six or
 seven extra dimensions would all be curled up very small. It would
 be like a human hair (Fig.7.6).
 If you look at a hair under a magnifying glass, you can see it has
 thickness, but to the naked eye it just appears like a line with length
 but no other dimension. Spacetime may be similar: on human,
 atomic, or even nuclear physics length scales, it may appear fourdimensional
 and nearly flat. On the other hand if we probe to very
 short distances using extremely high energy particles, we should
 see that spacetime was ten- or eleven-dimensional. 
 1 7 9
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 When probes have a high enough energy, they could reveal
 that spacetime is multidimensional.
 (FIG. 7.6 )
 To the naked eye a hair looks like a line; its only dimension
 appears to be length. Similarly, spacetime may look fourdimensional
 to us, but appear ten- or eleven-dimensional
 when probed with very high-energy particles. 
 1 8 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FlG. 7.7) BRANE WORLDS
 The electric force would be confined
 to the brane and would fall off at the
 right rate for electrons to have stable
 orbits about the nuclei of atoms.
 If all the additional dimensions were very small, it would be very
 difficult to observe them. However, there has recently been the suggestion
 that one or more of the extra dimensions might be comparitively
 large or even infinite. Thi s idea has the great advantage (at least
 to a positivist like me) that it may be testable by the next generation
 of particle accelerators or by sensitive short-range measurements of
 the gravitational force. Such observations could either falsify the theory
 or experimentally confirm the presence of other dimensions.
 Large extra dimensions are an exciting new development in our
 search for the ultimate model or theory. The y would imply that we
 lived in a brane world, a four-dimensional surface or brane in a
 higher-dimensional spacetime.
 Matter and nongravitational forces like the electric force would be
 confined to the brane. Thus everything not involving gravity would 
 181
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.8)
 Gravity would spread into the extra
 dimensions as well as acting along the
 brane, and would fall off faster with distance
 than it would in four dimensions.
 behave as it would in four dimensions. In particular, the electric force
 between the nucleus of an atom and the electrons orbiting around it
 would fall off with distance at the right rate for atoms to be stable
 against the electrons falling into the nucleus (Fig. 7.7).
 Thi s would be in accordance with the anthropic principle that
 the universe must be suitable for intelligent life: if atoms weren't stable,
 we wouldn't be here to observe the universe and ask why it
 appears four-dimensional.
 On the other hand, gravity in the form of curved space would
 permeate the whole bulk of the higher-dimensional spacetime. Thi s
 would mean that gravity would behave differently from other forces
 we experience: because gravity would spread out in the extra
 dimensions, it would fall off more rapidly with distance than one
 would expect (Fig. 7.8). 
 182
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (a)
 (FIG. 7.9)
 A faster falloff of the gravitational
 force at large distances would mean
 that planetary orbits would be unstable.
 Planets would either fall into the Sun (a)
 or escape its attraction altogether (b).
 If this more rapid falloff of the gravitational force extended to
 astronomical distances, we would have noticed its effect on the
 orbits of the planets. In fact they would be unstable, as was
 remarked in Chapter 3: the planets would either fall into the Sun
 or escape to the dark and cold of interstellar space (Fig. 7.9) .
 However, this would not happen if the extra dimensions ended
 on another brane not that far away from the brane on which we
 live. Then for distances greater than the separation of the branes,
 gravity would not be able to spread out freely but would effectively
 be confined to the brane, like the electric forces, and fall off at
 the right rate for planetary orbits (Fig. 7 .10).
 On the other hand, for distances less than the separation of the
 branes, gravity would vary more rapidly. The very small gravitational
 force between heavy objects has been measured accurately in 
 183
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.10) A second brane near our brane world would prevent gravity from spreading far into
 the extra dimensions and would mean that at distances greater than the brane separation, gravity
 would fall off at the rate one would expect for four dimensions. 
 184
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.11 )
 T H E CAVENDISH EXPERIMEN T
 A laser beam (e) determines any twist
 of the dumbbell as it is projected on a
 calibrated screen (f). Two small lead
 spheres (a) attached to the dumbbell
 (b) with a small mirror (c) are freely
 suspended by a torsion fiber
 Two large lead spheres (g) are placed
 near the small ones on a rotating bar
 As the larger lead spheres rotate to
 the opposite position, the dumbbell
 oscillates and then settles to a new
 position.
 the lab but the experiments so far would not have detected the
 effects of branes separated by less than a few millimeters. New
 measurements are now being made at shorter distances (Fig. 7.11) .
 In this brane world, we would live on one brane but there would
 be anothe r "shadow" brane nearby. Because light would be confined
 to the branes and would not propagate through the space between,
 we could not see the shadow world. But we would feel the gravitational
 influence of matter on the shadow brane. In our brane such
 gravitational forces would appear to be produced by sources that
 were truly "dark" in that the only way we could detect them is
 through their gravity (Fig. 7.12) . In fact in order to explain the rate
 at which stars orbit the center of our galaxy, it seems there must be
 more mass than is accounted for by the matter we observe. 
 185
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.12) In the brane world scenario, planets may orbit a dark mass on a shadow
 brane because the gravitational force propagates into the extra dimensions. 
 1 8 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 1 8 7
 BRAN E NE W WORL D 
 188
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 The no man's land of extra dimensions that lies between branes.
 (FIG. 7.1 3)
 We would not see a shadow galaxy on
 a shadow brane because light would not
 propagate through the extra dimensions.
 But gravity would, so the rotation
 of our galaxy would be affected by dark
 matter, matter we cannot see.
 This missing mass might arise from some exotic species of particle
 in our world such as WIMPs (weakly interacting massive particles)
 or axions (very light elementary particles). But missing mass could
 also be evidence of the existence of a shadow world with matter in it.
 Maybe it contains shallow human beings wondering about the mass
 that seems to be missing from their world to account for the orbits of
 shadow stars around the center of the shadow galaxy (Fig. 7.13) . 
 1 8 9
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 Instead of the extra dimensions ending on a second brane,
 another possibility is that they are infinite but highly curved, like a
 saddle (Fig. 7.14) . Lisa Randall and Raman Sundrum showed that
 this kind of curvature would act rather like a second brane: the gravitational
 influence of an object on the brane would be confined to
 a small neighborhood of the brane and not spread out to infinity in
 the extra dimensions. As in the shadow brane model, the gravitational
 field would have the right long-distance falloff to explain
 planetary orbits and lab measurements of the gravitational force,
 but gravity would vary more rapidly at short distances.
 There is however an important difference between this RandallSundrum
 model and the shadow brane model. Bodies that move
 under the influence of gravity will produce gravitational waves, ripples
 of curvature that travel through spacetime at the speed of light.
 (FIG. 7.14 )
 In the Randall-Sundrum model there
 is only one brane (shown here in
 only one dimension). The extra
 dimensions extend to infinity, but are
 curved like a saddle. This curvature
 prevents the gravitational field of
 matter on the brane from spreading
 far into the extra dimensions. 
 1 9 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 191
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 Like the electromagnetic waves of light, gravitational waves should
 carry energy, a prediction that has been confirmed by observations
 of the binary pulsar PSR1913+16 .
 If we indeed live on a brane in a spacetime with extra dimensions,
 gravitational waves generated by the motion of bodies on the
 brane would travel off into the other dimensions. If there were a
 second shadow brane, gravitational waves would be reflected back
 and trapped between the two branes. On the other hand, if there
 was only a single brane and the extra dimensions went on forever,
 as in the Randall-Sundrum model, gravitational waves could escape
 altogether and carry away energy from our brane world (Fig. 7.15).
 (FIG. 7 .15 )
 In the Randall-Sundrum model, short
 wavelength gravitational waves can
 carry energy away from sources on
 the brane, causing apparent violation
 of the law of conservation of energy. 
 192
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 Thi s would seem to breach one of the fundamental principles of
 physics: the Law of Conservation of Energy. Th e total amount of
 energy remains the same. However, it appears to be a violation only
 because our view of what is happening is restricted to the brane.
 An angel who could see the extra dimensions would know that the
 energy was the same, just more spread out.
 T h e gravitational waves produced by two stars orbiting each
 othe r would have a wavelength which would be much longer than
 the radius of the saddle-shaped curvature in the extra dimensions.
 Thi s would mean they would tend to be confined to a small neighborhood
 of the brane—like gravitational force—and would not
 spread out much into the extra dimensions or carry away much
 energy from the brane. On the other hand, gravitational waves that
 were shorter than the scale on which the extra dimensions are
 curved would escape easily from the vicinity of the brane.
 T h e only sources of significant amounts of short gravitational
 waves are likely to be black holes. A black hole on the brane will
 extend to a black hole in the extra dimensions. If the black hole is
 small, it will be almost round; that is, it will reach about as far into
 the extra dimensions as its size on the brane. On the other hand, a
 large black hole on the brane will extend to a "black pancake," which
 is confined to a vicinity of the brane and which is much less thick (in
 the extra dimensions) than it is wide (on the brane) (Fig. 7.16).
 As explained in Chapter 4, quantum theory means that black
 holes won't be completely black: they will emit particles and radiation
 of all kinds like hot bodies. Th e particles and radiation-like light
 would be emitted along the brane because matter and nongravitational
 forces like electricity would be confined to the brane.
 However, black holes also emit gravitational waves. Thes e would not
 be confined to the brane but would travel in the extra dimension as
 well. If the black hole was large and pancake-like, the gravitational
 waves would stay near the brane. Thi s would mean that the black
 hole would lose energy (and therefore mass by E=mc 2 ) at the rate one
 would expect for a black hole in four-dimensional spacetime. Th e
 black hole would therefore slowly evaporate and shrink in size until 
 193
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 it became smaller than the radius of curvature of the saddle-like
 extra dimensions. At this point the gravitational waves emitted by
 the black hole would begin to escape freely into the extra dimensions.
 To someone on the brane, the black hole—o r dark star as
 Michell called it (see Chapte r 4)—woul d appear to be emitting
 dark radiation, radiation that cannot be observed directly on the
 brane but whose existence could be inferred from the fact that the
 black hole was losing mass.
 (FIG. 7.16)
 A black hole in our world on the
 brane would extend into the extra
 dimensions. If the black hole is small,
 it would be almost round, but a large
 black hole on the brane would
 extend to a pancake-shaped black
 hole in the extra dimension. 
 194
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.17) The formation of a brane world could be like the formation of a bubble of steam in boiling water 
 195
 BRANE : NE W WORL D
 It would mean that the final burst of radiation from an evaporating
 black hole would appear less powerful than it actually was. This
 could be why we have not observed bursts of gamma rays that can
 be ascribed to dying black holes, though the other, more prosaic
 explanation would be that there aren't many black holes with mass
 low enough to evaporate in the age of the universe thus far.
 The radiation from brane-world black holes arises from quantum
 fluctuations of particles on and off a brane but branes, like everything
 else in the universe, will be subject to quantum fluctuations
 themselves. These can cause branes to appear and disappear spontaneously.
 The quantum creation of a brane would be a bit like the formation
 of bubbles of steam in boiling water. Liquid water consists of
 billions and billions of H 2 0 molecules packed together with couplings
 between nearest neighbors. As the water is heated up, the
 molecules move faster and bounce off each other. Occasionally
 these collisions will give molecules such high velocities that a group
 of them will break free of their bonds and form a little bubble of
 steam surrounded by water. The bubble will then grow or shrink in
 a random manner with more molecules from the liquid joining the
 steam or vice versa. Most small bubbles of steam will collapse to liquid
 again but a few will grow to a certain critical size beyond which
 the bubbles are almost certain to continue to grow. It is these large
 expanding bubbles that one observes when water boils (Fig. 7.17).
 The behavior of brane worlds would be similar. The uncertainty
 principle would allow brane worlds to appear from nothing as bubbles,
 with the brane forming the surface of the bubble and the interior
 being the higher-dimensional space. Very small bubbles would
 tend to collapse again to nothing, but a bubble that grew by quantum
 fluctuations beyond a certain critical size would be likely to keep on
 growing. People (such as us) living on the brane, the
 surface of the bubble, would think the universe was
 expanding. It would be like painting galaxies on the
 surface of a balloon and blowing it up. The galaxies
 would move apart but no galaxy would be picked out
 as the center of expansion. Let's hope there's no one
 with a cosmic pin to deflate the bubble. 
 1 9 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 According to the no boundary proposal described in Chapter 3,
 the spontaneous creation of a brane world would have a history in
 imaginary time which was like a nutshell: that is, it would be a fourdimensional
 sphere, like the surface of the Earth but with two more
 dimensions. Th e important difference is that the nutshell described in
 Chapter 3 was essentially hollow: the four-dimensional sphere wouldn't
 have been the boundary of anything and the other six or seven
 dimensions of spacetime that M-theory predicts would all be curled up
 even smaller than the nutshell. On the new brane world picture, however,
 the nutshell would be filled: the history in imaginary time of the
 brane on which we live would be a four-dimensional sphere that
 would be the boundary of a five-dimensional bubble with the remaining
 five or six dimensions curled up very small (Fig. 7. 1 8 ) .
 Thi s history of the brane in imaginary time would determine its
 history in real time. In real time the brane would expand in an accelerated
 inflationary manner like that described in Chapter 3. A perfectly
 smooth and round nutshell would be the most probable history
 of the bubble in imaginary time. However, it would correspond
 to a brane that expanded forever in an inflationary way in real time.
 Galaxies would not form on such a brane and so intelligent life
 would not have developed. On the other hand, imaginary time histories
 that are not perfectly smooth and round would have somewhat
 lower probabilities but could correspond to real time behavior
 in which the brane had a phase of accelerating inflationary expansion
 at first but then began to slow down. During this decelerating
 expansion galaxies could have formed and intelligent life might
 have developed. Thus , according to the anthropi c principle
 described in Chapte r 3, it is only the slightly hairy nutshells which
 will be observed by intelligent beings asking why the origin of the
 universe wasn't perfectly smooth.
 As the brane expanded, the volume of the higher-dimensional
 space inside would increase. Eventually there would be an enormous
 bubble surrounded by the brane on which we live. But do we
 really live on the brane? According to the idea of holography
 described in Chapte r 2, information about what happens in a region 
 1 9 7
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.18)
 The brane world picture of the origin of the universe differs from that
 discussed in Chapter 3, because the slightly flattened four-dimensional
 sphere, or nutshell, is no longer hollow but is filled by a fifth dimension. 
 198
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 of spacetime can be encoded on its boundary. So maybe we
 think we live in a four-dimensional world because we are
 shadows cast on the brane by what is happening in the interior
 of the bubble . However, from a positivist viewpoint, one
 cannot ask: which is reality, brane or bubble?. The y are both
 mathematical model s that describe the observations. On e is free to
 use whichever model is mos t convenient. Wha t is outside the brane?
 Ther e are several possibilities (Fig. 7.19) : 
 1 9 9
 BRAN E NE W WORL D
 (FIG. 7.19 )
 I. A brane/bubble with a higherdimensional
 space inside with nothing
 outside.
 Identify
 2. A possibility in which the outside of
 a brane/bubble is glued to the outside
 of another bubble.
 3. A brane/bubble expands into a
 space which is not the mirror image of
 what is inside. Other bubbles could
 form and expand in such a scenario.
 1. Ther e may be nothing outside. Although a bubble of steam
 has water outside it, this is just an analogy to help us visualize the
 origin of the universe. On e could imagine a mathematical model
 that was just a brane with a higher-dimensional space inside but
 absolutely nothing outside, not even empty space. On e can calculate
 what the mathematical model predicts without reference to
 what is outside.
 2. One could have a mathematical model in which the outside of a
 bubble was glued to the outside of a similar bubble. Thi s model is actually
 mathematically equivalent to the possibility discussed above that
 there is nothing outside the bubble but the difference is psychological:
 people feel happier being placed in the center of spacetime rather than
 on its edge; but for a positivist, possibilities 1 and 2 are the same.
 3. Th e bubble might expand into a space that was not a mirror
 image of what was inside the bubble. Thi s possibility is different
 from the two discussed above and is more like the case of boiling
 water. Othe r bubbles could form and expand. If they collided and
 merged with the bubble in which we lived, the results could be catastrophic.
 It has even been suggested that the big bang itself may
 have produced by a collision between branes.
 Brane world models like this are a hot topi c of research. The y
 are highly speculative but they offer new kinds of behavior that can
 be tested by observation. The y could explain why gravity seems to
 be so weak. Gravity might be quite strong in the fundamental theory
 but the spreading of the gravitational force in the extra dimensions
 would mean it would be weak at large distances on the brane
 on which we live.
 A consequence of this would be that the Planck length, the
 smallest distance to which we can probe without creating a black
 hole, would be quite a lot larger than it would appear from the
 weakness of gravity on our four-dimensional brane. Th e smallest
 Russian doll wouldn't be so tiny after all and might be within the
 reach of particle accelerators of the future. In fact we might already
 have discovered the smallest doll, the fundamental Planck length, if
 the U.S. hadn't gone through a fit of feeling poor in 199 4 and canceled
 the SS C (Superconducting Super Collider) even though it
 was half built. Othe r particle accelerators such as the LH C (Large 
 2 0 0
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L
 (FIG. 7.20 )
 Layout of the LEP tunnel showing the
 existing infrastructure and the future
 construction of the Large Hadron
 Collider in Geneva, Switzerland. 
 2 0 1
 BRAN E NE W WORL D 
 202
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 2 0 3
 GLOSSAR Y 
 2 0 4
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 205
 GLOSSAR Y 
 2 0 6
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 2 0 7
 GLOSSAR Y 
 2 0 8
 T H E UNIVERS E I N A NUTSHEL L 
 2 0 9
 SUGGESTE D FURTHE R READING S 
 2 1 0
